Table of Contents    
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended March 31, 2022
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period fr om             to            
Commission File Number: 1-13252
McKESSON CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delawar e  94-3207296
(State or  other  jurisdiction of incorporation or  organization)  (I.R.S. Employer  Identification No.)
6555 State Hwy 161,
Irving, TX 75039
(Addr ess of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(972) 446-4800
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including ar ea code)
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
(Title of each class) (Trading Symbol) (Name of each exchange on which registered)
Common stock, $0.01 par value MCK New York Stock Exchange
1.500% Notes due 2025 MCK25 New York Stock Exchange
1.625% Notes due 2026 MCK26 New York Stock Exchange
3.125% Notes due 2029 MCK29 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act.  Yes  ☐    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required  to file such reports), and (2) has been
subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorte r period that the registrant was required
to submit such files).  Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company , or an emer ging growth company . See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company ,” and
“emer ging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer  ☒   Accelerated filer  ☐
Non-accelerated filer  ☐   Smaller reporting company  ☐
Emer ging growth company ☐
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extend ed transition period for complying
with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’ s assessment of the effectiveness of its
internal contr ol over financial reporting under Sectio n 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting
firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).  Yes  ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-af filiates of the registrant, computed by reference to
the closing price as of the last business day of the registrant’ s most recently completed second fiscal quarter , September 30, 2021, was
approximately $ 30.4 billion.
Number of shares of common stock outstanding on April 29, 2022: 145,365,324
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’ s Proxy Statement for its 2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference into Part III of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
Item Page
PART I
1. Business 3
1A. Risk Factors 14
1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 26
2. Properties 26
3. Legal Proceedings 26
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 27
Information about our Executive Officers 28
PART II
5. Market for the Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 29
6. Reserved 31
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 32
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 61
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 63
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 137
9A. Controls and Procedures 137
9B. Other Information 137
9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 137
PART III
10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance 137
11. Executive Compensation 138
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 138
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 140
14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 140
PART IV
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule 141
16. Form 10-K Summary 147
Signatures 148
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART I
Item 1.    Business.
General
McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” the “Company,” or “we,” and other similar pronouns), which traces its business roots to
1833, is a diversified healthcare services leader dedicated to advancing health outcomes for patients everywhere. Our teams partner
with biopharma companies, care providers, pharmacies, manufacturers, governments, and others to deliver insights, products, and
services to help make quality care more accessible and affordable.
The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references in this document to
a particular year refers to the Company’s fiscal year. The Company was incorporated on July 7, 1994 in the State of Delaware.
Our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those
reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
Act”), are available free of charge on the Company’s website (www.mckesson.com under the “Investors — Financials — SEC
Filings” caption) as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with, or furnished to, the Securities and
Exchange Commission (“SEC” or the “Commission”). The content on any website referred to in this Annual Report on Form 10-K
(“Annual Report”) is not incorporated by reference into this report, unless expressly noted otherwise. The SEC maintains a website
that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers, including the Company, that file
electronically with the SEC. The address of the website is www.sec.gov.
Business Segments
Commencing with the second quarter of 2021, the Company operates its business in four reportable segments: U.S.
Pharmaceutical, Prescription Technology Solutions (“RxTS”), Medical-Surgical Solutions, and International. The Company’s
equity method investment in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change Healthcare JV”), which was split-off from McKesson in the fourth
quarter of 2020, has been included in Other for retrospective periods presented.
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment distributes branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar and over-the-counter (“OTC”)
pharmaceutical drugs, and other healthcare-related products. This segment provides practice management, technology, clinical
support, and business solutions to community-based oncology and other specialty practices. In addition, the segment sells financial,
operational, and clinical solutions to pharmacies (retail, hospital, alternate site) and provides consulting, outsourcing, technological,
and other services.
Our Prescription Technology Solutions segment serves our biopharma and life sciences partners and patients. RxTS addresses
medication challenges for patients throughout their journeys by working across healthcare to connect pharmacies, providers,
payers, and biopharma companies to deliver innovative access and adherence solutions as well as dispensing support services,
third-party logistics and wholesale distribution support designed to benefit stakeholders.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment provides medical-surgical supply distribution, logistics, and other services to
healthcare providers, including physician offices, surgery centers, nursing homes, hospital reference labs, and home health care
agencies. We offer more than 285,000 national brand medical-surgical products as well as McKesson’s own line of high-quality
products through a network of distribution centers within the United States (“U.S.”).
Our International segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional, and retail customers in 11 European
countries and Canada where we own, partner or franchise with retail pharmacies, and support better, safer patient care by delivering
vital medicines, supplies, and information technology solutions.
3
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
U.S. Pharmaceutical Segment:
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment provides distribution and logistics services for branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar, and
OTC pharmaceutical drugs along with other healthcare-related products to customers. This business provides solutions and services
to pharmacies, hospitals, oncology and other specialty practices, pharmaceutical manufacturers, biopharma partners, physicians,
payers, and patients throughout the U.S. and Puerto Rico. We also source generic pharmaceutical drugs through our ClarusONE
Sourcing Services LLP joint venture with Walmart (“ClarusONE”).
Our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment operates and serves customers through a network of 29 distribution centers, including two
strategic redistribution centers. We invest in technology and other systems at all of our distribution centers to enhance safety,
reliability, and product availability. For example, we offer McKesson Connect, an internet-based ordering system that provides
item look-up and real-time inventory availability as well as ordering, purchasing, third-party reconciliation, and account
management functionality. We make extensive use of technology as an enabler to ensure customers have the right products at the
right time in the right place.
To maximize distribution efficiency and effectiveness, we follow the Six Sigma methodology, which is an analytical approach
that emphasizes setting high-quality objectives, collecting data, and analyzing results to a fine degree in order to improve processes,
reduce costs, and enhance service accuracy and safety. We provide solutions to our customers including supply management
technology, world-class marketing programs, managed care, repackaging products, and services to help them meet their business
and quality goals. We continue to implement information systems to help achieve greater consistency and accuracy both internally
and for our customers.
We have four primary customer pharmaceutical distribution channels: (i) retail national accounts, which include national and
regional chains, food and drug combinations, mail order pharmacies, and mass merchandisers, (ii) community pharmacies and
health (formerly described as independent, small, and medium chain retail pharmacies), (iii) institutional healthcare providers such
as hospitals, health systems, integrated delivery networks, and long-term care providers, and (iv) oncology, biopharma, and other
specialty partners.
Retail National Accounts: We provide business solutions that help retail national account customers increase revenues and
profitability. Solutions include:
•Central Fill - Prescription refill service that enables pharmacies to more quickly refill prescriptions remotely, more
accurately, and at a lower cost, while reducing inventory levels and improving customer service.
•Strategic Redistribution Centers - Two facilities totaling over 740,000 square feet that offer access to inventory for single
source warehouse purchasing, including pharmaceuticals and biologics. These distribution centers also provide the
foundation for a two-tiered distribution network that supports best-in-class direct store delivery.
•McKesson SynerGx - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program and inventory management that helps pharmacies
maximize their cost savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing, and one-stop shopping.
•Inventory Management - An integrated solution comprising forecasting software and automated replenishment
technologies that reduce inventory-carrying costs.
•ExpressRx Track™ - Pharmacy automation solution featuring state-of-the-art robotics, upgraded imaging, and expanded
vial capabilities, and industry-leading speed and accuracy in a small footprint.SM
SM
®
4
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Community Pharmacy and Health: We provide managed care contracting, branding and advertising, merchandising,
purchasing, operational efficiency, and automation that help community pharmacists focus on patient care while improving
profitability. Solutions include:
•Health Mart - A national network of approximately 4,700 independently-owned pharmacies and one of the industry’s
most comprehensive pharmacy franchise programs. Health Mart provides franchisees support for managed care
contracting, branding and local marketing solutions, the Health Mart private label line of products, merchandising
solutions, and programs for enhanced patient support.
•Health Mart Atlas - Comprehensive managed care and reconciliation assistance services that help community pharmacies
save time, access competitive reimbursement rates, and improve cash flow.
•McKesson Reimbursement Advantage (“MRA”) - MRA is one of the industry’s most comprehensive reimbursement
optimization packages, comprising financial services (automated claim resubmission), analytic services, and customer
care.
•McKesson OneStop Generics - Generic pharmaceutical purchasing program that helps pharmacies maximize their cost
savings with a broad selection of generic drugs, competitive pricing, and one-stop shopping.
•Health Mart and Sunmark - Complete line of products that provide community pharmacies with value-priced alternatives
to national brands.
•FrontEdge™ - Strategic planning, merchandising, and price maintenance program that helps community pharmacies
maximize store profitability.
•McKesson RxOwnership Program - Assist independent pharmacist owners with the opportunity to remain independent via
succession planning and business operation loans.
•Health Mart Digital Portfolio - Introducing an enhanced online experience for pharmacies and patients.
Institutional Healthcare Providers: At McKesson, we are relentless in our pursuit of opportunities to achieve operational
efficiency, reduce waste, and improve the financial performance of our customers so they can achieve more of their goals today and
into the future. Solutions include:
•RxO Advisory Services – A suite of supply chain management, pharmacy optimization, and 340B program advisory
services.
•McKesson Plasma and Biologics – A robust portfolio of plasma-derivatives and biologic products.
•Outpatient and Specialty Pharmacy – A portfolio of services and solutions customized to each customer’s business and
clinical strategy.
•Contracting and Contract/Purchasing Optimization – Solutions across generics, specialty, branded products, biosimilars,
and 340B products, for inpatient and outpatient settings.
•Supply Assurance – Solutions and strategies to enhance product availability and proactively manage inventory of critical
items.
•Patient Assistance Solutions – Solutions and resources for patient financial assistance and community benefit programs.®
®
SM
®
®
5
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Oncology, Biopharma, and Other Specialty Partners:
The U.S. Pharmaceutical segment provides a range of solutions to oncology and other specialty practices and offers
community specialists (oncologists, rheumatologists, ophthalmologists, urologists, neurologists, and other specialists) an extensive
set of customizable products and services designed to strengthen core practice operations, enhance value-based care delivery, and
expand their service offering to patients. Community-based physicians in this business have broad flexibility and discretion to
select the products and commitment levels that best meet their practice needs. Services in provider solutions include specialty drug
distribution, group purchasing organizations (“GPO”) like Onmark, technology solutions, practice consulting services, and
vaccine distribution, including our exclusive distributor relationship with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s
(“CDC”) Vaccines for Children program. Additionally, to support the U.S. efforts to fight the pandemic caused by the SARS-CoV-2
coronavirus (“COVID-19”), this segment has been distributing certain COVID-19 vaccines since December 2020 at the direction of
the U.S. government.
This business provides a variety of solutions, including practice operations, healthcare information technology, revenue cycle
management and managed care contracting solutions, evidence-based guidelines, and quality measurements to support U.S.
Oncology Network (“USON”), one of the nation’s largest networks of physician-led, integrated, community-based oncology
practices dedicated to advancing high-quality, evidence-based cancer care. We also support U.S. Oncology Research, one of the
nation’s largest research networks, specializing in oncology clinical trials.
This segment includes our Ontada business, providing software to support the clinical, financial, and operational needs of our
oncology practice partners. Ontada also partners with oncology providers and biopharma partners to perform real-world evidence
studies, retrospective research, and to provide clinical data insights, advisory solutions and education opportunities.
This segment also offers solutions which enable its customers to drive greater efficiencies in their day to day operations,
effectively managing their inventories and complying with complex government regulations. Solutions include McKesson
Pharmacy Systems, MacroHelix, and Supply Logix, all of which provide innovative software technology and services that support
retail pharmacies and hospitals.
When we discuss specialty products or services, we consider the following factors: diseases requiring complex treatment
regimens such as cancer and rheumatoid arthritis; plasma and biologics products; ongoing clinical monitoring requirements, high-
cost, special handling, storage, and delivery requirements and, in some cases, exclusive distribution arrangements. Our use of the
term “specialty” may not be comparable to that used by other industry participants, including our competitors.
Prescription Technology Solutions Segment:
Our Prescription Technology Solutions segment works across healthcare to connect pharmacies, providers, payers, and
biopharma companies to deliver medication access and adherence solutions that support patients from first prescription fill to
ongoing therapy, regardless of their insurance coverage. RxTS has connections with most electronic health record systems, over
50,000 pharmacies, more than 750,000 providers, most payers and pharmacy benefit managers, and over 650 biopharma brands
representing most therapeutic areas. Through its industry connections and ability to navigate the healthcare ecosystem, RxTS
accelerates innovative solutions created to benefit healthcare stakeholders. Its comprehensive solution suites span across the entire
patient journey, including medication access and affordability, prescription decision support and dispensing support services, as
well as third-party logistics and wholesale distribution support, to help increase speed to therapy, reduce prescription abandonment,
and support improved health outcomes for the patient. In the past year, RxTS helped patients save more than $6 billion on brand
and specialty medications, helped to prevent more than 9 million prescriptions from being abandoned due to affordability
challenges, and helped patients access their medicine more than 67 million times.®
6
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Medical-Surgical Solutions Segment:
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment delivers medical-supply distribution, logistics, biomedical maintenance, and other
services to healthcare providers across the alternate-site spectrum. Our more than 275,000 customers include physician offices,
surgery centers, post-acute care facilities, hospital reference labs, and home health agencies. We partner with manufacturers and
channel partners to support our key target end-markets, including primary care, extended care, government, and other markets. We
distribute medical-surgical supplies (such as gloves, needles, syringes, and wound care products), infusion pumps, laboratory
equipment, and pharmaceuticals. Through a network of distribution centers within the U.S., we offer more than 285,000 products
from national brand manufacturers and McKesson’s own brand of high-quality products. Through the right mix of products and
services, we help improve efficiencies, profitability, and compliance. We also never lose focus on helping customers improve
patient and business outcomes. We develop customized plans to address the product, operational, and clinical support needs of our
customers, including tackling inventory management, reducing administrative burdens, and training and educating clinical staff. We
deliver for our customers, so they can deliver and care for their patients. Additionally, under contracts with the Department of
Health and Human Services (“HHS”) and Pfizer, Inc., McKesson’s Medical-Surgical business leverages its expertise to manage the
assembly, storage, and distribution of supply kits needed to administer COVID-19 vaccines, as well as some of the sourcing of
those supplies. The kits are produced and distributed at the direction of HHS to support the administration of all COVID-19
vaccines approved in the U.S.
International Segment:
Our International segment provides distribution and services to wholesale, institutional, and retail customers in 11 European
countries where we own, partner, or franchise with retail pharmacies and operate through two businesses: Pharmaceutical
Distribution and Retail Pharmacy. Our operations in Canada support better, safer patient care by delivering vital medicines,
supplies, and information technology solutions to customers, and through several retail health and wellness brands, across Canada.
Our European Pharmaceutical Distribution business delivers pharmaceutical and other healthcare-related products to
pharmacies across Europe. This business functions as a vital link, using technology-enabled management systems at our regional
wholesale branches to connect manufacturers to retail pharmacies, supplying medicines and other products sold in pharmacies.
Our European Retail Pharmacy business serves patients and consumers in European countries directly through approximately
2,000 of our own pharmacies and 4,800 participant pharmacies operating under brand partnership arrangements. This business
provides customers with traditional prescription pharmaceuticals, non-prescription products, and medical services, as well as e-
commerce operating under the Lloyds pharmacy branding in Belgium, Ireland, and Italy. In addition, we partner with independent
pharmacies under local banner programs.
In fiscal 2022, we announced our intention to exit our businesses in Europe. We entered into an agreement to sell certain of our
businesses in the European Union (“E.U.”) located in France, Italy, Ireland, Portugal, Belgium, and Slovenia, our German
headquarters and wound-care business, part of a shared services center in Lithuania, and our ownership stake in a joint venture in
the Netherlands (“E.U. disposal group”). We also completed the sale of our Austrian business. On April 6, 2022, we completed the
sale of our retail and distribution businesses in the United Kingdom (“U.K. disposal group”). Of the owned and banner pharmacies
referenced above, all except for approximately 300 owned and 100 partner pharmacies are included within these disposal groups. In
executing our strategy to exit Europe, we continue to evaluate suitable exit alternatives for our remaining businesses in Norway and
Denmark. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for
additional information on our European divestiture activities .
McKesson Canada is one of the largest pharmaceutical wholesale and retail distributors in Canada. The wholesale business
delivers products to retail pharmacies, hospitals, long-term care centers, clinics and institutions in Canada through a national
network of distribution centers and provides logistics and distribution services for manufacturers.
7
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Beyond wholesale pharmaceutical logistics and distribution, McKesson Canada provides automation and technology solutions
to its retail and hospital customers. Additionally, McKesson Canada provides comprehensive specialty health services to Canadians,
including a national network of specialty pharmacies, personalized patient care and support programs, and INVIVA, Canada’s first
and largest accredited network of private infusion clinics. McKesson Canada also owns and operates PDCI, Canada’s leading
market access consultancy, supporting manufacturers as they introduce new products into the Canadian market.
The Canada retail business includes over 2,700 banner pharmacies under the IDA, Guardian, The Medicine Shoppe,
Remedy’sRx, Proxim, and Uniprix banners, and approximately 400 owned pharmacies under the Rexall brand where we
provide patients with greater choice and access, integrated pharmacy care and industry-leading service levels. McKesson Canada
also owns and operates Well.ca, a leading Canadian online health and wellness retailer.
Other:
Change Healthcare: Our equity ownership interest in the Change Healthcare JV, a joint venture, was accounted for using the
equity method of accounting. The Change Healthcare JV provided software and analytics, network solutions, and technology-
enabled services that deliver wide-ranging financial, operational, and clinical benefits to payers, providers and consumers. On
March 10, 2020, we completed the separation of our interest in the Change Healthcare JV through a split-off transaction. This
transaction reduced our investment in the Change Healthcare JV to zero. Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and
Divestitures,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for additional information related to this
transaction.
Restructuring, Business Combinations, Investments, and Divestitures
We have undertaken additional strategic initiatives in recent years designed to further focus on our core healthcare businesses
and enhance our competitive position. These initiatives are detailed in Financial Notes 2, 3, and 4, “Held for Sale,” “Restructuring,
Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” and “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” respectively, to the consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report.
Competition
We operate in highly competitive environments, primarily in North America and Europe. In recent years, the healthcare
industry has been subject to increasing consolidation. In the pharmaceutical distribution environment in which our U.S.
Pharmaceutical and International segments operate, we face strong competition from international, national, regional, and local
full-line, short-line, and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing chain drug stores, manufacturers engaged in
direct distribution, third-party logistics companies, and large payer organizations. We consider our largest competitors in
distribution, wholesaling, and logistics to be AmerisourceBergen Corporation and Cardinal Health, Inc. Our retail businesses,
which primarily operate in our International segment, face competition from various global, national, regional, and local retailers,
including chain and independent pharmacies.
Our RxTS business experiences substantial competition from many companies, including other biopharma services companies,
software services firms, consulting firms, shared service vendors, and internet-based companies with technology applicable to the
healthcare industry. Competition in this business varies in size from large to small companies, in geographical coverage, and in
scope and breadth of products and services offered.
Our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment provides medical-surgical supply distribution, logistics, and other services to
healthcare providers, including physician offices, surgery centers, nursing homes, hospital reference labs, home health care
agencies, and other alternative sites with competition from a wide range of national and regional medical supply and equipment
distributors throughout the U.S.
In addition, we compete with other service providers and healthcare manufacturers, as well as other potential customers of our
businesses, which may from time to time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply management capabilities that
might otherwise be provided by our businesses. We believe that our scale and diversity of product and service offerings are our
primary competitive advantages. In all areas, key competitive factors include price, quality of service, breadth of product lines,
innovation and, in some cases, convenience to the customer.® ® ®
® ® ® TM
TM
8
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights, and Licenses
McKesson and its subsidiaries hold patents, copyrights, trademarks, and trade secrets related to McKesson products and
services. We pursue patent protection for our innovations and obtain copyright protection for our original works of authorship,
when such protection is advantageous. Through these efforts, we have developed a portfolio of patents and copyrights in the U.S.
and worldwide. In addition, we have registered or applied to register certain trademarks and service marks in the U.S. and in
foreign countries.
We believe that, in the aggregate, McKesson’s confidential information, patents, copyrights, trademarks, and intellectual
property licenses are important to its operations and market position, but we do not consider any of our businesses to be dependent
upon any one patent, copyright, trademark, or trade secret, or any family or families of the same. We cannot guarantee that our
intellectual property portfolio will be sufficient to deter misappropriation, theft, or misuse of our technology, nor that we can
successfully enjoin infringers. We periodically receive notices alleging that our products or services infringe on third-party patents
and other intellectual property rights. These claims may result in McKesson entering settlement agreements, paying damages,
discontinuing use or sale of accused products, or ceasing other activities. While the outcome of any litigation or dispute is
inherently uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any of these infringement notices would have a material adverse
impact on our results of operations.
We hold inbound licenses for certain intellectual property that is used internally, and in some cases, utilized in McKesson’s
products or services. While it may be necessary in the future to seek or renew licenses relating to various aspects of our products
and services, we believe, based upon past experience and industry practice, such licenses generally can be obtained on
commercially reasonable terms. We believe our operations as well as our products and services are not materially dependent on any
single license or other agreement with any third party.
Human Capital
Our vision for a healthier world begins with our employees, who bring our mission to life every day. We deliver programs that
focus on improving employee health and wellness, creating opportunities for growth and development, and providing an inclusive
workplace where our employees can reach their full potential. At March 31, 2022, we had approximately 75,000 employees
worldwide, including 17,000 part-time employees, as well as 33,000 employees in the U.S. and 13,000 employees in Canada. We
also supplement our work force with contractors and/or consultants for certain business projects, processes, and/or operations as
demand requires, including for programs such as the COVID-19 vaccine distribution and related ancillary supply kit programs.
During 2022, we entered into an agreement to sell the E.U. disposal group which is expected to close within the second half of
fiscal year 2023 and completed the sale of our Austrian business. On April 6, 2022, we completed the sale of the U.K. disposal
group. At March 31, 2022, we had approximately 29,000 employees in Europe, including 11,000 part-time employees, the majority
of whom we expect will be transferred with the E.U. disposal group and U.K. disposal group. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for
Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for additional information on our European
divestiture activities.
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (“DEI”): We are committed to making the principles of DEI integral to everything we do
because we believe building a healthier future is everyone’s business. We build successful teams by recruiting, developing, and
retaining diverse talent and we recognize our culture of inclusion and belonging as an important element that drives long-term
shareholder value. We have 10 employee resource groups (“ERGs”) that are voluntary, employee-led, company-sponsored groups
that focus on making a difference among our U.S. employees. ERGs can help employees make authentic connections, showcase
leadership skills, and create a positive impact.
9
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
At March 31, 2022, women and people of color represented the following:
 McKesson
OverallMcKesson
Leadership 
Metric 
Women 64 % 46 %
People of Color 47 % 22 %
(1) The data for our metrics is derived from our voluntary self-identification process as of March 31, 2022  and therefore represents our best
estimate at this time. For fiscal year 2021, our metrics did not include our employees related to USON as the data was not available.
(2) Represents our leadership at the vice president level and above.
(3) Represents worldwide employees. In North America, women represent 60% of “McKesson Overall” and 48% of “McKesson Leadership.”
(4) Represents U.S. employees only because the data for Canada and Europe is not available.
(5) People of Color includes the following races and ethnicities: American Indian or Alaska Native, Asian, Black or African American, Hispanic
or Latino, Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander , or Two or More Races.
Culture and Leadership: What sets McKesson apart as an exceptional place is our people. Our employees understand that
together, unified by our global ICARE and ILEAD principles, we fulfill our mission of improving care in every setting. Our
ICARE values (Integrity, Inclusion, Customer-First, Accountability, Respect, Excellence) are foundational to all that we do, and
who we are as a company. ILEAD (Inspire, Leverage, Execute, Advance, Develop) is our common definition of and shared
commitment to leadership. By embracing this commitment, we bring out the best in ourselves and position McKesson to continue
to drive better health – for our company, our customers, and the patients they serve – for years to come. We promote leadership
behaviors through culture initiatives that offer practical tips on how to debate, decide, and commit, be open and candid, and
maintain an enterprise-first mindset when navigating conversations affecting operations within and across our business segments.
These values and behaviors help make McKesson unique.
Investment in Employees: To support employee growth and development, we provide regular feedback and training, and work
to create and maintain an inclusive environment where everyone can bring their authentic self to work and know they are
appreciated, with their perspectives heard and considered. Through training, we encourage leaders to embrace diverse perspectives
and lead inclusively. Employee development programs include training, coaching, and 360-degree assessments, which can support
the careers of future leaders and their teams. We offer financial assistance programs for higher education opportunities that support
employees’ career growth at the company. To provide compensation that is focused on attracting and retaining talent with the skills
and experience necessary for a specific role, our compensation program is built on a set of quantifiable factors defined by our
guiding principles of internal equity, market competitiveness, and pay for performance. We operate in several countries and our
benefits offerings vary accordingly. We offer health and wellness benefits to advance the physical, mental, and social well-being of
our people, savings programs to help prepare them for retirement, and flexible work arrangements, among other offerings, when
possible. We seek employee feedback through an annual employee opinion survey, which assesses our employees’ levels of
engagement, commitment, and overall satisfaction using industry benchmarks, and we then design action plans to improve those
metrics.
As broader U.S. labor markets continue to be challenging and evolving, we continue our dedication to recruiting and retaining
qualified employees across the organization. During 2022, we committed to increasing base pay and providing long-term incentive
awards for certain markets and job classes as necessary to retain top talent. We also made investments in our talent acquisition team
by adding recruiters, systems, and process improvements to strengthen our ability to attract employees and reduce the lead time to
fill open positions as well as improve our employee value proposition. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we offer medical
benefits covering COVID-19 related visits, testing (including over-the-counter tests), treatment and vaccines, telehealth options,
and emergency paid time off (“PTO”). During the first quarter of 2022, we approved changes to our real estate strategy to increase
efficiencies and support flexibility for our employees, as discussed in Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related
Charges, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report. Our North American future of work
approach is based on four pillars: best talent and co-location, flexibility, mobility, and a partial remote work model for certain
employees.(2)
(1)
(3)
(4) (5)
2
2
10
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Health and Safety: Our security and safety departments employ systems designed to continually monitor our facilities and
work environment to help identify and prevent or mitigate any potential risks. This includes having procedures in place and
investing in equipment for both physical and electronic security. We routinely assess facilities to closely monitor adherence to
established security and safety standards. If we identify a vulnerability, it is documented, and the facility prepares an action plan.
Our employees receive specialized training related to their role, work setting, and equipment used in their work environment. As
our processes evolve, we update relevant safety training modules, which may include new employee training programs. In response
to the COVID-19 pandemic, our priority has been, and continues to be, protecting the health and safety of our employees,
customers, patients, and communities while also safeguarding the healthcare supply chain. The various responses we put in place to
mitigate the impact of COVID-19 on our business operations, including telecommuting and work-from-home policies, restricted
travel, and enhanced safety measures, are intended to limit employee exposure to the virus that causes COVID-19 as they perform
their jobs while also providing employee support programs and a sense of belonging. During 2022, we implemented COVID-19
vaccination protocols designed to be consistent with federal, state, and local laws and with customer requirements for our U.S. and
Canada employees. For additional information on our response to COVID-19 in the workplace, refer to the COVID-19 section of
“Trends and Uncertainties” in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in Item
7 of Part II included in this Annual Report.
Government Regulation
McKesson, generally and in many of the highly regulated industries in which it operates, is subject to oversight by various
federal, state, and local governmental entities in the U.S. and elsewhere. The Company incurs significant expense and makes large
investments to enable it to comply with regulations and guidance promulgated by those governmental entities. A failure, or alleged
failure, by the Company to comply with statutes, regulations, or other laws could have a material adverse impact to the Company’s
business operations, reputation, results of operations, and financial and competitive position.
Controlled Substances: We are subject to the operating and security standards of the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration
(“DEA”), the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (“FDA”), HHS, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (“CMS”), various
state boards of pharmacy, state health departments, and comparable agencies in the U.S. and other countries. We maintain extensive
controlled substance monitoring and reporting programs at considerable expense in order to help us meet those standards. We have
incurred monetary penalties and licensing sanctions pursuant to these requirements and future allegations of noncompliance could
result in our inability to obtain, maintain, or renew permits, licenses, or other regulatory approvals needed for the operation of our
businesses.
Additionally, the Company is a defendant in many litigation matters alleging claims related to its distribution of controlled
substances (opioids), including claims about regulatory compliance. On February 25, 2022, the Company and two other U.S.
pharmaceutical distribution companies (collectively, "Distributors") determined that there is sufficient State and subdivision
participation to proceed with an agreement to settle a substantial majority of opioids-related lawsuits filed against the Distributors
by U.S. states, territories, and local governmental entities. The Company incurs and expects to continue to incur significant expense
in order to resolve those and other opioids-related matters. As part of that resolution, the Company will bear a portion of the
expense to establish and maintain a clearinghouse for data related to distribution of controlled substance. For more information
about those litigation matters, refer to Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial
statements in this Annual Report.
Government Contracts: Our contracts with government entities typically are subject to procurement laws that include socio-
economic, employment practices, environmental protection, recordkeeping and accounting, and other requirements. These statutory
and regulatory requirements complicate our business and increase our compliance burden. We are subject to audits, investigations
and oversight proceedings about our compliance with contractual and legal requirements. If we fail to comply with these
requirements, or we fail an audit, we may be subject to sanctions such as monetary damages, criminal and civil penalties,
termination of contracts and suspension or debarment from government contract work.
11
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Federal, state and local governmental entities in the U.S. and elsewhere continue to strengthen their position and scrutiny of
practices that may indicate fraud, waste, and abuse affecting government healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid. Our
relationships with pharmaceutical and medical surgical product manufacturers, healthcare providers, and other companies and
individuals, as well as our provision of products and services to government entities, subject our business to statutes, regulations,
and government guidance that are intended to prevent fraud and abuse. Many of these laws are vague or indefinite and have not
been interpreted by the courts and, as such, may be interpreted or applied by a prosecutorial, regulatory, or judicial authority in a
manner that could require us to make changes in our operations at added expense. Failure to comply with these laws, including the
federal Anti-Kickback Statute, could subject us to federal or state government investigations or qui tam actions, and to liability for
damages and civil and criminal penalties, including the loss of licenses or our ability to participate in Medicare, Medicaid and other
federal and state healthcare programs, or pursue government contracts.
Healthcare Regulation: In the U.S., the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (“ACA”) significantly expanded health
insurance coverage to uninsured Americans and changed the way healthcare is financed by both governmental and private payers.
There are also further efforts to broaden healthcare coverage. U.S. lawmakers also have explored proposals to reduce drug prices,
including requiring greater price transparency, authorizing the federal government to negotiate prices for some drugs covered under
the Medicare program, and drug importation measures. Provincial governments in Canada that provide partial funding for the
purchase of pharmaceuticals and independently regulate the sale and reimbursement of drugs have sought to reduce the costs of
publicly funded health programs. For example, provincial governments have taken steps to reduce consumer prices for generic
pharmaceuticals and, in some provinces, change professional allowances paid to pharmacists by generic manufacturers. Many
European governments provide or subsidize healthcare to consumers and patients by regulating pharmaceutical prices, patient
eligibility, or reimbursement levels to control government healthcare system costs. European governments are continuously
reviewing measures to support the reduction of public healthcare spending. Such measures can exert pressure on pricing
frameworks and reimbursement timelines for pharmaceuticals, which in turn may impact customer behavior. There is substantial
uncertainty about the likelihood and timing of any healthcare policy reform as each E.U. country operates in a separate healthcare
environment.
In December 2020, the CMS issued a final rule pertaining to “Best Price” reporting requirements under the Medicaid Drug
Rebate Program. Among other things, that rule may impact drug pricing and solutions to help patients afford their medications.
This rule is subject to ongoing litigation. Unless the legal challenge to the rule is successful, the rule will likely become effective on
January 1, 2023. There is substantial uncertainly about the likelihood, timing, and ultimate resolutions of these lawsuits.
Additionally, there have been increasing efforts by governments to regulate the pharmaceutical drug supply chain in order to
prevent the introduction of counterfeit, stolen, contaminated, or otherwise harmful drugs into the pharmaceutical distribution
system, otherwise known as pedigree tracking. For example, the U.S. Drug Quality and Security Act of 2013 (“DQSA”) requires us
to participate in a federal prescription drug track and trace system that preempts state drug pedigree requirements, and the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration Amendments Act of 2007 requires the FDA to establish standards and identify and validate effective
technologies, such as track and trace or authentication technologies, to secure the pharmaceutical supply chain against counterfeit
drugs. We also have record-keeping and other obligations under the E.U. Falsified Medicines Directive. Pedigree tracking laws
such as these increase our compliance burden and our pharmaceutical distribution costs.
12
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Data Security and Privacy: We are subject to a variety of privacy and data protection laws that change frequently and have
requirements that vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction. For example, under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996 (“HIPAA”) we must maintain administrative, physical, and technological safeguards to protect individually identifiable
health information (“protected health information”) and ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of electronic protected
health information. We are subject to significant compliance obligations under privacy laws such as the General Data Protection
Regulation (“GDPR”) in the European Union, the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”) in
Canada, and an expanding list of comprehensive state privacy laws in the United States, including the California Consumer
Protection Act (“CCPA”). Some privacy laws prohibit the transfer of personal information to certain other jurisdictions or otherwise
limit our use of data. Many of these laws also require us to provide access or other data rights (modification, deletion, portability,
etc.) to consumers’ and patients’ individual personal data records within specified periods of time. Laws such as the federal Cyber
Incident Reporting for Critical Infrastructure Act of 2022 may require us to provide notifications of significant data privacy
breaches or cybersecurity incidents before our investigations are complete. We are subject to privacy and data protection
compliance audits or investigations by various government agencies. Failure to comply with these laws subjects us to potential
regulatory enforcement activity, fines, private litigation including class actions, reputational impacts, and other costs. We also have
contractual obligations that might be breached if we fail to comply with privacy and data security laws. Our efforts to comply with
privacy and data security laws complicate our operations and add to our costs.
Environmental Regulation: We are subject to many environmental and hazardous materials regulations, including those
relating to radiation-emitting equipment operated at U.S. Oncology Network practices. Additionally, our operations are subject to
regulations under various federal, state, local and foreign laws concerning the environment, including laws addressing the discharge
of pollutants into the air and water, the management and disposal of hazardous substances and wastes, and the cleanup of
contaminated sites, as discussed in more detail below. We could incur substantial costs, including cleanup costs, fines and civil or
criminal sanctions, and third-party damage or personal injury claims, if in the future we were to violate or become liable under
environmental laws. We are committed to maintaining compliance with all environmental laws applicable to our operations,
products, and services and to reducing our environmental impact across all aspects of our business. We meet this commitment
through an environmental strategy and sustainability program.
We sold our chemical distribution operations in 1987 and retained responsibility for certain environmental obligations.
Agreements with the Environmental Protection Agency and certain states may require environmental assessments and cleanups at
several closed sites. These matters are described further in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report.
The liability for environmental remediation and other environmental costs is accrued when the Company considers it probable
and can reasonably estimate the costs. Environmental costs and accruals, including that related to our legacy chemical distribution
operations, are not material to our operations or financial position. Other than the expected expenditures that may be required in
connection with our legacy chemical distribution operations, we do not anticipate making substantial capital expenditures either for
environmental issues or to comply with environmental laws, regulations, or government guidance in the future.
Climate Change Regulation: Governments in the U.S. and abroad are considering new or expanded laws to address climate
change. Such laws may include limitations on greenhouse gas (“GHG”) emissions, mandates that companies implement processes
to monitor and disclose climate-related matters, additional taxes or offset charges on specified energy sources, and other
requirements. Compliance with climate-related laws may be further complicated by disparate regulatory approaches in various
jurisdictions. New or expanded climate-related laws could impose costs on us, including capital expenditures to develop data
gathering and reporting systems. Until the timing and extent of climate-related laws are clarified, we cannot predict their potential
effect on our capital expenditures or our results of operations.
13
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Other Information about the Business
Customers: During 2022, sales to our ten largest customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”) accounted for
approximately 52% of our total consolidated revenues. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted
for approximately 21% of our total consolidated revenues in 2022. In May 2019, we extended our pharmaceutical distribution
relationship with CVS to June 2023. Our ten largest customers comprised approximately 43%, and CVS was approximately 28%,
of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2022. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing
agent on behalf of member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies.
The accounts receivable balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit
risk exists. Substantially all of these revenues and accounts receivable are included in our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment.
Suppliers: We obtain pharmaceutical and other products from manufacturers, none of which accounted for more than our
largest supplier at 9% of our purchases in 2022. The loss of a supplier could adversely affect our business if alternate sources of
supply are unavailable. We believe that our relationships with our suppliers are generally sound. The ten largest suppliers in 2022
accounted for approximately 55% of our purchases.
Some of our distribution arrangements with manufacturers provide us compensation based on a percentage of our purchases. In
addition, we have certain distribution arrangements with pharmaceutical manufacturers that include an inflation-based
compensation component whereby we benefit when the manufacturers increase their prices as we sell our existing inventory at the
new higher prices. For these manufacturers, a reduction in the frequency and magnitude of price increases, as well as restrictions in
the amount of inventory available to us, could have an adverse impact on our gross profit margin.
Research and Development: Research and development expenses were $70 million, $74 million, and $96 million during 2022,
2021, and 2020, respectively.
Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Operations: Certain financial information relating to foreign and domestic
operations is discussed in Financial Note 21, “Segments of Business,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this
Annual Report as well as in “Foreign Operations” in Item 7 of Part II of this Annual Report. See “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I
below for information regarding risks associated with our foreign operations.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Annual Report, including “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in
Item 7 of Part II of this report and the “Risk Factors” in Item 1A of Part I of this report, contains forward-looking statements within
the meaning of section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 (“Securities Act”) and section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended. Some of these statements can be identified by use of forward-looking words such as “believes,” “expects,”
“anticipates,” “may,” “will,” “should,” “seeks,” “approximately,” “intends,” “plans,” or “estimates,” or the negative of these words,
or other comparable terminology. The discussion of financial trends, strategy, plans, or intentions may also include forward-looking
statements. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from
those projected, anticipated, or implied. Although it is not possible to predict or identify all such risks and uncertainties, they
include, but are not limited to, the factors discussed in Item 1A of Part I of this report under “Risk Factors” and in our publicly
available SEC filings and press releases. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on forward-looking statements, which
speak only as of the date such statements were first made. Except to the extent required by federal securities laws, we undertake no
obligation to publicly release the result of any revisions to any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after
the date the statements are made, or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.
Item 1A.    Risk Factors
The discussion below identifies certain representative risks that might cause our actual business results to materially differ
from our estimates. It is not practical to identify or describe all risks and uncertainties that might materially impact our business
operations, reputation, financial position, or results of operations. Our business could be materially affected by risks that we have
not yet identified or that we currently consider to be immaterial. This is not a complete statement of all potential risks and
uncertainties.
14
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Litigation and Regulatory Risks
We experience costly and disruptive legal disputes.
We are routinely named as a defendant in litigation or regulatory proceedings and other legal disputes, which may include
asserted class action litigation, such as those described in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the
consolidated financial statements in this Annual Report. Regulatory proceedings involve allegations such as false claims, healthcare
fraud and abuse, and antitrust violations. Civil litigation proceedings involve commercial, employment, environmental, intellectual
property, tort, and other claims. Despite valid defenses that we assert, legal disputes are often costly, time-consuming, distracting to
management and disruptive to normal business operations. The uncertainty and expense associated with unresolved legal disputes
might harm our business and reputation even if the matter ultimately is favorably resolved. The outcome of legal disputes is
difficult to predict. Outcomes can occur that are not justified by the evidence or existing law. Outcomes include monetary damages,
penalties and fines, and injunctive or other relief that requires us to change our business operations and incur significant expense.
Accordingly, legal disputes might have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, our business operations, and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might experience losses not covered by insurance or indemnification.
Our business exposes us to risks that are inherent in the distribution, manufacturing, dispensing and administration of
pharmaceuticals and medical-surgical supplies, the provision of ancillary services, the conduct of our payer businesses and the
provision of products that assist clinical decision-making and relate to patient medical histories and treatment plans. For example,
pharmacy operations are exposed to risks such as improper filling of prescriptions, mislabeling of prescriptions, inadequacy of
warnings, unintentional distribution of counterfeit drugs, and expiration of drugs. Although we seek to maintain adequate insurance
coverage, such as property insurance for inventory and professional and general liability insurance, coverages on acceptable terms
might be unavailable, or coverages might not cover our losses. We generally seek to limit our contractual exposure, but limitations
of liability or indemnity provisions in our contracts may not be enforceable or adequately protect us from liability. Uninsured losses
might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We experience costly legal disputes, government actions, and adverse publicity regarding our role in distributing controlled
substances such as opioids.
The Company is a defendant in many litigation matters alleging claims related to the distribution of controlled substances
(opioids), as described in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements in
this Annual Report. We regularly are named as a defendant in similar, new cases. The plaintiffs in those cases include governmental
entities (such as states, provinces, counties, and municipalities) as well as businesses, groups and individuals. The cases allege
violations of controlled substance laws and other laws, and they make common law claims such as negligence and public nuisance.
Many of these cases raise novel theories of liability. Any proceedings can have unexpected outcomes that are not justified by
evidence or existing law. Legal proceedings such as these often involve significant expense, management time and distraction, and
risk of loss that can be difficult to predict or quantify. It is not uncommon for claims to be resolved over many years. Outcomes
include monetary damages, penalties and fines, and injunctive or other relief that requires us to change our business operations and
incur significant expense. Although the Company has valid defenses and is vigorously defending itself, some proceedings have
been and others may be resolved by negotiated outcome. Not all proceedings, however, are resolved by settlement. Our reputation
has been and may continue to be impacted by publicity regarding the litigation and related allegations. The adverse outcome of
legal proceedings might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
We might experience increased costs to distribute controlled substances such as opioids.
Legislative, regulatory, or industry measures related to the distribution of controlled substances such as prescription opioids
could affect our business in ways that we may not be able to predict. For example, some states have passed legislation that could
require us to pay taxes or assessments on the distribution of opioid medications in those states and other states have considered
similar legislation. Liabilities for taxes or assessments or other costs of compliance under any such laws might have a materially
adverse impact on our reputation, business operations, and our financial position or results of operations.
15
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We are subject to extensive, complex and challenging healthcare and other laws.
Our industry is highly regulated, and further regulation of our distribution businesses and technology products and services
could impose increased costs, negatively impact our profit margins and the profit margins of our customers, delay the introduction
or implementation of our new products, or otherwise negatively impact our business and expose the Company to litigation and
regulatory investigations. For example, we are subject to many environmental and hazardous materials regulations, including those
relating to radiation-emitting equipment operated at U.S. Oncology Network practices. Additionally, we are subject to various
routine agency and ad hoc inspections by government agencies to determine compliance with various statutes and regulations. Any
noncompliance by us with applicable laws or the failure to maintain, renew or obtain necessary permits and licenses could lead to
enforcement actions or litigation and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position
or results of operations.
We are subject to extensive and frequently changing laws relating to healthcare fraud, waste and abuse.
    Federal, state, and local governmental entities in the U.S. and elsewhere continue to strengthen their position and scrutiny over
practices that may indicate fraud, waste and abuse affecting government healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid. Our
relationships with companies and individuals including pharmaceutical and medical surgical product manufacturers and healthcare
providers, as well as our provision of products and services to government entities, subject our business to statutes, regulations, or
government guidance that are intended to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse. Among other things, those laws: (1) prohibit persons
from soliciting, offering, receiving, or paying any remuneration in order to induce the referral of a patient for treatment or to induce
the ordering or purchasing of items or services that are in any way paid for by Medicare, Medicaid, or other government-sponsored
healthcare programs; (2) impose many restrictions upon referring physicians and providers of designated health services under
Medicare and Medicaid programs; and (3) prohibit the knowing submission of a false or fraudulent claim for payment to, and
knowing retention of an overpayment by, a federal healthcare program such as Medicare and Medicaid. Many of these laws,
including those relating to marketing incentives, are vague or indefinite and have not been interpreted by the courts, regulators, or
enforcing agencies. Those laws may be interpreted or applied in a manner that could require us to make changes in our operations
at added expense. Failures to comply with those laws exposes us to federal or state government investigations or qui tam actions,
and to liability for damages and civil and criminal penalties. Such failures might result in the loss of licenses or our ability to
participate in Medicare, Medicaid or other federal and state healthcare programs. These sanctions might have a materially adverse
impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might lose our ability to purchase, compound, store or distribute pharmaceuticals and controlled substances.
We are subject to the operating and security standards of the DEA, the FDA, various state boards of pharmacy, state health
departments, the CMS, and other comparable agencies. Certain of our businesses may be required to register for permits and/or
licenses with, and comply with operating and security standards of, the DEA, FDA, CMS, various state boards of pharmacy, state
health departments and/or comparable state agencies as well as foreign agencies and certain accrediting bodies, depending upon the
type of operations and location of product development, manufacture, distribution, and sale. For example, we are required to hold
valid DEA and state-level registrations and licenses, meet various security and operating standards, and comply with the Controlled
Substances Act and its accompanying regulations governing the sale, marketing, packaging, holding, distribution, and disposal of
controlled substances. Noncompliance with these requirements results in monetary penalties and/or licensing sanctions. If we are
not able to obtain, maintain, or renew permits, licenses, or other regulatory approvals needed for the operation of our businesses, it
might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
16
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Privacy and data protection laws increase our compliance burden.
We are subject to a variety of privacy and data protection laws that change frequently and have requirements that vary from
jurisdiction to jurisdiction. For example, under HIPAA we must maintain administrative, physical, and technological safeguards for
protected health information and ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of electronic protected health information. We
are subject to significant compliance obligations under privacy laws such as the GDPR in the E.U., the PIPEDA in Canada, and an
expanding list of comprehensive state privacy laws in the United States, including the CCPA in California. Some privacy laws
prohibit the transfer of personal information to certain other jurisdictions or otherwise limit our use of data. Many of these laws also
require us to provide access or other data rights (modification, deletion, portability, etc.) to consumers’ and patients’ individual
personal data records within specified periods of time. Laws such as the federal Cyber Incident Reporting for Critical Infrastructure
Act of 2022 may require us to provide notifications of significant data privacy breaches or cybersecurity incidents before our
investigations are complete. We are subject to privacy and data protection compliance audits or investigations by various
government agencies. Failure to comply with these laws subjects us to potential regulatory enforcement activity, fines, private
litigation including class actions, reputational impacts, and other costs. We also have contractual obligations that might be breached
if we fail to comply with privacy and data security laws. Our efforts to comply with privacy laws complicates our operations and
adds to our costs. A significant privacy breach or failure to comply with privacy and data security laws might have a materially
adverse impact on our reputation, business operations, and our financial position or results of operations.
Anti-bribery and anti-corruption laws increase our compliance burden.
We are subject to laws prohibiting improper payments and bribery, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U.K.
Bribery Act and similar regulations in other jurisdictions. The U.K. Bribery Act, for example, prohibits both domestic and
international bribery, as well as bribery across both private and public sectors. An organization that fails to prevent bribery
committed by anyone associated with the organization can be charged under the U.K. Bribery Act unless the organization can
establish the defense of having implemented adequate procedures to prevent bribery. Our failure to comply with these laws might
subject us to civil and criminal penalties that might have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
Company and Operational Risks
We might record significant charges from impairment to goodwill, intangibles and other assets or investments.
We are required under U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (“GAAP”) to test our goodwill for impairment annually
or more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist. Indicators that are considered include significant changes in
performance relative to expected operating results, significant changes in the use of the assets, significant negative industry or
economic trends, or a significant decline in the Company’s stock price and/or market capitalization for a sustained period of time.
In addition, we periodically review our intangible and other long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances, such as a divestiture, indicate the carrying value may not be recoverable. Factors that may be considered a change in
circumstances indicating that the carrying value of our intangible and other long-lived assets may not be recoverable include slower
growth rates, the loss of a significant customer, burdensome new laws or divestiture of a business or asset for less than its carrying
value. There are inherent uncertainties in management’s estimates, judgments and assumptions used in assessing recoverability of
goodwill, intangible, and other long-lived assets. Any material changes in key assumptions, including failure to meet business
plans, negative changes in government reimbursement rates, a deterioration in the U.S. and global financial markets, an increase in
interest rate or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the industry or other unanticipated events
and circumstances, may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and could potentially result in an
impairment charge. For example, the COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted the global economy and exacerbated uncertainties
inherent in estimates, judgments and assumptions used in our forecasts and impairment assessments. We may be required to record
a significant charge to earnings in our consolidated financial statements during the period in which any impairment of our goodwill
or intangible and other long-lived assets is determined, which might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations
and our financial position or results of operations.
17
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We experience cybersecurity incidents that might significantly compromise our technology systems or might result in material
data breaches.
We, our external service providers, and other third parties with which we do business use technology and systems to perform
our business operations, such as the secure electronic transmission, processing, storage and hosting of sensitive information,
including protected health information and other types of personal information, confidential financial information, proprietary
information, and other sensitive information relating to our customers, company and workforce. Despite physical, technical, and
administrative security measures, technology systems and operations of the Company and third parties with which we do business
are subject to cyberattacks and cybersecurity incidents. Cybersecurity incidents include unauthorized occurrences on or conducted
through our information systems, such as tampering, malware insertion, ransomware attacks, or other system integrity events. The
risk of cyberattacks increases from time to time due to a variety of internal and external factors, including during political conflicts
or unrest. A cybersecurity incident might involve a material data breach or other material impact to the confidentiality, integrity,
availability, and operations of our technology systems or data, which might result in injury to patients or consumers, litigation or
regulatory action, disruption of our business operations, loss of customers or revenue, and increased expense, any of which might
have a materially adverse impact on our business, reputation, and our financial position or results of operations.
We might experience significant problems with information systems or networks.
We rely on sophisticated information systems and networks to perform our business operations, such as to obtain, rapidly
process, analyze, and manage data that facilitate the purchase and distribution of thousands of inventory items from distribution
centers. We provide remote services that involve hosting customer data and operating software on our own or third-party systems.
Our customers rely on their ability to access and use these the systems and their data as needed. The networks and hosting systems
are vulnerable to interruption or damage from sources beyond our control, such as power loss, telecommunications failures, fire,
natural disasters, software and hardware failures and cybersecurity incidents. If those information systems or networks suffer
errors, interruptions, or become unavailable, or if the timely delivery of medical care or other customer business requirements are
impaired by data access, network, or systems problems, we might experience injury to patients or consumers, litigation or
regulatory action, disruption of our business operations, loss of customers or revenue, and increased expense. Any such problems
might have a materially adverse impact on our business, reputation, and our financial position or results of operations.
Our products or services might not conform to specifications or perform as we intend.
We sell and provide services involving complex software and technology that may contain errors, especially when first
introduced to market. Healthcare professionals delivering patient care tend to have heightened sensitivity to system and software
errors. If our software and technology services are alleged to have contributed to faulty clinical decisions or injury to patients, we
might be subject to claims or litigation by users of our software or services or their patients. Errors or failures might damage our
reputation and negatively affect future sales. A failure of a system or software to conform to specifications might constitute a
breach of warranty that could result in repair costs, contract termination, refunds of amounts previously paid, or claims for
damages. Any of these types of errors or failures might have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, business operations, and
our financial position or results of operations.
We might not realize expected benefits from business process initiatives.
We may implement restructuring, cost reduction or other business process initiatives that might result in extraordinary charges
and expenses, failures to achieve our desired objectives, or unintended consequences such as distraction of our management and
employees, business disruption, attrition beyond any planned reduction in workforce, inability to attract or retain key personnel and
reduced employee productivity. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
18
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be unable to successfully complete or integrate acquisitions or other business combinations.
Our growth strategy includes consummating acquisitions or other business combinations that either expand or complement our
business. To fund acquisitions, we may require financing that may not be available on acceptable terms. We may not receive
regulatory approvals needed to complete proposed transactions, or such approvals may be subject to delays or conditions that
reduce transaction benefits. Achieving the desired outcomes of business combinations involves significant risks including: diverting
management’s attention from other business operations; challenges with assimilating the acquired businesses, such as integration of
operations and systems; failure or delay in realizing operating synergies; difficulty retaining key acquired company personnel;
unanticipated accounting or financial systems issues with the acquired business, which might affect our internal controls over
financial reporting; unanticipated compliance issues in the acquired business; challenges retaining customers of the acquired
business; unanticipated expenses or charges to earnings, including depreciation and amortization or potential impairment charges;
and risks of known and unknown assumed liabilities in the acquired business. Any of these risks could adversely affect our ability
to achieve the anticipated benefits of an acquisition and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
Exclusive forum provisions in our Bylaws could limit our stockholders’ ability to choose their preferred judicial forum for
disputes with us or our directors, officers or employees.
Our amended and restated bylaws provide that, unless the Corporation consents in writing to the selection of an alternative
forum, the sole and exclusive forum for specified legal actions is the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware or the United
States District Court for the District of Delaware if the Court of Chancery does not have or declines to accept jurisdiction
(collectively, “Delaware Courts”). Current and former stockholders are deemed to have consented to the personal jurisdiction of the
Delaware Courts in connection with any action to enforce that exclusive forum provision and to service of process in any such
action. These provisions of the bylaws are not a waiver of, and do not relieve anyone of duties to comply with, federal securities
laws including those specifying the exclusive jurisdiction of federal courts under the Exchange Act and concurrent jurisdiction of
federal and state courts under the Securities Act. To the extent that these provisions of the bylaws limit a current or former
stockholder’s ability to select a judicial forum other than the Delaware Courts, they might discourage the specified legal actions,
might cause current or former stockholders to incur additional litigation-related expenses and might result in outcomes unfavorable
to current or former stockholders. A court might determine that these provisions of the bylaws are inapplicable or unenforceable in
any particular action, in which case we may incur additional litigation related expenses in such action, and the action may result in
outcomes unfavorable to us, which could have a materially adverse impact on our reputation, our business operations, and our
financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by delays or other difficulties with divestitures.
In July 2021, we announced our intention to exit our businesses in Europe. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for information on our European divestiture
activities. When we decide to sell assets or a business, we may encounter difficulty in finding buyers or exit strategies on
acceptable terms or in a timely manner, which could delay the achievement of our strategic objectives. After the disposition, we
might experience greater dissynergies than expected, and the impact of the divestiture on our revenue or profit might be larger than
we expected. We might have difficulties with pre-closing conditions such as regulatory and governmental approvals, which could
delay or prevent the divestiture. We might have financial exposure in a divested business, such as through minority equity
ownership, financial or performance guarantees, indemnities or other obligations, such that conditions outside of our control might
negate the expected benefits of the disposition. Any of these risks could adversely affect our ability to achieve the anticipated
benefits of a divestiture and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results
of operations.
19
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might not realize the expected tax treatment from our split-off of Change Healthcare.
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed a separation of its interest in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change Healthcare JV”).
The divestiture was effected through the split-off of PF2 SpinCo, Inc. (“SpinCo”), a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company that
held all of the Company’s interest in the Change Healthcare JV, to certain of the Company’s stockholders through an exchange offer
(the “Exchange Offer”), followed by a merger of SpinCo with and into Change Healthcare Inc. (“Change”), with Change surviving
the merger (the “Merger” and, together with the Exchange Offer, the “Transactions”). The Company received an opinion from
outside legal counsel to the effect that the Transactions qualified as generally tax-free transactions to the Company and its
shareholders for U.S. federal income tax purposes. An opinion of legal counsel is not binding on the Internal Revenue Service (the
“IRS”) or the courts, and the IRS or the courts may not agree with the intended tax-free treatment of the Transactions. In addition,
the opinion could not be relied upon if certain assumptions, representations, and undertakings upon which the opinion was based
are materially inaccurate or incomplete, or are violated in any material respect. If the intended tax-free treatment of the
Transactions is not sustained, the Company and its stockholders who participated in the Transactions may be required to pay
substantial U.S. federal income taxes. In connection with the Transactions, the Company, SpinCo, Change, and the Change
Healthcare JV entered into the Tax Matters Agreement, which governs their respective rights, responsibilities, and obligations with
respect to tax liabilities and benefits, tax attributes, tax contests, and other tax sharing regarding U.S. federal, state, and local, and
non-U.S. taxes, other tax matters, and related tax returns. Under the Tax Matters Agreement, Change is required to indemnify the
Company if the Transactions become taxable as a result of certain actions by Change or SpinCo, or as a result of certain changes in
ownership of the stock of Change after the Merger. If Change does not honor its obligations to indemnify the Company, or if the
Transactions fail to qualify for the intended tax-free treatment for reasons not related to a disqualifying action by Change or
SpinCo, the resulting tax to the Company could have a significant adverse effect on our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by outsourcing or similar third-party relationships.
We rely on third parties to perform certain business and administrative functions for us. We might not adequately develop,
implement and monitor these outsourced service providers, and we might not realize expected cost savings or other benefits. Third-
party services providers might fail to perform as anticipated, or we might experience unanticipated operational difficulties,
compliance requirements or increased costs related to outsourced services. For example, our ability to use outsourcing resources in
certain jurisdictions might be limited by legislative action or customer contracts, with the result that the work must be performed at
greater expense or we may be subject to sanctions for non-compliance. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact
on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We may be unsuccessful in achieving our strategic growth objectives.
Our business strategy to become a diversified healthcare services company includes investing to build an integrated oncology
service business and expand our biopharma services business. Our ability to grow those businesses will depend on our: hiring and
retaining talented individuals with necessary knowledge and skills; acquiring, developing, and implementing new technologies and
capabilities; forming and expanding business relationships; and successfully competing against providers of similar services. Some
competitors have more experience than we do in enabling technologies such as data analytics. We may not achieve our desired
return on our investments through our growth strategies. If we fail to achieve acceptable sales and profitability in our strategic
growth areas, it might have a materially adverse impact on our business prospects and our financial position or results of
operations.
Our business strategy included expanding our retail pharmacy operations. Our retail pharmacy operations involve numerous
risks, such as the following ones. We might encounter difficulties attracting and retaining customers to our retail locations due to
their unfamiliarity with our brands or our inexperience with local market preferences. Competition from our retail pharmacy
operations might strain relationships with our retail pharmacy customers. Consolidation of retail pharmacies with third-party
payers, expansion of large retail pharmacy networks, reductions in reimbursement rates, shifts in the mix of branded and generic
pharmaceutical sales, and exclusion from preferred pharmacy networks can impair our retail pharmacy sales and profitability.
Failure to maintain profitable retail pharmacy operations may result in significant costs, including those associated with site
closures and reductions in workforce. We incur long-lived asset impairments related to our retail pharmacy networks. If our retail
pharmacy operations fail to achieve, or are unable to sustain, acceptable net sales and profitability levels, it might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
20
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be harmed by large customer purchase reductions, payment defaults or contract non-renewal.
We derive a significant portion of our revenue from, and have a significant portion of our accounts receivable with, a small
number of customers. At March 31, 2022, sales to our largest customer represented approximately 21% of our consolidated
revenues and approximately 28% of our trade receivables, and those of our ten largest customers combined accounted for
approximately 52% of our consolidated revenues and approximately 43% of our trade receivables. A material default in payment,
reduction in purchases, or the loss of business from a large customer might have a materially adverse impact on our business
operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Our contracts with government entities involve future funding and compliance risks.
Our contracts with government entities are subject to risks such as lack of funding and compliance with unique requirements.
For example, government contract purchase obligations are typically subject to the availability of funding, which may be
eliminated or reduced. In addition, the future volume of products or services purchased by a government customer is often
uncertain. Our government contracts might not be renewed or might be terminated for convenience with little prior notice.
Government contracts typically expose us to higher potential liability than do other types of contracts. In addition, government
contracts typically are subject to procurement laws that include socio-economic, employment practices, environmental protection,
recordkeeping and accounting and other requirements. For example, our contracts with the U.S. government generally require us to
comply with the Federal Acquisition Regulations, Procurement Integrity Act, Buy American Act, Trade Agreements Act, and other
laws and regulations. We are subject to government audits, investigations and oversight proceedings. Government agencies
routinely review and audit government contractors to determine whether they are complying with contractual and legal
requirements. If we fail to comply with these requirements, or we fail an audit, we may be subject to various sanctions such as
monetary damages, criminal and civil penalties, termination of contracts and suspension or debarment from government contract
work. These requirements complicate our business and increase our compliance burden. The occurrence of any of these risks could
harm our reputation and might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
Our participation in vaccination distribution programs may materially affect our operating results, reputation, and business.
We participate as a distributor in government-sponsored vaccination programs, such as the U.S. government’s COVID-19
distribution program (“Federal COVID-19 Response”). We also provide supplies used for vaccine administration in the Federal
COVID-19 Response. Our participation in such programs exposes us to various uncertainties. For example, the novel nature and
rapid mutation of the SARS-CoV‑2 virus, the changing distribution scope of COVID-19 vaccines, supply chain stability, inflation,
and the effectiveness of other COVID-19 transmission mitigation measures introduce uncertainty about what volumes of vaccines
and related supplies may be distributed by us, the safety and efficacy of newly developed vaccines, and the cost of distribution.
Because of such uncertainties, our operating results may be subject to variability. Our participation in such programs also exposes
us to various risks, including regulatory compliance, government oversight, dependence on government funding, contractual
performance, litigation, security risks, and supply chain challenges. Any significant problems with our participation in such
programs might have a materially adverse impact on our reputation and our business. Because of these risks and uncertainties our
operating results may be materially higher or lower than our projections.
21
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be harmed by changes in our relationships or contracts with suppliers.
We attempt to structure our pharmaceutical distribution agreements with manufacturers to ensure that we are appropriately and
predictably compensated for the services we provide. Certain distribution agreements with manufacturers include pharmaceutical
price inflation as a component of our compensation, and we cannot control the frequency or magnitude of pharmaceutical price
changes. We might be unable to renew pharmaceutical distribution agreements with manufacturers in a timely and favorable
manner. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results
of operations.
We might infringe intellectual property rights or our intellectual property protections might be inadequate.
We believe that our products and services do not infringe the proprietary rights of third parties, but third parties have asserted
infringement claims against us and may do so in the future. If a court were to hold that we infringed other’s rights, we might be
required to pay substantial damages, develop non-infringing products or services, obtain a license, stop selling or using the
infringing products or services, or incur other sanctions. We rely on trade secret, patent, copyright, and trademark laws,
nondisclosure obligations, and other contractual provisions and technical measures to protect our proprietary rights in our products
and solutions. We might initiate costly and time-consuming litigation to protect our trade secrets, to enforce our patent, copyright
and trademark rights and to determine the scope and validity of the proprietary rights of others. Our intellectual property protection
efforts might be inadequate to protect our rights. Our competitors might develop non-infringing products or services equivalent or
superior to ours. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or
results of operations.
Our use of third-party data is subject to limitations that could impede the growth of our data services business.
We attempt to structure our diligence processes to satisfy contractual and other operative data usage rights and limitations
associated with customer, partner, and other third-party data flowing through our businesses. These rights and limitations can apply
to both confidential commercial data and personal data provided to us by these customers, partners, and other third parties. Failure
to satisfy these data usage rights and limitations can lead to contractual breach and other legal claims or reputational impacts. If a
court were to hold that we violated these contractual rights, we might be required to pay substantial damages; we may need to stop
using, sharing, and/or selling certain products and services; or we could incur other financial, legal, and/or reputational
consequences. In addition, in order to reach our data strategy growth objectives, we might be unable to obtain at an acceptable cost
the data usage rights needed to advance such goals. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business
operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be unable to successfully recruit and retain qualified employees.
Our ability to attract, engage, develop, and retain qualified and experienced employees, including key executives and other
talent, is essential for us to meet our objectives. We compete with many other businesses to attract and retain employees.
Competition among potential employers results in increased salaries, benefits, or other employee-related costs, or in our failure to
recruit and retain employees. We may experience sudden loss of key personnel due to a variety of causes, such as illness, and must
adequately plan for succession of key management roles. Employees might not successfully transition into new roles. Any of these
risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Industry and Economic Risks
We might be adversely impacted by healthcare reform such as changes in pricing and reimbursement models.
Many of our products and services are designed and intended to function within the structure of current healthcare financing
and reimbursement systems. The healthcare industry and related government programs are changing. Some of these changes
increase our risks and create uncertainties for our business.
For example, some changes in reimbursement methodologies (including government rates) for pharmaceuticals, medical
treatments, and related services reduce profit margins for us and our customers and impose new legal requirements on healthcare
providers. Those changes have included cuts in Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement levels, changes in the basis for payments,
shifting away from fee-for-service and towards value-based payments and risk-sharing models, and increases in the use of managed
care.
22
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
In the U.S., the ACA significantly expanded health insurance coverage to uninsured Americans and changed the way
healthcare is financed by both governmental and private payers. There have been continued efforts to challenge the ACA. There are
also efforts to broaden healthcare coverage. U.S. lawmakers also have explored proposals to reduce drug prices, including requiring
greater price transparency, enabling Medicare to directly negotiate drug prices, and drug importation measures. These proposals
might result in significant changes in the pharmaceutical value chain as manufacturers, pharmacy benefit managers, managed care
organizations, and other industry stakeholders look to implement new transactional flows and adapt their business models.
Private challenges to government healthcare policy may also have significant impacts on our business. For example, over a
dozen pharmaceutical manufacturers have unilaterally restricted sales under the 340B drug pricing program to contract pharmacies.
The 340B drug pricing program requires manufacturers to offer discounts on certain drugs purchased by “covered entities,” which
include safety-net providers. The HRSA has taken the position that a covered entity may dispense such discounted drugs through
multiple contract pharmacies. Starting in 2020, some manufacturers began to restrict such practices. A number of manufacturers
and the HHS continue to litigate these issues. So far, lower courts have rendered somewhat conflicting opinions.
Provincial governments in Canada that provide partial funding for the purchase of pharmaceuticals and independently regulate
the sale and reimbursement of drugs have sought to reduce the costs of publicly funded health programs. For example, provincial
governments have taken steps to reduce consumer prices for generic pharmaceuticals and, in some provinces, change professional
allowances paid to pharmacists by generic manufacturers.
Many European governments provide or subsidize healthcare to consumers and patients by regulating pharmaceutical prices,
patient eligibility, or reimbursement levels to control government healthcare system costs. European governments are continuously
reviewing measures to support the reduction of public healthcare spending. Such measures can exert pressure on pricing
frameworks and reimbursement timelines for pharmaceuticals, which in turn may impact customer behavior. There is substantial
uncertainty about the likelihood and timing of any healthcare policy reform as each E.U. country operates in a separate healthcare
environment.
Although there is substantial uncertainty about the likelihood, timing, and results of these health reform efforts, their
implementation might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of
operations.
We might be adversely impacted by competition and industry consolidation.
Our businesses face a highly competitive global environment with strong competition from international, national, regional and
local full-line, short-line, and specialty distributors, service merchandisers, self-warehousing chain drug stores, manufacturers
engaged in direct distribution, third-party logistics companies, and large payer organizations. In addition, our businesses face
competition from various other service providers and from pharmaceutical and other healthcare manufacturers as well as other
potential customers, which may from time-to-time decide to develop, for their own internal needs, supply management capabilities
that might otherwise be provided by our businesses. Due to consolidation, a few large suppliers control a significant share of the
pharmaceuticals market. This concentration reduces our ability to negotiate favorable terms with suppliers and causes us to depend
on a smaller number of suppliers. Many of our customers, including healthcare organizations, have consolidated and have greater
power to negotiate favorable prices. Consolidation by our customers, suppliers and competitors might reduce the number of market
participants and give the remaining enterprises greater bargaining power, which might lead to erosion in our profit margin.
Consolidation might increase counter-party credit risk because credit purchases increase for fewer market participants. These
competitive pressures and industry consolidation might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our
financial position or results of operations.
23
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We might be adversely impacted by changes or disruptions in product supply.
Our supply arrangements might be interrupted or adversely affected by a variety of causes over which we have no control, such
as export controls or trade sanctions, labor disputes, unavailability of key manufacturing sites, inability to procure raw materials,
quality control concerns, ethical sourcing issues, supplier’s financial distress, natural disasters, civil unrest or acts of war, the
impact of epidemics or pandemics, such as COVID-19, and other general supply constraints. Our inventory might be requisitioned,
diverted, or allocated by government order such as under emergency, disaster, and civil defense declarations. The FDA banned
certain manufacturers from selling raw materials and drug ingredients in the U.S. due to quality issues. For example, government
actions in response to the COVID-19 pandemic affect our supply allocation, and those and our own allocation decisions can impact
our customer relationships. Changes in the healthcare industry’s or our suppliers’ pricing, selling, inventory, distribution, or supply
policies or practices could significantly reduce our revenues and net income. We might experience disruptions in our supply of
higher margin pharmaceuticals, including generic pharmaceuticals. Any of these changes or disruptions might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted as a result of our distribution of generic pharmaceuticals.
Our generic pharmaceuticals distribution business is subject to pricing risks. We might be adversely impacted if our
ClarusONE joint venture is unsuccessful or experiences margins declines. Generic drug manufacturers often offer a generic version
of branded pharmaceuticals while they challenge the validity or enforceability branded pharmaceutical patents. The patent holder
might assert infringement claims against us for distributing those generic versions and the generic drug manufactures may not fully
indemnify us against such claims. These risks, as well as changes in the availability, pricing volatility, reimbursement rates for
generic drugs, or significant changes in the nature, frequency or magnitude of generic pharmaceutical launches, might have a
materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by inflation, an economic slowdown, or recession.
Inflationary conditions result in increased costs and decreased levels of consumer commercial spending and, to the extent we
are not able to offset such cost increases from our suppliers, increase the costs which we incur to purchase inventories and services.
Inflationary pressure is increased by supply chain disruptions and reduced availability of key commodities. Cost inflation during
2022 generally increased our transportation, operational, and other administrative costs associated with our normal business
operations. An economic slowdown or recession could reduce the prices our customers are able or willing to pay for our products
and services and reduce the volume of their purchases. Recessionary pressure may be increased by the COVID-19 pandemic and
regional political and military conflicts. Any economic slowdown or recession and the impact of inflation might have a materially
adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
Disruption or other changes in capital and credit markets might impede access to credit and increase borrowing costs for us and
our customers and suppliers and might impair the financial soundness of our customers and suppliers.
Volatility and disruption in global capital and credit markets, including the bankruptcy or restructuring of certain financial
institutions, reduced lending activity by financial institutions, or decreased liquidity and increased costs in the commercial paper
market, might adversely affect our borrowing ability and cost of borrowing. We generally sell our products and services under
short-term unsecured credit arrangements. An adverse change in general economic conditions or access to capital might cause our
customers to reduce their purchases from us, or delay or fail paying amounts owed to us. Suppliers might increase their prices,
reduce their output or change their terms of sale due to limited availability of credit. Suppliers might be unable to make payments
due to us for fees, returned products, or incentives. These risks are increased by the COVID-19 pandemic and regional political and
military conflicts. Interest rate increases or changes in capital market conditions might impede our or our customers’ or suppliers’
ability or cost to obtain credit. Any of these risks might have a material adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
24
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We may have difficulties in sourcing or selling products due to a variety of causes.
We might experience difficulties and delays in sourcing and selling products due to a variety of causes, such as: difficulties in
complying with the legal requirements for export or import of pharmaceuticals or components; suppliers’ failure to satisfy
production demand; manufacturing or supply problems such as inadequate resources; and real or perceived quality issues.
Difficulties in product manufacturing or access to raw materials could result in supplier production shutdowns, product shortages
and other supply disruptions. The FDA banned certain manufacturers from selling raw materials and drug ingredients in the U.S.
due to quality issues. The COVID-19 pandemic adversely affects the availability of some products, resulting in product allocation
and delivery delays. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial
position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by tax legislation or challenges to our tax positions.
We are subject to the tax laws in the U.S. at the federal, state, and local government levels and to the tax laws of many other
jurisdictions in which we operate or sell products or services. Tax laws might change in ways that adversely affect our tax positions,
effective tax rate, and cash flow. The tax laws are extremely complex and subject to varying interpretations. We are subject to tax
examinations in various jurisdictions that might assess additional tax liabilities against us. Our tax reporting positions might be
challenged by relevant tax authorities, we might incur significant expense in our efforts to defend those challenges, and we might
be unsuccessful in those efforts. Developments in examinations and challenges might materially change our provision for taxes in
the affected periods and might differ materially from our historical tax accruals. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse
impact on our business operations, our cash flows, and our financial position or results of operations.
We might be adversely impacted by fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates.
We conduct our business in various currencies, including the U.S. dollar, euro, British pound sterling and Canadian dollar.
Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could reduce our revenues, increase our costs, or otherwise adversely affect our
financial results reported in U.S. dollars. For example, we are exposed to transactional currency exchange risk due to our import
and export of products that are purchased or sold in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. We also have currency exchange risk due
to intercompany loans denominated in various currencies. The COVID-19 pandemic and regional political and military conflict
have affected and might increase currency exchange rate volatility. We may from time to time enter into foreign currency contracts,
foreign currency borrowings or other techniques intended to hedge a portion of our foreign currency exchange rate risks. These
hedging activities may not completely offset the adverse financial effects of unfavorable movements in foreign currency exchange
rates during the time the hedges are in place. Any of these risks might have a materially adverse impact on our business operations
and our financial position or results of operations.
General Risk Factors
We might be adversely impacted by events outside of our control, such as widespread public health issues, natural disasters,
political events, and other catastrophic events.
We might be adversely affected by events outside of our control, including: widespread public health issues, such as epidemic
or pandemic infectious diseases; natural disasters such as earthquakes, floods, or severe weather; political events such as terrorism,
military conflicts, and trade wars; and other catastrophic events. These events can disrupt operations for us, our suppliers, our
vendors, and our customers. They might affect consumer confidence levels and spending or the availability of certain goods or
commodities. For example, in February 2022, the Russian Federation began conducting military operations against Ukraine,
resulting in global economic uncertainty and increased cost of various commodities. As another example, the COVID-19 pandemic
affects product manufacturing, supply, and transport availability and cost in unpredictable ways that depend on highly uncertain
future developments. In response to these types of events, we might suspend operations, implement extraordinary procedures, seek
alternate sources for product supply, or suffer consequences that are unexpected and difficult to mitigate. Any of these risks might
have a materially adverse impact on our business operations and our financial position or results of operations.
25
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
We may be adversely affected by global climate change or by legal, regulatory, or market responses to such change.
The long-term effects of climate change are difficult to predict and may be widespread. The impacts may include physical risks
(such as rising sea levels or frequency and severity of extreme weather conditions), social and human effects (such as population
dislocations or harm to health and well-being), compliance costs and transition risks (such as regulatory or technology changes),
and other adverse effects. The effects could impair, for example, the availability and cost of certain products, commodities, and
energy (including utilities), which in turn may impact our ability to procure goods or services required for the operation of our
business at the quantities and levels we require. We bear losses incurred as a result of, for example, physical damage to or
destruction of our facilities (such as distribution or fulfillment centers), loss or spoilage of inventory due to unusual ambient
temperatures, and business interruption due to weather events that may be attributable to climate change. These events and impacts
could materially adversely affect our business operations, financial position, or results of operation.
We might be adversely impacted by changes in accounting standards.
Our consolidated financial statements are subject to the application of U.S. GAAP, which periodically is revised or
reinterpreted. From time to time, we are required to adopt new or revised accounting standards issued by recognized authoritative
bodies, including the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) and the SEC. It is possible that future accounting standards
may require changes to the accounting treatment in our consolidated financial statements and may require us to make significant
changes to our financial systems. Such changes might have a materially adverse impact on our financial position or results of
operations.
Item 1B.    Unresolved Staff Comments.
None.
Item 2.    Properties.
Because of the nature of our principal businesses, our plant, warehousing, retail pharmacies, office, and other facilities are
operated in widely dispersed locations, primarily throughout North America and Europe. Retail pharmacies and most warehouses
are typically owned or leased on a long-term basis. We consider our operating properties to be in satisfactory condition and
adequate to meet our needs for the next several years without making capital expenditures materially higher than historical levels.
Information as to material lease commitments is included in Financial Note 10, “Leases,” to the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report.
In July 2021, we announced our intention to exit our businesses in Europe. As of March 31, 2022, the majority of our
properties in Europe are expected to be divested and are classified as Assets held for sale in the Company’s Consolidated Balance
Sheet, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this
Annual Report .
During the first quarter of 2022, we approved an initiative to increase operational efficiencies and flexibility by transitioning to
a partial remote work model for certain employees. This initiative primarily included the rationalization of our office space in North
America. Where we ceased using office space, we exited the portion of the facility no longer used. We also retained and repurposed
certain other office locations. This initiative was substantially completed in 2022. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring,
Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for further details .
Item 3.    Legal Proceedings.
Certain legal proceedings in which we are involved are discussed in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent
Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report. Disclosure of an environmental proceeding
with a governmental agency is generally included only if we expect monetary sanctions in the proceeding to exceed $1 million,
unless otherwise material.
26
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 4.    Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
27
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth information regarding the executive officers of the Company, including their principal
occupations during the past five years.
There are no family relationships between any of the executive officers or directors of the Company. The term of office of each
executive officer expires at the first meeting of the Board of Directors (“Board”) following the annual meeting of shareholders, or
until their successors are elected and have qualified, or until death, resignation, or removal, whichever is sooner.
Name Age Position with Registrant and Business Experience
Brian S. Tyler 55 Chief Executive Officer and a director since April 2019; President
and Chief Operating Officer from August 2018 to March 2019;
Chairman of the Management Board of McKesson Europe AG from
2017 to 2018; President and Chief Operating Officer, McKesson
Europe from 2016 to 2017; President of North America Distribution
and Services from 2015 to 2016; and Executive Vice President,
Corporate Strategy and Business Development from 2012 to
2015. Service with the Company - 25 years.
Britt J. Vitalone 53 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since January
2018; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S.
Pharmaceutical from July 2014 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President and Chief Financial Officer, U.S. Pharmaceutical and
Specialty Health from October 2017 to December 2017; Senior Vice
President of Corporate Finance and M&A Finance from March 2012
to June 2014. Service with the Company - 16 years.
Tracy L. Faber 52 Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer since
October 2019. Previously, Senior Vice President of Human
Resources. Service with the Company - 11 years.
Nancy Flores 55 Executive Vice President, Chief Information Officer and Chief
Technology Officer since January 2020. Chief Information Officer,
Johnson Controls from 2018 to July 2019. Corporate Officer and
Vice President of Business and Technology Services, Abbott
Laboratories from 1996 to 2018. Service with the Company - 2
years.
Thomas L. Rodgers 51 Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Business Development
Officer since June 2020. Previously, Senior Vice President and
Managing Director of McKesson Ventures from 2014 to 2020.
Service with the Company - 8 years.
Lori A. Schechter 60 Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and General Counsel
since June 2014. Associate General Counsel from January 2012 to
June 2014. Litigation Partner, Morrison & Foerster LLP from 1995
to December 2011. Service with the Company - 10 years.
28
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART II
Item 5.    Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities.
Market Information: The principal market on which our common stock is traded is the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”)
under the trading symbol of “MCK.”
Holders: At March 31, 2022, there were 4,636 holders of record of our common stock.
Dividends: In July 2021, our quarterly dividend was raised from $0.42 to $0.47 per common share for dividends declared on or
after such date by the Board. We declared regular cash dividends of $1.83, $1.67, and $1.62 per share for the years ended March
31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
We anticipate that we will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future
dividends remain within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon our future earnings, financial condition, capital
requirements, and other factors.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans: Information relating to this item is provided under Part
III, Item 12, to this Annual Report.
Share Repurchase Plans: Stock repurchases may be made from time-to-time in open market transactions, privately negotiated
transactions, through accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by combinations of such methods, any of which may use
pre-arranged trading plans that are designed to meet the requirements of Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
The timing of any repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including the
Company’s stock price, corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under the Company’s debt obligations, and other market
and economic conditions. During the last three years, our share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions
and ASR programs with third-party financial institutions.
29
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Share Repurchases 
(In millions, except price per shar e data)Total
Number of
Shares
Purchased Average Price
Paid Per ShareApproximate
Dollar Value of
Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased
Under the
Programs
Balance, March 31, 2019 $ 3,469 
Shares repurchased - Open market 9.2 $ 144.68 (1,334)
Shares repurchased - May 2019 ASR 4.7 $ 127.68 (600)
Balance, March 31, 2020 1,535 
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2021 2,000 
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.7 $ 160.33 (750)
Balance, March 31, 2021 2,785 
Shares repurchased - May 2021 ASR 5.2 $ 193.22 (1,000)
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.6 $ 217.73 (1,007)
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2022 4,000 
Shares repurchased - February 2022 ASR 4.8 $ 265.56 (1,500)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 3,278 
(1) This table does not include the value of equity award s surrendered to satisfy tax withholding obligations or forfeitures of equity awards. It
also excludes  shares related to our split-of f of the Change Healthcare JV as described in Financial Note 19, “Stockholders' Equity (Deficit)”
to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report.
(2) The number of shares purchased reflects rounding adjustments.
(3) Of the total dollar value, $8 million was accrued within “Other accrued liabilities” in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2021
for share repurchases that were executed in late March and settled in early April.
(4) In February 2022, the Company entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $1.5 billion of the
Company’ s common stock. The average price paid per share and total number of shares purchased under this program are estimates based on
the initial share purchase price and initial delivery of shares under an ASR agreement and may differ from  the average price paid per share
and total number of shares purchased under the ASR program upon its final settlement in May 2022.
The following table provides information on our share repurchases during the fourth quarter of 2022:
Share Repurchases 
(In millions, except price per shar e)Total
Number of Shares
PurchasedAverage Price Paid
per Share Total Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced
ProgramsApproximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased Under
the Programs
January 1, 2022 - January 31, 2022 — $ — — $ 4,778 
February 1, 2022 - February 28, 2022 4.8 265.56 4.8 3,278 
March 1, 2022 - March 31, 2022 — — — 3,278 
Total 4.8 4.8 
(1) This table does not include the value of equity awards surrendered to satisfy tax withholding obligations or forfeitures of equity awards.
(2) The average price paid per share and total number of shares purchased under this program are estimates based on the initial share purchase
price and initial delivery of shares under an ASR agreement and may differ from the average price paid per share and total number of shares
purchased under the ASR program upon its final settlement in May 2022.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
30
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Stock Price Performance Graph*: The following graph compares the cumulative total stockholder return on our common stock
for the periods indicated with the Standard & Poor’s (“S&P”) 500 Index and the S&P 500 Health Care Index. The S&P 500 Health
Care Index was selected as a comparator because it is generally available to investors and broadly used by other companies in the
same industry.
March 31,
2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022
McKesson Corporation $ 100.00 $ 95.83 $ 80.55 $ 94.18 $ 137.19 $ 217.12 
S&P 500 Index $ 100.00 $ 113.99 $ 124.82 $ 116.11 $ 181.54 $ 209.94 
S&P 500 Health Care Index $ 100.00 $ 111.27 $ 127.84 $ 126.55 $ 169.62 $ 202.01 
* Assumes $100 invested in McKesson Common Stock and in each index on March 31, 2017 and that all dividends are reinvested.
Item 6.    Reserved.
31
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW
Item 7.    Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
INDEX TO MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS
Section Page
General 32
Overview of Our Business 32
Executive Summary 34
Trends and Uncertainties 35
Overview of Consolidated Results 40
Overview of Segment Results 46
Foreign Operations 50
Business Combinations 50
Fiscal 2023 Outlook 50
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates 50
Financial Condition, Liquidity, and Capital Resources 55
Related Party Balances and Transactions 61
New Accounting Pronouncements 61
GENERAL
Management’s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, referred to as the “Financial Review,” is
intended to assist the reader in the understanding and assessment of significant changes and trends related to the results of
operations and financial position of McKesson Corporation together with its subsidiaries (collectively, the “Company,”
“McKesson,” “we,” “our,” or “us” and other similar pronouns). This discussion and analysis should be read in conjunction with the
consolidated financial statements and accompanying financial notes in Item 8 of Part II of this Annual Report on Form 10-K
(“Annual Report”).
Our fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a particular year shall mean
our fiscal year.
Our Financial Review within this Form 10-K generally discusses 2022 and 2021 results and year-over-year comparisons
between 2022 and 2021. For a discussion on our year-over-year comparisons between 2021 and 2020, refer to our Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended March 31, 2021, Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations of Part II, previously filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 12, 2021.
Certain statements in this report constitute forward-looking statements. See Item 1 - Business - Forward-Looking Statements in
Part I of this Annual Report for additional factors relating to these statements and Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part I of this Annual
Report for a list of certain risk factors applicable to our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Overview of Our Business:
We are a diversified healthcare services leader dedicated to advancing health outcomes for patients everywhere. Our teams
partner with biopharma companies, care providers, pharmacies, manufacturers, governments, and others to deliver insights,
products, and services to help make quality care more accessible and affordable.
32
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We report our results in four reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical, Prescription Technology Solutions (“RxTS”), Medical-
Surgical Solutions, and International. Our organizational structure also includes Corporate, which consists of income and expenses
associated with administrative functions and projects, and the results of certain investments. The factors for determining the
reportable segments include the manner in which management evaluates the performance of the Company combined with the
nature of individual business activities. We evaluate the performance of our operating segments on a number of measures, including
revenues and operating profit before interest expense and income taxes.
The following summarizes our four reportable segments. Refer to Financial Note 21, “Segments of Business,” to the
consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for further information regarding our reportable segments.
•U.S. Pharmaceutical is a reportable segment that distributes branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar, and over-the-counter
pharmaceutical drugs and other healthcare-related products. This segment also provides practice management, technology,
clinical support, and business solutions to community-based oncology and other specialty practices. In addition, the
segment sells financial, operational, and clinical solutions to pharmacies (retail, hospital, alternate site) and provides
consulting, outsourcing, technological, and other services.
•Prescription Technology Solutions is a reportable segment that combines automation and our ability to navigate the
healthcare ecosystem to connect pharmacies, providers, payers, and biopharma companies to address patients’ medication
access, adherence, and affordability challenges to help people get the medicine they need to live healthier lives.
•Medical-Surgical Solutions is a reportable segment that provides medical-surgical supply distribution, logistics, and
other services to healthcare providers in the United States (“U.S.”).
•International is a reportable segment that includes our operations in Europe and Canada, bringing together non-U.S.-
based drug distribution services, specialty pharmacy, retail, and infusion care services. During 2022, we entered into
agreements to sell certain of our businesses in the European Union (“E.U.”) and our retail and distribution businesses in
the United Kingdom (“U.K.”), as well as completed the sale of our Austrian business. These divestitures are further
described in the “European Divestiture Activities” section below.
European Divestiture Activities
On July 5, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell certain of our businesses in the E.U. located in France, Italy, Ireland,
Portugal, Belgium, and Slovenia, along with our German headquarters and wound-care business, part of a shared services center in
Lithuania, and our ownership stake in a joint venture in the Netherlands (“E.U. disposal group”) to the PHOENIX Group for a
purchase price of €1.2 billion (or, approximately $1.4 billion) adjusted for certain items, including cash, net debt and working
capital adjustments, and reduced by the value of the noncontrolling interest held by minority shareholders of McKesson Europe AG
(“McKesson Europe”) at the transaction closing date. We recorded charges of $438 million for the year ended March 31, 2022 in
total operating expenses to remeasure the E.U. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell and to impair certain internal-use
software that will not be utilized in the future. The remeasurement adjustment includes a $151 million loss related to the
accumulated other comprehensive income balances associated with the E.U. disposal group, driven by declines in the Euro. The
transaction is anticipated to close within the second half of fiscal year 2023, pursuant to the satisfaction of customary closing
conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals.
On November 1, 2021, we announced an agreement to sell our retail and distribution businesses in the U.K. (“U.K. disposal
group”) to Aurelius Elephant Limited. In April 2022, we entered into an amendment to the agreement for a purchase price of
£110 million (or, approximately $144 million), including certain adjustments. We recorded charges of $1.2 billion for the year
ended March 31, 2022 in total operating expenses to remeasure the U.K. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell. The
remeasurement adjustment includes a $734 million loss related to the accumulated other comprehensive income balances
associated with the U.K. disposal group, driven by declines in the British pound sterling. The transaction closed on April 6, 2022,
and at closing the buyer assumed and repaid a note payable to us of approximately $118 million.
33
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
On January 31, 2022, we completed the sale of our Austrian business to Quadrifolia Management GmbH in a management-led
buyout for a purchase price of €244 million (or, approximately $276 million), including certain adjustments. We divested net assets
of the Austrian business of $272 million, primarily within the International segment, and the buyer assumed a note payable to us of
approximately $63 million which was paid to us in the fourth quarter of 2022. We recorded a charge of $32 million for the year
ended March 31, 2022 in total operating expenses to remeasure the Austrian business to fair value less costs to sell.
On January 31, 2022, we sold our 30% interest in the German pharmaceutical wholesale joint venture to Walgreens Boots
Alliance (“WBA”). We recognized a $42 million gain within “Other income, net” in the Consolidated Statement of Operations for
the year ended March 31, 2022 related to this sale.
As of March 31, 2022, we had $4.5 billion of assets and $4.7 billion of liabilities classified as “Assets held for sale” and
“Liabilities held for sale,” respectively, in the Consolidated Balance Sheet primarily related to the European divestiture activities
described above. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report
for more information.
Executive Summary:
The following summary provides highlights and key factors that impacted our business, operating results, financial condition,
and liquidity for the year ended March 31, 2022.
•The pandemic disease caused by the SARS-CoV-2 coronavirus (“COVID-19”) impacted our results of operations for the
year ended March 31, 2022. As previously disclosed in our 2021 Annual Report, pharmaceutical distribution volumes
decreased across the enterprise during the first quarter of 2021 as a result of the weakened and uncertain global economic
environment and COVID-19 restrictions, including government-mandated business shutdowns and shelter-in-place orders,
following the onset of the pandemic. The recovery from the pandemic is favorably reflected in our results when comparing
2022 versus 2021. We also had favorable contributions from our COVID-19 vaccine and related ancillary supply kit
distribution programs during 2022;
•In 2021, we began distributing certain COVID-19 vaccines under the direction of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention (“CDC”). Since 2021 and through the end of 2022, we distributed over 380 million COVID-19 vaccine doses
to administration sites all across the U.S. and in support of the U.S. government’s international donation mission. For a
more in-depth discussion of how COVID-19 impacted our business, operations, and outlook, refer to the COVID-19
section of "Trends and Uncertainties" included below;
•Revenues of $264 billion, reflects an 11% increase from the prior year primarily driven by market growth in our U.S.
Pharmaceutical segment;
•Gross profit increased 8% from the prior year primarily driven by improvements in primary care patient visits and the
contribution from kitting and distribution of ancillary supplies for COVID-19 vaccines in our Medical-Surgical Solutions
segment as well as growth of specialty pharmaceuticals and the contribution from our COVID-19 vaccination distribution
program in our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment;
•Total operating expenses in 2022 includes fair value remeasurement charges related to our “European Divestiture
Activities” discussed above;
•Other income, net in 2022 includes net gains of $98 million related to our McKesson Ventures equity investments and $42
million related to the gain on sale of our 30% interest in the German pharmaceutical wholesale joint venture with WBA;
•On July 23, 2021, we completed a cash tender offer and paid an aggregate consideration of $1.1 billion to redeem certain
notes with a principal amount of $922 million. As a result of the redemption, we incurred a loss on debt extinguishment in
the second quarter of 2022 of $191 million, consisting of the premiums paid and a portion of the write-off of unamortized
debt issuance costs in an amount proportional to the principal amount of debt retired. Refer to Financial Note 12, “Debt
and Financing Activities,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for more information;
•Diluted earnings per common share from continuing operations attributable to McKesson Corporation in 2022 of $7.23
reflects the aforementioned items, net of any respective tax impacts, discrete tax items recognized, and a lower share count
compared to the prior year due to the cumulative effect of share repurchases;
34
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
•We paid $1.0 billion to purchase 34.5 million shares of McKesson Europe in 2022 through exercises of a put right by the
noncontrolling shareholders pursuant to the December 2014 domination and profit and loss transfer agreement (the
“Domination Agreement”);
•On July 17, 2021, we redeemed our 0.63% Euro-denominated notes with a principal amount of €600 million (or,
approximately $709 million) prior to the maturity date of August 17, 2021. The notes were redeemed using cash on hand.
On August 12, 2021, we also completed a public offering of 1.30% notes due August 15, 2026 with a principal amount of
$500 million for proceeds received, net of discounts and offering expenses, of $495 million. We utilized the net proceeds
from this note for general corporate purposes;
•We returned $3.8 billion of cash to shareholders through $3.5 billion of common stock repurchases and $277 million of
dividend payments during 2022. On July 23, 2021, we raised our quarterly dividend from $0.42 to $0.47 per common
share; and
•In December 2021, we announced that our Board of Directors (the “Board”) approved an increase of $4.0 billion for the
authorized repurchases of our common stock.
Trends and Uncertainties:
The Impact of Inflationary and Global Events
Our business and results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity are impacted by broad economic conditions including
inflation, increased competition for talent, and disruption of the supply chain, as well as by political or civil unrest or military
action, including the conflict between Russia and Ukraine. Cost inflation during 2022 generally affects us by increasing
transportation, operational, and other administrative costs associated with our normal business operations which we might not be
able to fully pass along to our customers. Although, it is difficult to predict the impact that these factors may have on our business
in the future, they did not have a material effect on our results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity for the year ended
March 31, 2022.
COVID-19
The SARS-CoV-2 novel strain of coronavirus, which causes the infectious disease known as COVID-19, continues to evolve
since it was declared a global pandemic on March 11, 2020 by the World Health Organization. We continue to evaluate the nature
and extent of the ongoing impacts COVID-19 has on our business, operations, and financial results. The full extent to which
COVID-19 will impact us depends on many factors and future developments, which are described in our “Risks and Forward-
Looking Information” section below.
Our Response to COVID-19 in the Workplace
We are committed to continuing to supply our customers and protect the safety of our employees. The various responses we
put in place to mitigate the impact of COVID-19 on our business operations include telecommuting and work-from-home policies,
restricted travel, employee support programs, and enhanced safety measures. During the first quarter of 2022, we approved changes
to our real estate strategy to increase efficiencies and support flexibility for our employees, including a partial remote work model
for certain employees as further discussed in this Financial Review and in Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and
Related Charges, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report. During the third quarter of 2022, we
continued to refine our policies and apply safety measures in the workplace as recommended by the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention (“CDC”) as COVID-19 cases increased across North America and Europe driven by the highly contagious Omicron
variant.
During 2022, we continued COVID-19 vaccination protocols for our U.S. and Canada employees, which are designed to be
consistent with federal, state, and local laws and with customer requirements and to protect the safety of our employees, customers,
patients, and communities while also safeguarding the healthcare supply chain. In Europe, we followed applicable government
guidelines. We continue to monitor all of these changing laws, requirements and guidelines. We have not observed a material
increase in employee turnover as a result of COVID-19 vaccination protocols; however, we are unable to predict whether such
protocols will have a material impact on our workforce in the future.
35
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Our Role in the Distribution of COVID-19 Vaccines and Ancillary Supply Kits
As a diversified healthcare services leader, we remain well positioned to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic in the U.S.,
Canada, and Europe. We have worked and continue to work closely with national and local governments, agencies, and industry
partners to ensure that available supplies, including PPE, and medicine reach our customers and patients.
Through a contract with the CDC, we continue to support the U.S. government as a centralized distributor of COVID-19
vaccines and ancillary supplies needed to administer vaccines. We began distributing certain COVID-19 vaccines in December
2020. In the first quarter of 2022, McKesson began supporting the U.S. government’s commitment to donate COVID-19 vaccines
worldwide. For this initiative, we are responsible for picking and packing the COVID-19 vaccines into temperature-controlled
coolers and preparing them for pickup by an international partner. We do not manage the actual shipments of the vaccines to other
countries. The results of operations related to our vaccine distribution are reflected in our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment. We also
continue to manage the assembly, storage, and distribution of ancillary supply kits needed to administer COVID-19 vaccines,
including sourcing some of those supplies, through agreements with both the Department of Health and Human Services (“HHS”)
and Pfizer, Inc. The results of operations for the kitting and distribution of ancillary supplies are reflected in our Medical-Surgical
Solutions segment. The future financial impact of the arrangements with the CDC and HHS depend on numerous uncertainties,
which are described in our “Risks and Forward-Looking Information” section below.
McKesson Canada and McKesson Europe are playing a role by supporting governments and public health entities through
distributing COVID-19 vaccines and administering them in pharmacies. Additionally, McKesson Canada and McKesson Europe
are distributing COVID-19 tests and certain PPE.
Trends in our Business
At the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic late in our fourth quarter of 2020, we had higher pharmaceutical distribution volumes
and increased retail pharmacy foot traffic as our customers increased supplies on hand in March. During 2021, pharmaceutical
distribution volumes decreased as a result of the weakened and uncertain global economic environment and COVID-19 restrictions,
including government-mandated business shutdowns and shelter-in-place orders. We also had a decrease in demand for primary
care medical-surgical supplies due to deferrals in elective procedures in hospitals and surgery centers as well as decreased traffic
and closures of doctors’ offices, which was partially offset by demand for PPE and COVID-19 tests. Additionally, the decreased
traffic in doctors’ offices and general shelter-in-place guidance by governmental authorities negatively impacted retail pharmacy
foot traffic in both Europe and Canada. This drove favorability in our results when comparing 2022 versus 2021, particularly during
the first quarter.
We have observed improvements in prescription volumes and primary care patient visits during 2022 compared to the prior
year period; however, the recovery of COVID-19 continues to be non-linear and impacted by virus variants such as Omicron and
ongoing fluctuations in case levels. During the year ended March 31, 2022, the U.S. distribution of COVID-19 vaccines and related
ancillary kits favorably impacted our results. We recognized higher sales for COVID-19 tests primarily due to limited product
availability in the first quarter of 2021 and increased demand during 2022 corresponding with the spike in positive COVID-19
cases as a result of the Delta and Omicron variants.
36
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Impact to our Supply Chain
We also continue to monitor and address the COVID-19 pandemic impacts on our supply chain. Although the availability of
various products is dependent on our suppliers, their locations, and the extent to which they are impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic, we are proactively working with manufacturers, industry partners, and government agencies to meet the needs of our
customers during the pandemic. Overall, during 2022 we had an increase in supply chain costs primarily related to transportation
and labor; however, this did not materially impact our results of operations for the year ended March 31, 2022. In our Medical-
Surgical Solutions segment, we have observed certain supply chain disruptions for COVID-19 tests, which poses a potential risk for
supply availability to meet the future demand. As potential shortages or disruptions of any products are identified we address
supply continuity, which includes securing additional products when available, sourcing back-up products when needed, and
following allocation procedures to maintain and protect supply as much as possible. We utilize business continuity action planning
to maintain and protect operations across all locations and facilities.
Impact to our Results of Operations, Financial Condition, and Liquidity
For the year ended March 31, 2022, COVID-19 tests and the kitting and distribution of ancillary supplies for COVID-19
vaccines in our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment contributed approximately $1.8 billion, or 16% to segment revenues, and
including total inventory charges as further described below, increased our segment operating profit by approximately $208 million,
or 22%.
The distribution of COVID-19 vaccines in our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment contributed less than 10% to segment operating
profit during the year ended March 31, 2022. The financial impact from our COVID-19 response efforts in the International
segment during 2022 was not material to our consolidated results, but contributed to year over year favorability in segment
operating results. During the year ended March 31, 2021, particularly during the first quarter, we had lower pharmaceutical
volumes, specialty drug volumes, and patient care visits that negatively impacted our consolidated revenues and income (loss) from
continuing operations before income taxes. The recovery of prescription volume trends and patient care visits, which are also
described in more detail above in the “Trends in our Business” section, had a favorable impact year over year across our businesses
when comparing 2022 versus 2021.
Additionally, certain PPE items held for resale were valued in our inventory at costs that were inflated by earlier COVID-19
pandemic demand levels. That inventory valuation, if not supported by market resale prices, may be written down to net realizable
value. We may also write-off inventory due to decreased customer demand and excess inventory. During the year ended March 31,
2022, we recorded inventory charges totaling $164 million on certain PPE and other related products in our Medical-Surgical
Solutions segment. Of this amount, we recorded $147 million in cost of sales driven by the intent of management not to sell certain
excess PPE inventory, which required an inventory write-down to zero, and instead direct it to charitable organizations or otherwise
dispose. We recorded $8 million in total operating expenses for excess inventory which had already been committed for donation at
the time of the charge and subsequently was delivered during 2022. In addition, $9 million of inventory charges were recorded in
cost of sales for PPE and other related products that management intends to sell. Although market price volatility and changes to
anticipated customer demand may require additional write-downs in future periods of other PPE and related product categories, we
are taking measures to mitigate such risk.
Overall, these COVID-19 related items had a net favorable impact on consolidated income from continuing operations before
income taxes for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year period. Impacts to future periods due to COVID-19
may differ based on future developments, which is described in our “Risks and Forward-Looking Information” section below.
During the year ended March 31, 2022, we maintained appropriate labor and overall vendor supply levels and experienced no
material impacts to our liquidity or net working capital due to the COVID-19 pandemic. We continue to monitor the COVID-19
situation closely and engage with manufacturers, industry partners, and government agencies to anticipate shortages and respond to
demand for certain medications and therapies. We are monitoring our customers closely for changes to their timing of payments or
ability to pay amounts owed to us as a result of COVID-19 pandemic impacts to their businesses. We remain well-capitalized with
access to liquidity from our revolving credit facility. Long-term debt markets and commercial paper markets, our primary sources
of capital after cash flow from operations, have remained open and accessible to us during the COVID-19 pandemic. At March 31,
2022, we were in compliance with all debt covenants, and believe we have the ability to continue to meet our debt covenants in the
future.
37
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Risks and Forward-Looking Information
The COVID-19 pandemic has disrupted the global economy and exacerbated uncertainties inherent in estimates, judgments,
and assumptions used in our forecasts. We still face numerous uncertainties in estimating the direct and indirect effects of COVID-
19 on our future business operations, financial condition, results of operations, and liquidity. The full extent to which COVID-19
will impact us depends on many factors and future developments, including: the duration and spread of the COVID-19 pandemic;
potential seasonality of viral outbreaks; impacts of additional variants of the SARS-Cov-2 virus; the amount of COVID-19 vaccines
and ancillary supply kits that we are contracted to distribute; the effectiveness of COVID-19 vaccines and governmental measures
designed to mitigate the spread of the virus; the effectiveness of treatments of infected individuals; commercialization of COVID-
19 vaccines; competition in COVID-19 vaccine distribution; and changes or disruptions in product supply. We have experienced
and may experience difficulties in sourcing products and changes in pricing due to the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic on
supply chains. Due to several rapidly changing variables related to the COVID-19 pandemic, estimations of future economic trends
and the timing of when COVID-19 may no longer significantly impact our ability to forecast future financial performance remain
challenging. Additionally, we periodically review our intangible and other long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes
in circumstances indicate the carrying value may not be recoverable. Key assumptions and estimates about future values in our
impairment assessments can be affected by a variety of factors, including the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on industry and
economic trends as well as on our business strategy and internal forecasts. Material changes to key assumptions and estimates can
decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and have resulted in impairment charges of certain long-lived assets
and could potentially result in future impairment charges. Refer to Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part I of this Annual Report for a
disclosure of risk factors related to COVID-19.
Opioid-Related Litigation and Claims
We are a defendant in many legal proceedings asserting claims related to the distribution of controlled substances (opioids) in
federal and state courts throughout the U.S., and in Puerto Rico and Canada. The plaintiffs in these actions have included state
attorneys general, county and municipal governments, tribal nations, hospitals, health and welfare funds, third-party payors, and
individuals.
On February 25, 2022, the Company and two other United States pharmaceutical distribution companies (collectively,
"Distributors") determined that there is sufficient State and subdivision participation to proceed with an agreement ("Settlement")
to settle a substantial majority of opioids-related lawsuits filed against the Distributors by U.S. states, territories and local
governmental entities. Under the Settlement, 46 of 49 eligible states and their participating subdivisions, as well as the District of
Columbia and all eligible territories (collectively, "Settling Governmental Entities"), have agreed to join the Settlement. The
Settlement became effective on April 2, 2022. If all conditions to the Settlement are satisfied, including the receipt of approval by
relevant courts of consent decrees to dismiss the lawsuits, the Distributors would pay the Settling Governmental Entities up to
approximately $19.5 billion over 18 years, with up to approximately $7.4 billion to be paid by the Company for its 38.1% portion.
Under the Settlement, a minimum of 85% of the settlement payments must be used by state and local governmental entities to
remediate the opioid epidemic. Most of the remaining percentage relates to plaintiffs’ attorneys’ fees and costs, and would be
payable over a shorter time period. Under the Settlement, the Distributors will establish a clearinghouse to consolidate their
controlled-substance distribution data, which will be available to the settling U.S. states to use as part of their anti-diversion efforts.
The Settlement provides that the Distributors do not admit liability or wrongdoing and do not waive any defenses.
The Settlement only addresses the claims of attorneys general of U.S. states and territories and political subdivisions in
participating states and territories. The terms under which the Distributors previously agreed to settle opioids claims of the states of
New York, Ohio, Rhode Island, Florida and Texas, and each of their participating subdivisions, will become part of the Settlement.
The previously disclosed agreement for the Distributors to settle opioids claims of the attorney general of West Virginia will remain
a separate settlement arrangement that is not part of the Settlement. Governmental entities not participating in the Settlement may
continue to pursue their claims. The states of Alabama, Oklahoma and Washington chose not to participate in the Settlement. We
have reached separate agreements in principle with the attorneys general of Alabama and Washington to settle the claims of those
states and their subdivisions. The Distributors previously settled with the Cherokee Nation and reached a separate agreement in
principle to settle the claims of the remaining federally recognized Native American Tribes.
38
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We recorded a charge of $8.1 billion during the year ended March 31, 2021 related to our estimated liability to U.S.
governmental entities, including those expected to participate in the Settlement, the states and subdivisions that were not expected
to participate or were not eligible, and the Native American tribes. In connection with the Settlement and other opioid-related
settlement accruals described above, we recorded additional charges of $274 million during the year ended March 31, 2022 within
“Claims and litigation charges, net” in our Consolidated Statement of Operations. Our total estimated liability for opioid-related
claims was $8.3 billion as of March 31, 2022, of which $1.0 billion was included in “Other accrued liabilities” for the amount
estimated to be paid prior to March 31, 2023, and the remaining liability was included in “Long-term litigation liabilities” in our
Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Although the vast majority of opioid claims have been brought by governmental entities in the U.S., the Company is also a
defendant in cases brought in the U.S. by private plaintiffs, such as hospitals, health and welfare funds, third-party payors, and
individuals, as well as four cases brought in Canada (three by governmental or tribal entities and one by an individual). These
claims, and those of private entities generally, are not included in the Settlement or in the charges recorded by the Company,
described above. The Company believes it has valid legal defenses in these matters and intends to mount a vigorous defense.
Because of the many uncertainties associated with ongoing opioid-related litigation matters, we are not able to reasonably
estimate the upper or lower ends of the range of ultimate possible loss for all opioid-related litigation matters. In light of the
uncertainty, the amount of any ultimate loss may differ materially from the amount accrued.
Notwithstanding the Settlement, we also continue to prepare for trial in pending matters. We believe that we have valid
defenses to the claims pending against us and, absent an acceptable settlement, intend to vigorously defend against all such claims.
An adverse judgment or negotiated resolution in any of these matters could have a material adverse impact on our financial
position, cash flows or liquidity, or results of operations. Refer to Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to
the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K for more information.
39
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Overview of Consolidated Results:
(In millions, except per shar e data)Years Ended March 31,
2022 2021 Change
Revenues $263,966 $238,228 11 %
Gross profit 13,130 12,148 8 
Gross profit margin 4.97 % 5.10 % (13)bp
Total operating expenses $(11,092) $(17,188) (35)%
Total operating expenses as a percentage of revenues 4.20 % 7.21 % (301)bp
Other income, net $ 259 $ 223 16 %
Loss on debt extinguishment (191) — — 
Interest expense (178) (217) (18)
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 1,928 (5,034) 138 
Income tax benefit (expense) (636) 695 (192)
Income (loss) from continuing operations 1,292 (4,339) 130 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (5) (1) 400 
Net income (loss) 1,287 (4,340) 130 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (173) (199) (13)
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 1,114 $ (4,539) 125 %
Diluted earnings (loss) per common share attributable to McKesson Corporation
Continuing operations $ 7.26 $ (28.26) 126 %
Discontinued operations (0.03) — — 
Total $ 7.23 $ (28.26) 126 %
Weighted-average diluted common shares outstanding 154.1 160.6 (4)%
bp - basis points
All percentage changes displayed above which are not meaningful are displayed as zero percent.
40
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Revenues
Revenues increased for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 compared to the respective prior years primarily due to
market growth, including expanded business with existing customers within our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment. Market growth
includes growing drug utilization, price increases, and newly launched products, partially offset by price deflation associated with
branded to generic drug conversion.
Gross Profit
Gross profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year primarily in our Medical-Surgical
Solutions segment driven by improvements in patient care visits in our primary care business, the contribution from kitting and
distribution of ancillary supplies for COVID-19 vaccines, partially offset by the unfavorable impact from PPE and other related
products largely due to inventory charges. Gross profit was favorably impacted by growth of specialty pharmaceuticals and the
contribution from our vaccine distribution programs in our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment. Gross profit was also driven by increased
volume with new and existing customers in our RxTS segment.
Gross profit for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021, included LIFO inventory credits of $23 million and $38 million,
respectively. The lower LIFO credits in 2022 compared to 2021 is primarily due to higher brand inflation and delays of branded
off-patent to generic drug launches. Refer to the “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates” section included in this Financial
Review for further information. Gross profit for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 also included net cash proceeds received
of $46 million and $181 million, respectively, representing our share of antitrust legal settlements.
Total Operating Expenses
A summary and description of the components of our total operating expenses for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 is
as follows:
•Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses (“SDG&A”): SDG&A consists of personnel costs,
transportation costs, depreciation and amortization, lease costs, professional fee expenses, administrative expenses,
remeasurement charges to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell, and other general charges.
•Claims and litigation charges, net: These charges include adjustments for estimated probable settlements related to our
controlled substance monitoring and reporting, and opioid-related claims, as well as any applicable income items or credit
adjustments due to subsequent changes in estimates. Legal fees to defend claims, which are expensed as incurred, are
included within SDG&A.
•Goodwill impairments charges: We perform an impairment test on goodwill balances annually in the third quarter and
more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist. The resulting goodwill impairment charges are reflected
within this line item.
•Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net: Restructuring charges that are incurred for programs in which we
change our operations, the scope of a business undertaken by our business units, or the manner in which that business is
conducted as well as long-lived asset impairments.
Years Ended March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 Change
Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses $ 10,537 $ 8,849 19 %
Claims and litigation charges, net 274 7,936 (97)
Goodwill impairment charges — 69 (100)
Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net 281 334 (16)
Total operating expenses $ 11,092 $ 17,188 (35)%
Percent of revenues 4.20 % 7.21 % (301)bp
bp - basis points
All percentage changes displayed above which are not meaningful are displayed as zero percent.
41
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Total operating expenses and total operating expenses as a percentage of revenues decreased for the year ended March 31,
2022 compared to the prior year. Total operating expenses for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 were affected by the
following significant items:
2022
•SDG&A includes charges totaling $1.2 billion to remeasure our U.K. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell. The
remeasurement adjustment includes a $734 million loss related to the accumulated other comprehensive income balances
associated with the U.K. disposal group, driven by declines in the British pound sterling. Of the total charges recorded
during the period, $1.1 billion are included within our International segment and $42 million are included within
Corporate expenses, net;
•SDG&A includes charges of $438 million to remeasure assets and liabilities of our E.U. disposal group held for sale to fair
value less costs to sell and to impair certain internal-use software that will not be utilized in the future. The remeasurement
adjustment includes a $151 million loss related to the accumulated other comprehensive income balances associated with
the E.U. disposal group, driven by declines in the Euro. Of the total charges recorded during the period, $383 million are
included within our International segment and $55 million are included within Corporate expenses, net;
•SDG&A reflects a cost reduction of $142 million related to the cessation of depreciation and amortization of long-lived
assets and operating lease right-of-use assets classified as held for sale for our European divestiture disposal groups;
•SDG&A includes opioid-related costs of $130 million primarily related to litigation expenses;
•SDG&A includes a gain of $59 million related to the sale of our Canadian health benefit claims management and plan
administrative services business;
•SDG&A when compared to the same prior year period also includes increased employee-related and transportation costs
across our businesses, partially offset by lower operating expenses due to the contribution of a majority of our German
pharmaceutical business to a joint venture with WBA in the third quarter of 2021;
•Claims and litigation charges, net includes a charge of $274 million related to our estimated liability for opioid-related
claims as previously discussed in the “Trends and Uncertainties” section;
•Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net includes charges related to Corporate expenses, net, as well as our
International segment. Refer to the “Restructuring Initiatives and Long-Lived Asset Impairments” and “Segment
Operating Profit (Loss) and Corporate Expenses, Net” sections below as well as Financial Note 3, “Restructuring,
Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for more
information; and
•Total operating expenses were unfavorably impacted by foreign currency exchange fluctuations.
2021
•SDG&A includes opioid-related costs of $153 million, primarily related to litigation expenses;
•SDG&A reflects cost savings of $95 million on travel and entertainment due to travel and meeting restrictions associated
with COVID-19;
•SDG&A reflects charges of $58 million to remeasure assets and liabilities held for sale to fair value less costs to sell
related to the completed contribution of the majority of our German pharmaceutical wholesale business to create a joint
venture with WBA in which we held a 30% ownership interest within our International segment. Refer to Financial Note
2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for more information;
•SDG&A includes a charge of $50 million related to our estimated liability under the State of New York Opioid
Stewardship Act (“OSA”);
•SDG&A also includes lower operating expenses due to the contribution of our German pharmaceutical wholesale business
to a joint venture with WBA and a divestiture in our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment that closed in 2020;
42
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
•Claims and litigation charges, net includes a charge of $8.1 billion related to our estimated liability for opioid-related
claims;
•Claims and litigation charges, net includes a net gain of $131 million reflecting insurance proceeds received, net of
attorneys' fees and expenses awarded to plaintiffs' counsel, in connection with the previously reported $175 million
settlement of the shareholder derivative action related to our controlled substances monitoring program;
•Goodwill impairment charges of $69 million were recorded in connection with our segment realignment that commenced
in the second quarter of 2021. Refer to the “Goodwill Impairment” section below for further details;
•Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $115 million primarily
related to our retail pharmacy businesses in Canada and Europe within our International segment, and the remaining
$219 million primarily represents costs associated with our operating model and cost optimization efforts in our corporate
headquarters and International segment. In addition, certain charges related to restructuring initiatives are included under
the caption “Cost of sales” in our Consolidated Statements of Operations and were not material for the year ended March
31, 2021; and
•Total operating expenses were unfavorably impacted by foreign currency exchange fluctuations.
Goodwill Impairments
As discussed in the “Overview of Our Business” section, our operating structure was realigned commencing in the second
quarter of 2021 into four reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical, RxTS, Medical-Surgical Solutions, and International. These
reportable segments encompass all operating segments of the Company. The segment realignment resulted in changes in multiple
reporting units across the Company. As a result, we were required to perform a goodwill impairment test for these reporting units
and recorded a goodwill impairment charge in our Europe Retail Pharmacy reporting unit of $69 million during the second quarter
of 2021. At March 31, 2022, the balance of goodwill for our reporting units in Europe was approximately nil and the remaining
balance of goodwill in the International segment primarily relates to one of our reporting units in Canada.
We evaluate goodwill for impairment on an annual basis as of October 1, and at an interim date, if indicators of potential
impairment exist. The annual impairment testing performed in 2022 and 2021 did not indicate any impairment of goodwill.
However, other risks, expenses, and future developments, such as additional government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty,
and material changes in key market assumptions limit our ability to estimate projected cash flows, which could adversely affect the
fair value of various reporting units in future periods, including our McKesson Canada reporting unit within our International
segment, where the risk of material goodwill impairment is higher than other reporting units. Refer to “Critical Accounting Policies
and Estimates” included in this Financial Review for further information.
Restructuring Initiatives and Long-Lived Asset Impairments
During the first quarter of 2022, we approved an initiative to increase operational efficiencies and flexibility by transitioning to
a partial remote work model for certain employees. This initiative primarily included the rationalization of our office space in North
America. Where we ceased using office space, we exited the portion of the facility no longer used. We also retained and repurposed
certain other office locations. We recorded charges of $124 million for the year ended March 31, 2022 primarily related to lease
right-of-use and other long-lived asset impairments, lease exit costs, and accelerated depreciation and amortization. This initiative
was substantially complete in 2022 after which immaterial charges will continue to be incurred through the termination date of
certain leases.
During the first quarter of 2021, we committed to an initiative within the U.K., which is included in our International segment,
to further drive transformational changes in technologies and business processes, operational efficiencies, and cost savings. The
initiative included reducing the number of retail pharmacy stores, decommissioning obsolete technologies and processes,
reorganizing and consolidating certain business operations, and related headcount reductions. Charges incurred for this initiative
were not material for 2022, and were $57 million for the year ended March 31, 2021, primarily related to asset impairments and
accelerated depreciation expense as well as employee severance and other employee-related costs. This initiative was substantially
complete in 2022 and remaining costs we expect to record under this initiative are not material.
43
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
In 2022, we recognized charges totaling $36 million to impair certain long-lived assets within our International segment related
to our operations in Denmark and our retail pharmacy businesses in Canada. Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net for
the year ended 2021 includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $115 million primarily related to our retail pharmacy
businesses in Canada and Europe within our International segment.
Refer to Financial Note 3 , “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” to the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report for more information.
Other Income, Net
Other income, net for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 includes net gains recognized from our equity investments of
$98 million and $133 million, respectively. This primarily reflects mark-to-market gains on our investments in certain U.S. growth
stage companies in the healthcare industry and realized gains on the exit of some of these investments as further described in
Financial Note 16, “Fair Value Measurements,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report. In future
periods, fair value adjustments recognized in our operating results for these types of investments may be adversely impacted by
market volatility. Other income, net for the year ended March 31, 2022 also includes a gain of $42 million related to the sale of our
30% interest in the German pharmaceutical wholesale joint venture with WBA.
Loss on Debt Extinguishment
The loss on debt extinguishment recorded for the year ended March 31, 2022 of $191 million includes premiums of
$182 million as well as the write-off of unamortized debt issuance costs and transaction fees incurred of $9 million, and was driven
by our July 2021 tender offer to redeem a portion of our existing debt. Refer to Financial Note 12, “Debt and Financing Activities,”
to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for more information.
Interest Expense
Interest expense decreased in 2022 compared to the prior year primarily due to the repayment of $1.0 billion of long-term debt
in the third quarter of 2021 and our tender offer activity in the second quarter of 2022. Interest expense fluctuates based on timing,
amounts and interest rates of term debt repaid and new term debt issued, as well as amounts incurred associated with financing
fees.
Income Tax (Benefit) Expense
We recorded income tax (benefit) expense of $636 million and ($695 million) for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. Our reported income tax (benefit) expense rates were 33.0% and (13.8%) in 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Fluctuations in our reported income tax rates are primarily due to non-cash charges related to remeasuring the value of certain
of our European businesses to fair value less costs to sell, the impact of opioid-related claims, and changes in our mix of earnings
between various taxing jurisdictions. Refer to Financial Note 7, “Income Taxes,” to the consolidated financial statements included
in this Annual Report for more information.
Our reported income tax rate for 2021 was impacted by the charge for opioid-related claims of $8.1 billion ($6.8 billion after-
tax).
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and evaluating income
tax uncertainties. Although our major taxing jurisdictions include the U.S., Canada, and the U.K., we are subject to income taxes in
numerous foreign jurisdictions. Our income tax expense, deferred tax assets and liabilities, and uncertain tax liabilities reflect
management’s best assessment of estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We believe that we have made adequate provision
for all income tax uncertainties.
Loss from Discontinued Operations, Net of Tax
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax, was $5 million and $1 million and for the years ended March 31, 2022 and
2021, respectively.
44
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests primarily represents ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP, Vantage Oncology
Holdings, LLC, and the accrual of the annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson
Europe”) share that McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under the Domination
Agreement. Noncontrolling interests with redemption features, such as put rights, that are not solely within our control are
considered redeemable noncontrolling interests. Redeemable noncontrolling interests are presented outside of McKesson
Corporation stockholders’ deficit in our consolidated balance sheet. Refer to the “Selected Measures of Liquidity and Capital
Resources” section of this Financial Review and Financial Note 8, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling
Interests,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for additional information on changes to our
redeemable and noncontrolling interests that occurred during the first quarter of 2022.
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to McKesson Corporation
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson Corporation was $1.1 billion and $(4.5) billion for the years ended March 31, 2022
and 2021, respectively. Diluted earnings (loss) per common share attributable to McKesson Corporation was $7.23 and $(28.26) for
the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Net loss per diluted share for the year ended March 31, 2021 is calculated
by excluding dilutive securities from the denominator due to their antidilutive effects. Additionally, our 2022 and 2021 diluted
earnings (loss) per share reflect the cumulative effects of share repurchases.
Weighted-Average Diluted Common Shares Outstanding
Diluted earnings (loss) per common share was calculated based on a weighted-average number of shares outstanding of 154.1
million and 160.6 million for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Weighted-average diluted common shares
outstanding is impacted by the exercise and settlement of share-based awards and the cumulative effect of share repurchases.
45
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Overview of Segment Results:
Segment Revenues:
 Years Ended March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 Change
Segment revenues
U.S. Pharmaceutical $212,149 $189,274 12 %
Prescription Technology Solutions 3,864 2,890 34 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 11,608 10,099 15 
International 36,345 35,965 1 
Total revenues $263,966 $238,228 11 %
The changes in revenues for each of our segments for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year consisted of
the following:
(Dollars in millions) Increase (decrease)
Sales to pharmacies and institutional healthcare providers $ 20,577 
Sales to specialty practices and other 2,298 
Total change in U.S. Pharmaceutical revenues $ 22,875 
Total change in Prescription Technology Solutions revenues $ 974 
Sales to primary care customers $ 1,300 
Sales to extended care customers (138)
Other 347 
Total change in Medical-Surgical Solutions revenues $ 1,509 
Sales in Europe, excluding FX impact $ (2,159)
Sales in Canada, excluding FX impact 1,560 
Impact from FX 979 
Total change in International revenues $ 380 
Total change in revenues $ 25,738 
FX - foreign currency exchange fluctuations. We calculate the impact from FX by converting current year period results of our operations in
foreign countries, which are recorded in local currencies, into U.S. dollars by applying the average foreign currency exchange rates of the
comparable prior year period.
(1) Includes the results for the distribution of COVID-19 vaccines.
(2) Includes the results for the kitting and distribution of ancillary supply kits needed to administer COVID-19 vaccines.(1)
(2)
46
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
U.S. Pharmaceutical
2022 vs. 2021
U.S. Pharmaceutical revenues for the year ended March 31, 2022 increased 12% compared to the prior year primarily due to
market growth, including growth in specialty pharmaceuticals, branded pharmaceutical price increases, and higher volumes from
retail national account customers, partially offset by branded to generic drug conversions. Revenues for this segment were also
favorable year over year driven by the recovery of prescription volumes from the prior year impact of COVID-19, including
increased customer demand for pharmaceuticals in retail pharmacies and institutional healthcare providers.
Prescription Technology Solutions
2022 vs. 2021
RxTS revenues for the year ended March 31, 2022 increased 34% compared to the prior year primarily due to increased
volume with new and existing customers primarily in our third-party logistics and wholesale distribution services.
Medical-Surgical Solutions
2022 vs. 2021
Medical-Surgical Solutions revenues for the year ended March 31, 2022 increased 15% compared to the prior year largely in
our primary care business driven by improvements in patient care visits. Revenues for this segment were also favorably impacted
by the contribution from kitting and distribution of ancillary supplies for COVID-19 vaccines.
International
2022 vs. 2021
International revenues for the year ended March 31, 2022 increased 1% compared to the prior year. Excluding the favorable
effects of foreign currency exchange fluctuations, revenues for this segment decreased 2% largely due to the contribution of our
German pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture with WBA. This was partially offset by favorability year over year
due to the recovery of volumes from COVID-19 in our pharmaceutical distribution and retail pharmacy businesses across the
segment as well as sales to new customers in our Canadian business.
47
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Segment Operating Profit (Loss) and Corporate Expenses, Net:
 Years Ended March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 Change
Segment operating profit (loss) 
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 2,879 $ 2,763 4 %
Prescription Technology Solutions 500 395 27 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 959 707 36 
International (968) (37) — 
Subtotal 3,370 3,828 (12)
Corporate expenses, net (1,073) (8,645) (88)
Loss on debt extinguishment (191) — — 
Interest expense (178) (217) (18)
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes $ 1,928 $ (5,034) 138 %
Segment operating profit (loss) margin
U.S. Pharmaceutical 1.36 % 1.46 % (10)bp
Prescription Technology Solutions 12.94 13.67 (73)
Medical-Surgical Solutions 8.26 7.00 126 
International (2.66) (0.10) (256)
All percentage changes displayed above which are not meaningful are displayed as zero percent.
bp - basis points
(1) Segment operating profit (loss) includes gross profit, net of total operating expenses, as well as other income (expense), net, for our
reportable segments.
(2) Operating profit for our U.S. Pharmaceutical segment includes cash receipts of our share of antitrust legal settlements of $46 million and
$181 million for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively . Operating profit includes a charge of $50 million for the year ended
March 31, 2021 related to our estimated liability under the OSA.
(3) Operating profit for our Medical-Sur gical Solution s segment for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021 includes charges totaling
$164 million and $136 million, respectively , on certain PPE and other related products due to inventory impairments and excess inventory .
(4) Operating loss for our International segment for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes charges of $1.1 billion to remeasure our U.K.
disposal group held for sale to fair value less costs to sell. Operating loss for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes charges of $383 million
to remeasure our E.U. disposal group held for sale to fair value less costs to sell and to impair certain internal-use software that will not be
utilized in the future. Opera ting loss for the year ended March 31, 2022 also includes a gain of $59 million  related to the sale of our Canadian
health benefit claims mana gement and plan administrative services business as well as a gain of $42 million related to the sale to WBA  of
our 30% interest in the German pharmaceutical whol esale joint venture to WBA. Operating loss for the year ended March 31, 2021 includes
charges of $58 million to remeasure to fair value the assets and liabilities of our German pharmaceutical wholesale business which was
contributed to a joint venture. Operating loss for the year ended March 31, 2021 includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $115
million prima rily related to our retail pharmacy businesses in Canada and Europe. Operating loss for the year ended March 31, 2021 includes
a goodwill impairment char ge of $69 million related to our European retail business.
(5) Corporate expenses, net for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes charges of $55 million primarily related to the effect of accumulated
other compre hensive loss components from our E.U. disposal group. Corporate expenses, net for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes
charges of $42 million primarily related to the effect of accumulated other comprehensive loss components from our U.K. disposal group.
Corporate expenses, net includes net gains from our equity investments of $98 million and $133 million for the years ended March 31, 2022
and 2021, respectively . Corporate expenses, net includes charges of $274 million and $8.1 billion for the years ended March 31, 2022 and
2021, respect ively , related to our estimated liability for opioid-related claims. Corporate expenses, net includes $130 million and $153
million for the years ended  March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively , of opioid-related costs, primarily litigat ion expenses. Corporate expenses,
net for the year ended March 31, 2021 includes a net gain of $131 million recorded in connection with insurance proceeds received from the
settlement of the shareholder derivative action related to our controlled substances monitoring program.
(6) Loss on debt extinguishme nt for the year ended March 31, 2022 consists of a charge of $191 million on debt extinguishment related to our
July 2021 tender of fer to redeem a portion of our existing debt.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
48
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
U.S. Pharmaceutical
2022 vs. 2021
Operating profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year primarily due to growth in specialty
pharmaceuticals and the contribution from our COVID-19 vaccine distribution program. Operating profit was unfavorably
impacted by a decrease in net cash proceeds received of $135 million representing our share of antitrust legal settlements, an
increase in operating expenses, and product mix and volume.
Prescription Technology Solutions
2022 vs. 2021
Operating profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to prior year primarily driven by increased volumes
with new and existing customers due to growth in our access and adherence solutions.
Medical-Surgical Solutions
2022 vs. 2021
Operating profit increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to prior year primarily due to favorability in our
primary care business from improvements in patient care visits, as well as the contribution from kitting and distribution of ancillary
supplies for COVID-19 vaccines. This increase was partially offset by inventory charges on certain PPE and other related products,
and an increase in employee-related expenses to support business growth.
International
2022 vs. 2021
Operating loss increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year primarily due to fair value
remeasurement charges related to our E.U. disposal group and our U.K. disposal group, partially offset by the cessation of
depreciation and amortization expenses, a prior year goodwill impairment charge related to our European retail business and a gain
recognized related to the sale of our Canadian health benefit claims management and plan administrative services business. This
segment also observed favorability year over year due to the distribution of COVID-19 vaccines, COVID-19 tests, and PPE, as well
as volume recovery from COVID-19 in our pharmaceutical distribution and retail pharmacy businesses across the segment.
Corporate
2022 vs. 2021
Corporate expenses, net decreased for the year ended March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year due to a charge of $8.1 billion
recorded in 2021 related to our estimated liability for opioid-related claims. The decrease in Corporate expenses, net was partially
offset by $274 million recorded in 2022 related to our estimated liability for opioid-related claims, a net gain of $131 million
recognized in 2021 in connection with insurance proceeds received from the settlement of the shareholder derivative action related
to our controlled substances monitoring program, and fair value remeasurement charges related to our E.U. disposal group and our
U.K. disposal group.
49
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
FOREIGN OPERATIONS
Our foreign operations represented approximately 14% and 15% of our consolidated revenues in 2022 and 2021, respectively.
Foreign operations are subject to certain risks, including currency fluctuations. Refer to Item 1A - Risk Factors in Part I of this
Annual Report for a risk factor related to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. We monitor our operations and adopt
strategies responsive to changes in the economic and political environment in each of the countries in which we operate. We
conduct our business worldwide in local currencies including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollar. As a result, the
comparability of our results reported in U.S. dollars can be affected by changes in foreign currency exchange rates. In discussing
our operating results, we may use the term “foreign currency exchange fluctuations,” which refers to the effect of changes in
foreign currency exchange rates used to convert the local currency results of our operations in foreign countries where the
functional currency is not the U.S. dollar. We present this information to provide a framework for assessing how our business
performed excluding the effect of foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations. In computing the foreign currency exchange
fluctuations, we translate our current year results of our operations in foreign countries recorded in local currencies into U.S. dollars
by applying their respective average foreign currency exchange rates of the corresponding prior year periods, and we subsequently
compare those results to the previously reported results of the comparable prior year periods reported in U.S. dollars.
In July 2021, we announced our intention to exit our businesses in Europe. In 2022, we entered into agreements to sell the E.U.
disposal group and U.K. disposal group and completed the previously announced sale of our Austrian business. Refer to Financial
Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for more information on these
European divestitures.
Additional information regarding our foreign operations is also included in Financial Note 21, “Segments of Business,” to the
consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report.
BUSINESS COMBINATIONS
Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this
Annual Report for additional information.
FISCAL 2023 OUTLOOK
Information regarding the Company’s fiscal 2023 outlook is contained in the release of our fourth quarter fiscal 2022 financial
results included as an exhibit to our Form 8-K furnished to the SEC on May 5, 2022, which is not incorporated by reference into
this Annual Report. That Form 8-K should be read in conjunction with the forward-looking statements in the "Trends and
Uncertainties" section of this Financial Review, as well as the cautionary statements in Item 1, "Business - Forward-Looking
Statements," and Item 1A, "Risk Factors," in Part I of this Annual Report.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
We consider an accounting estimate to be critical if the estimate requires us to make assumptions about matters based upon
past experience and management’s judgment that were uncertain at the time the accounting estimate was made and if different
estimates that we reasonably could have used in the current period, or changes in the accounting estimate that are reasonably likely
to occur from period to period, could have a material impact on our financial condition or results from operations. Below are the
estimates that we believe are critical to the understanding of our operating results and financial condition. Other accounting policies
are described in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this
Annual Report. Because of the uncertainty inherent in such estimates, actual results may differ from these estimates.
Allowances for Credit Losses: Our receivables primarily consist of short-term trade accounts receivable from customers that
result from the sale of goods and services. We also provide other customer financing arrangements to customers who purchase our
products and services. Other customer financing primarily relates to guarantees provided to our customers, or their creditors,
regarding the repurchase of inventories. We also provide financing to certain customers related to the purchase of pharmacies,
which serve as collateral for the loans. We estimate the receivables for which we do not expect full collection based on historical
collection rates and specific knowledge regarding the current creditworthiness of our customers and record an allowance in our
consolidated financial statements for these amounts.
50
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
The Company considers historical experience, the current economic environment, customer credit ratings or bankruptcies,
legal disputes, and reasonable and supportable forecasts to develop its allowance for credit losses. Management reviews these
factors quarterly to determine if any adjustments are needed to the allowance.
Sales to the Company’s ten largest customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”), accounted for
approximately 52% of total consolidated revenues in 2022 and comprised approximately 43% of total trade accounts receivable at
March 31, 2022. Sales to our largest customer, CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 21% of our total
consolidated revenues in 2022 and comprised approximately 28% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2022. As a result,
our sales and credit concentration is significant. We also have agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing
agent on behalf of member hospitals, pharmacies and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies.
The accounts receivable balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit
risk exists. A material default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from these or any other large customers, or the loss of a
large customer or GPO could have a material adverse impact on our financial position, results of operations, and liquidity.
Reserve methodologies are assessed annually based on historical losses and economic, business, and market trends. In
addition, reserves are reviewed quarterly and updated if unusual circumstances or trends are present. We believe the reserves
maintained and expenses recorded in 2022 are appropriate and consistent in the context of historical methodologies employed, as
well as assessment of trends currently available.
At March 31, 2022, trade and notes receivables were $16.8 billion prior to allowances of $99 million. In 2022, 2021 and, 2020,
our provision for bad debts was $29 million, $4 million, and $91 million, respectively. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the allowance
as a percentage of trade and notes receivables was 0.6% and 1.2%, respectively. An increase or decrease of a hypothetical 0.1% in
the 2022 allowance as a percentage of trade and notes receivables would result in an increase or decrease in the provision for bad
debts of approximately $17 million. The selected 0.1% hypothetical change does not reflect what could be considered the best or
worst-case scenarios. Additional information concerning our allowances for credit losses may be found in Schedule II included in
this Annual Report.
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. We report inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable
value, except for inventories determined using the LIFO method which are valued at the lower of LIFO cost or market. LIFO
method presumes that the most recent inventory purchases are the first items sold and the inventory cost under LIFO approximates
market. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined using the LIFO method. The majority of the cost of
inventories held in foreign and certain domestic locations is based on the first-in, first-out (“FIFO”) method and weighted-average
purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts, and other incentives received from vendors relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory are considered product discounts and are accounted for as a reduction in the cost of inventory and are recognized when
the inventory is sold.
In determining whether an inventory valuation allowance is required, we consider various factors including estimated
quantities of slow-moving inventory by reviewing on-hand quantities, outstanding purchase obligations and forecasted sales. Shifts
in market trends and conditions, changes in customer preferences due to the introduction of generic drugs or new pharmaceutical
products or the loss of one or more significant customers are factors that could affect the value of our inventories. We write down
inventories which are considered excess and obsolete as a result of these reviews. These factors could make our estimates of
inventory valuation differ from actual results.
At March 31, 2022 and 2021, total inventories, net were $18.7 billion and $19.2 billion, respectively, in our Consolidated
Balance Sheets. The LIFO method was used to value approximately 63% and 58% of our inventories at March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. If we had used the moving average method of inventory valuation, inventories would have been approximately
$383 million and $406 million higher than the amounts reported at March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. These amounts are
equivalent to our LIFO reserves. A LIFO charge is recognized when the net effect of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-
pharmaceutical products held in inventory exceeds the impact of price declines, including the effect of branded pharmaceutical
products that have lost market exclusivity. A LIFO credit is recognized when the net effect of price declines exceeds the impact of
price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory. We recognized LIFO credits of $23 million,
$38 million, and $252 million in 2022, 2021 and, 2020, respectively, in our Consolidated Statements of Operations. The lower
LIFO credits in 2022 compared to 2021 are primarily due to higher brand inflation and delays of branded off-patent to generic drug
launches. Our LIFO valuation amount includes both pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products.
51
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We believe that the moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost of replacing
inventory (i.e., “market”). As such, our LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO or market. As of March 31, 2022 and 2021,
inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
Business Combinations: We account for business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting whereby the
identifiable assets and liabilities of the acquired business, as well as any noncontrolling interest in the acquired business, are
recorded at their estimated fair values as of the date that we obtain control of the acquired business. Any purchase consideration in
excess of the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related expenses and related
restructuring costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed. For intangible
assets, we typically use a method that is a form or variation of the income approach, whereby a forecast of future cash flows
attributable to the asset are discounted to present value using a risk-adjusted discount rate. Some of the more significant estimates
and assumptions inherent in the income approach include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows, the discount rate
selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows, and the assessment of the asset’s expected useful life. Refer to
Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report
for additional information regarding our acquisitions.
Goodwill and Long-Lived Assets:
Goodwill
As a result of acquiring businesses, we have $9.5 billion of goodwill at March 31, 2022 and 2021, and $2.1 billion and
$2.9 billion of intangible assets, net at March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. We perform an impairment test on goodwill balances
annually in the third quarter and more frequently if indicators for potential impairment exist. Indicators that are considered include
significant declines in performance relative to expected operating results, significant changes in the use of the assets, significant
negative industry or economic trends, or a significant decline in the Company’s stock price and/or market capitalization for a
sustained period of time.
Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating segment or a
component, one level below our operating segments, for which discrete financial information is available and segment management
regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
We apply the goodwill impairment test by comparing the estimated fair value of a reporting unit to its carrying value and an
impairment charge is recorded equal to the amount of excess carrying value above the estimated fair value, if any, but not to exceed
the amount of goodwill allocated to the reporting unit.
To estimate the fair value of our reporting units, we generally use a combination of the market approach and the income
approach. Under the market approach, we estimate fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses, or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, we use a discounted cash flow
model in which cash flows anticipated over several periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are discounted to
their present value using an appropriate rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within the reporting unit. In addition, we
compare the aggregate of the reporting units’ fair values to our market capitalization as further corroboration of the reasonableness
of our concluded fair values.
52
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Estimates of fair value result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on
estimates and assumptions at a point in time. Judgments made in determining an estimate of fair value may materially impact our
results of operations. The valuations are based on information available as of the impairment testing date and are based on
expectations and assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management. Any material changes in key assumptions,
including failure to meet business plans, negative changes in government reimbursement rates, deterioration in the U.S. and global
financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by market participants within the
industry, or other unanticipated events and circumstances may decrease the projected cash flows or increase the discount rates and
could potentially result in an impairment charge. Under the market approach, significant estimates and assumptions also include the
selection of appropriate guideline companies and the determination of appropriate valuation multiples to apply to the reporting unit.
Under the income approach, significant estimates and assumptions also include the determination of discount rates. The discount
rates represent the weighted-average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing, which are
weighted by the percentage of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital structure. Included in the estimate of the
weighted-average cost of capital is the assumption of an unsystematic risk premium to address incremental uncertainty related to
the reporting units’ future cash flow projections. An increase in the unsystematic risk premium increases the discount rate.
The annual impairment testing performed for 2022, 2021, and 2020 did not indicate any impairment of goodwill. The segment
change in the second quarter of 2021 prompted changes in multiple reporting units across the Company and as a result, goodwill
included in impacted reporting units was reallocated using a relative fair value approach and assessed for impairment both before
and after the reallocation. We recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $69 million in 2021 as the estimated fair value of the
Europe Retail Pharmacy reporting unit was lower than its reassigned carrying value based on changes in the composition of the
Europe Retail Pharmacy reporting unit within the International segment. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the balance of goodwill in
the International segment primarily relates to our McKesson Canada reporting unit.
The estimated fair value of our McKesson Canada reporting unit in our International segment exceeded the carrying value of
the reporting unit by 22% in 2022. The goodwill balance of this reporting unit was $1.5 billion at March 31, 2022, or approximately
16% of the consolidated goodwill balance. Generally, a decline in estimated future cash flows in excess of approximately 22% for
McKesson Canada or an increase in the discount rate in excess of approximately 2% could result in an indication of goodwill
impairment for this reporting unit in future reporting periods under the income approach. Other risks, expenses, and future
developments, such as additional government actions, increased regulatory uncertainty, and material changes in key market
assumptions may require us to further revise the projected cash flows, which could adversely affect the fair value of our other
reporting units in future periods. Refer to Financial Note 11, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” to the consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report for additional information.
Long-Lived Assets
Currently, all of our intangible and other long-lived assets are amortized or depreciated based on the pattern of their economic
consumption or a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 24 years. We review intangible and other
long-lived assets for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
value of the assets may not be recoverable. Determination of recoverability of intangible and other long-lived assets is based on the
lowest level of identifiable estimated future undiscounted cash flows resulting from the use of the asset and its eventual
disposition. Measurement of any impairment loss is based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its fair
value. Assumptions and estimates about future values and remaining useful lives of our purchased intangible assets are complex
and subjective. They can be affected by a variety of factors, including external factors such as industry and economic trends, and
internal factors such as changes in our business strategy and our internal forecasts.
Our ongoing consideration of all the factors described previously could result in further impairment charges in the future,
which could adversely affect our net income. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” to
the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for additional information on our long-lived asset impairments.
53
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Long-lived assets classified as held for sale are measured at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less costs to sell, and are
not depreciated or amortized. Fair value is determined based on the total consideration expected to be received by the Company.
The fair value of a disposal group, less any costs to sell, is assessed each reporting period it remains classified as held for sale and
any remeasurement to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell is reported as an adjustment to the carrying value of
the disposal group. When the net realizable value of a disposal group increases during a period, a gain can be recognized to the
extent that it does not increase the value of the disposal group beyond its original carrying value when the disposal group was
reclassified as held for sale.
Valuation of Equity Method Investments: We evaluate our investments for other-than-temporary impairments when
circumstances indicate those assets may be impaired. When the decline in value is deemed to be other than temporary, an
impairment is recognized to the extent that the fair value is less than the carrying value of the investment. We consider various
factors in determining whether a loss in value of an investment is other than temporary including: the length of time and the extent
to which the fair value has been below cost, the financial condition of the investees, and our intent and ability to retain the
investment for a period of time sufficient to allow for recovery of value. Management makes certain judgments and estimates in its
assessment including but not limited to: identifying if circumstances indicate a decline in value is other than temporary,
expectations about the business operations of investees, as well as industry, financial, and market factors. Any significant changes
in assumptions or judgments in assessing impairments could result in an impairment charge.
Income Taxes: Our income tax expense and deferred tax assets and liabilities reflect management’s best assessment of
estimated current and future taxes to be paid. We are subject to income taxes in the U.S. and numerous foreign jurisdictions.
Significant judgments and estimates are required in determining the consolidated income tax provision and in evaluating income
tax uncertainties, including those used to conclude on the tax-free nature of the separation of the Change Healthcare JV and the
unrecognized tax position related to opioid-related litigation and claims, and may differ from the actual amounts of tax benefit
recognized. We review our tax positions at the end of each quarter and adjust the balances as new information becomes available.
Deferred income taxes arise from temporary differences between the tax and financial statement recognition of revenue and
expense. In evaluating our ability to recover our deferred tax assets, we consider all available positive and negative evidence
including our past operating results, the existence of cumulative net operating losses in the most recent years, and our forecast of
future taxable income. In estimating future taxable income, we develop assumptions including the amount of future federal, state,
and foreign pre-tax operating income, the reversal of temporary differences, and the implementation of feasible and prudent tax
planning strategies. These assumptions require significant judgment about the forecasts of future taxable income and are consistent
with the plans and estimates we use to manage the underlying businesses.
Changes in tax laws and rates could also affect recorded deferred tax assets and liabilities in the future. Should tax laws
change, our tax expense and cash flows could be materially impacted.
In addition, the calculation of our tax liabilities includes estimates for uncertainties in the application of complex new tax
regulations across multiple global jurisdictions where we conduct our operations.
We recognize liabilities for tax and related interest for issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on our estimate of
whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes and related interest will be due. If our current estimate of tax and interest
liabilities is less than the ultimate settlement, an additional charge to income tax expense may result. If our current estimate of tax
and interest liabilities is more than the ultimate settlement, a reduction to income tax expense may be recognized.
Loss Contingencies: We are subject to various claims, including claims with customers and vendors, pending and potential
legal actions for damages, investigations relating to laws and regulations and other matters arising out of the normal conduct of our
business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, we record a liability in the amount of our best estimate for
the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to a particular contingency is often difficult to predict, and
determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be practicable based on the information available and the
potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will determine the ultimate resolution of the contingency.
Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many years, during which time relevant developments and new
information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the likelihood of potential loss and whether it is possible to
reasonably estimate a range of possible loss. When a material loss is reasonably possible or probable but a reasonable estimate
cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided. Legal fees are recognized as incurred when the legal services are
provided.
54
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
We review all contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and to assess whether a
reasonable estimate of the potential loss or range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a meaningful
estimate of loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on future negotiations with or
decisions by third parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system, and other interested parties. In conjunction with the
preparation of the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report, we considered matters related to ongoing
controlled substances claims to which we are a party. On February 25, 2022, the Company and two other U.S. pharmaceutical
distribution companies (collectively, “Distributors”) determined that there is sufficient state and subdivision participation to
proceed with an agreement to settle a substantial majority of opioid-related lawsuits filed against the Distributors by U.S. states,
territories, and local governmental entities. Based on our estimated liability under the Settlement and to governmental entities not
expected to participate in the settlement, we recorded a charge of $8.1 billion for the year ended March 31, 2021 within “Claims
and litigation charges, net” in our Consolidated Statement of Operations included in this Annual Report. In connection with the
Settlement and other opioid-related settlement accruals, we recorded additional charges of $274 million during the year ended
March 31, 2022 within “Claims and litigation charges, net,” in our Consolidated Statement of Operations. Because of the many
uncertainties associated with the remaining opioid-related litigation matters, we are not able to reasonably estimate the upper or
lower ends of the range of ultimate possible loss for all opioid-related litigation matters. While we are not able to predict the
outcome or reasonably estimate a range of possible losses in these matters, an adverse judgment or negotiated resolution in any of
these matters could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position, cash flows, or liquidity. Refer to
Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual
Report for additional information.
FINANCIAL CONDITION, LIQUIDITY, AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
We expect our available cash generated from operations and our short-term investment portfolio, together with our existing
sources of liquidity from our credit facilities and commercial paper program, will be sufficient to fund our short-term and long-term
capital expenditures, working capital, and other cash requirements. We remain well-capitalized with access to liquidity from our
$4.0 billion revolving credit facility. At March 31, 2022, we were in compliance with all debt covenants, and believe we have the
ability to continue to meet our debt covenants in the future.
55
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
The following table summarizes the net change in cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash for the periods shown:
Years Ended March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 Change
Net cash provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 4,434 $ 4,542 $ (108)
Investing activities (89) (415) 326 
Financing activities (6,321) (1,693) (4,628)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 55 (61) 116 
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash classified within Assets held for sale (540) — (540)
Net change in cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ (2,461)$ 2,373 $(4,834)
(1) Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for further
information.
Operating Activities
Net cash provided from operating activities was $4.4 billion and $4.5 billion for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. Cash flows from operations can be significantly impacted by factors such as the timing of receipts from customers,
inventory receipts, and payments to vendors. Additionally, working capital is primarily a function of sales and purchase volumes,
inventory requirements, and vendor payment terms. Operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 were affected by net
income adjusted for non-cash items, including the losses on our European businesses held for sale and our classifications of
receivables, drafts and accounts payables, and inventories as held for sale. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the
consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report for further information. Excluding the aforementioned
classifications, operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 were affected by increases in inventory of $1.2 billion and
drafts and accounts payable of $2.8 billion due to timing of purchases, and an increase in receivables of $1.8 billion resulting from
timing of collections and higher revenues. Operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2021 were affected by net income
adjusted for non-cash items, including the pre-tax $8.1 billion (after-tax $6.8 billion) non-cash charge related to our estimated
liability for opioid-related claims, an increase in inventory of $2.3 billion and an increase in drafts and accounts payable of $1.3
billion driven by higher inventory stock levels to meet increased volume demand as part of our inventory management, as well as a
decrease in receivables of $1.1 billion driven by timing, higher sales recognized at the end of March 2020, and higher collections in
our fourth quarter of 2021.
Other non-cash items within operating activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes an adjustment to net income of
$191 million related to loss on debt extinguishment, non-cash inventory charges totaling $164 million on certain PPE and other
related products in our Medical-Surgical Solutions segment, and stock-based compensation of $161 million. Other non-cash items
for the year ended March 31, 2021 primarily includes stock-based compensation of $151 million and fair value remeasurement
charges of $58 million related to the contribution of our German pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture with WBA.
Investing Activities
Net cash used in investing activities was $89 million and $415 million for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 include $388 million and $147 million in capital expenditures
for property, plant, and equipment and capitalized software, respectively. Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022
also includes net cash proceeds of $578 million from sales of businesses and investments, primarily driven by our European
divestiture activities described above including the disposal of our Austria business, and the sale of certain of our equity
investments.
Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2021 include $451 million and $190 million in capital expenditures for
property, plant, and equipment and capitalized software, respectively. Investing activities for the year ended March 31, 2021 also
includes net cash proceeds of $400 million from sales of businesses and investments, including $286 million in exchange for the
contribution of our German pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture with WBA.(1)
56
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Financing Activities
Net cash used in financing activities was $6.3 billion and $1.7 billion for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 include cash receipts of $11.2 billion and payments of $11.2
billion for short-term borrowings of commercial paper. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 include a cash
tender offer of $1.1 billion to redeem certain notes with a principal amount of $922 million and the redemption of our 0.63% Euro-
denominated notes with a principal amount of €600 million (or, approximately $709 million) prior to the maturity date of August
17, 2021 using cash on hand. This resulted in total repayments of long-term debt during the year ended March 31, 2022 of
$1.8 billion, including $184 million of cash paid for premiums and transaction fees. This was partially offset by the issuance of
long-term debt in August 2021 from a public offering of 1.30% notes due August 15, 2026 for proceeds received of $498 million,
which was utilized for general corporate purposes. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 also include $3.5 billion
of cash paid for share repurchases and $277 million of cash paid for dividends. Additionally, financing activities for the year ended
March 31, 2022 include payments of $1.0 billion to purchase shares of McKesson Europe through exercises of a put right option by
noncontrolling shareholders. Cash used for other financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2022 includes payments to
noncontrolling interests, and funds temporarily held on behalf of unaffiliated medical practice groups.
Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2021 include cash receipts of $6.3 billion and payments of $6.3 billion from
short-term borrowings of commercial paper, along with the issuance of the 2025 Notes in a principal amount of $500 million, the
retirement of our $700 million total principal amount of notes due on November 30, 2020 at a fixed interest rate of 3.65% upon
maturity, and the redemption of our 4.75% $323 million total principal of notes due on March 1, 2021 prior to maturity. The notes
were redeemed using cash on hand and proceeds from the 2025 Notes. Financing activities for the year ended March 31, 2021 also
include $742 million of cash paid for stock repurchases and $276 million of dividends paid. Cash used for other financing activities
generally includes payments to noncontrolling interests and activity from our finance leases. Other financing activities for the year
ended March 31, 2021 also include restricted cash net inflow related to funds temporarily held on behalf of unaffiliated medical
practice groups.
Share Repurchase Plans
The Board has authorized the repurchase of McKesson’s common stock from time to time in open market transactions,
privately negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by combinations of such methods, any of
which may use pre-arranged trading plans that are designed to meet the requirements of Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934. The timing of any repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors,
including our stock price, corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under our debt obligations, and other market and
economic conditions. During the last two years, our share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions and
ASR programs with third-party financial institutions.
Information regarding the share repurchase activity over the last two years is as follows:
Share Repurchases 
(In millions, except price per shar e data)Total
Number of
Shares
Purchased Average Price
Paid Per ShareApproximate
Dollar Value of
Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased
Under the
Programs
Balance, March 31, 2020 $ 1,535 
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2021 2,000 
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.7 $ 160.33 (750)
Balance, March 31, 2021 2,785 
Shares repurchased - May 2021 ASR 5.2 $ 193.22 (1,000)
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.6 $ 217.73 (1,007)
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2022 4,000 
Shares repurchased - February 2022 ASR 4.8 $ 265.56 (1,500)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 3,278 (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
57
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
(1) This table does not include the value of equity awards surrendered to satisfy tax withholding obligations or forfeitures of equity awards.
(2) The number of shares purchased reflects rounding adjustments.
(3) Of the total dollar value, $8 million was accrued within “Other accrued liabilities” in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31,
2021 for share repurchases that were executed in late March and settled in early April.
(4) In February 2022, the Company entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $1.5 billion of the
Company’ s common stock. The average price paid per share and total number of shares purchased under this program are estimates based
on the initial share purchas e price and initial delivery of shares under an ASR agreement and may differ from the average price paid per
share and total number of shares purchased under the ASR program upon its final settlement in May 2022.
We believe that our future operating cash flow, financial assets, and current access to capital and credit markets, including our
existing credit facilities, will give us the ability to meet our financing needs for the foreseeable future. However, there can be no
assurance that an increase in volatility or disruption in the global capital and credit markets will not impair our liquidity or increase
our costs of borrowing.
Selected Measures of Liquidity and Capital Resources
March 31,
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 3,935 $ 6,396 
Working capital (2,235) 1,279 
Days sales outstanding for: 
Customer receivables 22 26 
Inventories 27 31 
Drafts and accounts payable 55 63 
Debt to capital ratio 114.5 % 83.1 %
(1) Based on year -end balances and sales or cost of sales for the last 90 days of the year .
(2) This ratio describes the relationship and changes within our capital resources, and is computed as the sum of short-term borrowings, current
portion of long-term debt, and long-term debt divide d by the sum of short-term borrowings, current portion of long-term debt, long-term
debt, and McKesson stockholders’  equity (deficit), which excludes noncontrolling and redeemable noncon trolling interests and accumulated
other comprehensive loss.
Cash equivalents, which are readily convertible to known amounts of cash, are carried at fair value. Cash equivalents are
primarily invested in AAA-rated U.S. government money market funds and overnight deposits with financial institutions. Deposits
with financial institutions are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our foreign subsidiaries,
including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollars. We mitigate the risk of our short-term investment portfolio by
depositing funds with reputable financial institutions and monitoring risk profiles and investment strategies of money market funds.
Our cash and cash equivalents balance as of March 31, 2022 and 2021 included approximately $1.5 billion and $2.3 billion of
cash held by our subsidiaries outside of the U.S., respectively. Our primary intent is to utilize this cash for foreign operations for an
indefinite period of time. Although the vast majority of cash held outside the U.S. is available for repatriation, doing so could
subject us to foreign withholding taxes and state income taxes. Following enactment of the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, the
repatriation of cash to the U.S. is generally no longer taxable for federal income tax purposes.
Working capital primarily includes cash and cash equivalents, receivables, and inventories, net of drafts and accounts payable,
short-term borrowings, current portion of long-term debt, and other accrued liabilities. Our businesses require substantial
investments in working capital that are susceptible to large variations during the year as a result of inventory purchase patterns and
seasonal demands. Inventory purchase activity is a function of sales activity and other requirements.(1)
(2)
58
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Consolidated working capital decreased at March 31, 2022 compared to the prior year primarily due to a decrease in cash and
cash equivalents and receivables, as well as an increase in other accrued liabilities and an increase in our current portion of debt,
partially offset by a decrease in drafts and accounts payable, and an increase in net current assets held for sale related to our E.U.
disposal group and U.K. disposal group. Consolidated working capital improved at March 31, 2021 compared to the prior year
primarily due to an increase in cash and cash equivalents and inventory, partially offset by an increase in drafts and accounts
payable and a decrease in receivables.
Our debt to capital ratio increased for the year ended March 31, 2022 primarily due to an increase in McKesson stockholders’
deficit driven by share repurchases, partially offset by net income for the year to date period. Our debt to capital ratio was also
impacted by a decrease in total debt from the completion of a cash tender offer to redeem certain notes with a principal amount of
$922 million and the redemption of our €600 million Euro-denominated notes both in July 2021, partially offset by the issuance of
notes with a principal amount of $500 million in August 2021. Our debt to capital ratio increased for 2021 primarily due to a
decrease in stockholders’ equity driven by net loss for the year and share repurchases.
On July 23, 2021, we raised our quarterly dividend from $0.42 to $0.47 per common share for dividends declared on or after
such date by the Board. Dividends were $1.83 per share in 2022 and $1.67 per share in 2021. We anticipate that we will continue to
pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future dividends remain within the discretion of
the Board and will depend upon our future earnings, financial condition, capital requirements, and other factors. In 2022 and 2021,
we paid total cash dividends of $277 million and $276 million, respectively.
Our redeemable noncontrolling interests primarily related to our consolidated subsidiary, McKesson Europe. At March 31,
2021, the carrying value was $1.3 billion and we owned approximately 78% of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares.
Under the Domination Agreement, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe had a right to put (“Put Right”) their
shares at €22.99 per share, increased annually for interest in the amount of five percentage points above a base rate published semi-
annually by the German Bundesbank, less any compensation amount or guaranteed dividend already paid by McKesson (“Put
Amount”). During 2022 and 2021, we paid $1.0 billion and $49 million, respectively, to purchase 34.5 million and 1.8 million
shares, respectively, of McKesson Europe through exercises of the Put Right by the noncontrolling shareholders, which reduced the
balance of our redeemable noncontrolling interests.
The Put Right expired on June 15, 2021, at which point the remaining shares owned by the minority shareholders, valued at
$287 million, were transferred from redeemable noncontrolling interests to noncontrolling interests. At March 31, 2022, we owned
approximately 95% of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares.
Additionally, we are obligated to pay an annual recurring compensation of €0.83 per McKesson Europe share (the
“Compensation Amount”) to the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe under the Domination Agreement. The
Compensation Amount is recognized ratably during the applicable annual period in “Net income attributable to noncontrolling
interests” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. The Domination Agreement does not expire, but it may be terminated at
the end of any fiscal year by giving at least six months’ advance notice.
Our noncontrolling interest in McKesson Europe will be included in the sale of our E.U. disposal group, as discussed in more
detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the accompanying consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report.
Refer to Financial Note 8, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” to the accompanying consolidated
financial statements included in this Annual Report for additional information regarding redeemable noncontrolling interests.
59
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Continued)
Material Cash Requirements:
The table and information below presents our significant financial obligations and commitments as of March 31, 2022:
Years
(In millions) Total Within 1 Over 1 to 3 Over 3 to 5 After 5
On balance sheet
Total debt $ 5,879 $ 799 $ 1,001 $ 2,400 $ 1,679 
Operating lease obligations 1,815 328 578 403 506 
Other 144 19 29 30 66 
Off balance sheet
Interest on borrowings 1,085 164 252 199 470 
Purchase obligations 6,294 6,195 99 — — 
Other 451 309 51 27 64 
Total $ 15,668 $ 7,814 $ 2,010 $ 3,059 $ 2,785 
(1) Represents maturities of the Company’ s long-term obligations, including an immaterial amount of finance lease obligations.
(2) Represents undiscounted minimum operating lease obligations under non-cancelable operating leases having an initial remaining term over
one year and is not adjusted for imputed interest. Refer to Financial Note 10, “Leases” to the consolidate d financial statements included in
this Annual Report for more information.
(3) Includes our estimated benefit payments for the unfunded benefit plans and minimum funding requirements for the pension plans.
(4) Represents interest that will become due on our fixed rate long-term debt obligations.
(5) Primarily relates to the expected purchase of goods and services, including inventory and capital commitm ents, from vendors in the normal
course of business.
(6) Includes agreements under which we have guaranteed  the repurchase of our customers’  inventory and our customers’  debt in the event these
customers are unable to meet their obligations to those financial institutions.
The material cash requirements table above excludes the following obligations:
As of March 31, 2022, the Company accrued $8.3 billion related to the settlement of opioid-related litigation claims with
governmental entities, as described in the “Trends and Uncertainties” section of this Financial Review and Financial Note 18,
“Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” to the consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report. The majority of
this amount relates to a global settlement payable in annual installments for up to 18 years pursuant to the schedule set forth in the
agreement. We expect to pay $1.0 billion prior to March 31, 2023.
At March 31, 2022, the liability recorded for uncertain tax positions, excluding associated interest and penalties, was
approximately $1.0 billion. The ultimate amount and timing of any related future cash settlements cannot be predicted with
reasonable certainty.
Our banks and insurance companies have issued $214 million of standby letters of credit and surety bonds at March 31, 2022.
These were issued on our behalf and are mostly related to our customer contracts and to meet the security requirements for
statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations, pension obligations in Europe, and our workers’ compensation and
automotive liability programs. (1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (4)
 (5)
(6)
60
Table of Contents MD&A Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL REVIEW (Concluded)
Credit Resources:
We fund our working capital requirements primarily with cash and cash equivalents as well as short-term borrowings from our
commercial paper issuances. Funds necessary for future debt maturities and our other cash requirements, including any future
payments that may be made related to our total estimated litigation liability of $8.3 billion as of March 31, 2022 for opioid-related
claims, are expected to be met by existing cash balances, cash flow from operations, existing credit sources, and other capital
market transactions. Long-term debt markets and commercial paper markets, our primary sources of capital after cash flow from
operations, are open and accessible to us should we decide to access those markets. Detailed information regarding our debt and
financing activities is included in Financial Note 12, “Debt and Financing Activities,” to the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report.
RELATED PARTY BALANCES AND TRANSACTIONS
Information regarding our related party balances and transactions is included in Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and
Divestitures,” and Financial Note 20, “Related Party Balances and Transactions,” to the consolidated financial statements included
in this Annual Report.
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
New accounting pronouncements that we have recently adopted, as well as those that have been recently issued but not yet
adopted by us, are included in Financial Note 1, “Significant Accounting Policies,” to the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report.
Item 7A.    Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk.
Interest rate risk: Our long-term debt bears interest predominately at fixed rates, whereas our short-term borrowings are at
variable interest rates.
Our cash and cash equivalents balances earn interest at variable rates. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, we had $3.5 billion and
$6.3 billion, respectively, in cash and cash equivalents. The effect of a hypothetical 50 basis points increase in the underlying
interest rate on our cash and cash equivalents, net of short-term borrowings, would not have resulted in a material impact to
earnings in 2022 or 2021.
Foreign currency exchange rate risk: We conduct our business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of our
foreign subsidiaries, including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollar. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could
have a material adverse impact on our financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. We are also exposed to foreign currency
exchange rate risk related to our foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies.
We have certain foreign currency exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency
swaps. The forward contracts and cross-currency swaps are intended to reduce the income statement effects from fluctuations in
foreign currency exchange rates and have been designated as cash flow hedges. These programs reduce but do not entirely
eliminate foreign currency exchange rate risk.
As of March 31, 2022 and 2021, the effect of a hypothetical adverse 10% change in the underlying foreign currency exchange
rates would have impacted the fair value of our foreign exchange contracts by approximately $122 million and $267 million,
respectively. However, our risk management programs are designed such that the potential loss in value of these risk management
portfolios described above would be largely offset by changes in the value of the underlying exposure. Refer to Financial Note 15,
“Hedging Activities,” for more information on our foreign currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps.
61
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
In July 2021, we announced our intention to exit our businesses in Europe. During 2022, we entered into an agreement to sell
certain of our businesses in the European Union which is anticipated to close within the second half of fiscal year 2023. We also
completed the sale of our Austrian business during 2022 and, on April 6, 2022, we completed the sale of our retail and distribution
businesses in the United Kingdom. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” to the consolidated financial statements included in
this Annual Report for more information on these divestitures. Subsequent to the completion of these divestitures, our foreign
currency exchange rate risk will be primarily limited to the Canadian dollar.
The selected hypothetical change in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates does not reflect what could be
considered the best or worst case scenarios.
62
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 8.    Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
INDEX TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL INFORMATION
Page
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 64
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 65
Consolidated Financial Statements:
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 70
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021,
and 2020 71
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2022 and 2021 72
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity (Deficit) for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 73
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 74
Financial Notes 75
Note 1 - Significant Accounting Policies 75
Note 2 - Held for Sale 83
Note 3 - Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net 86
Note 4 - Business Acquisitions and Divestitures 89
Note 5 - Share-Based Compensation 91
Note 6 - Other Income, Net 95
Note 7 - Income Taxes 95
Note 8 - Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests 99
Note 9 - Earnings (Loss) per Common Share 100
Note 10 - Leases 101
Note 11 - Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net 104
Note 12 - Debt and Financing Activities 107
Note 13 - Variable Interest Entities 109
Note 14 - Pension Benefits 109
Note 15 - Hedging Activities 116
Note 16 - Fair Value Measurements 119
Note 17 - Financial Guarantees and Warranties 121
Note 18 - Commitments and Contingent Liabilities 122
Note 19 - Stockholders' Equity (Deficit) 129
Note 20 - Related Party Balances and Transactions 132
Note 21 - Segments of Business 132
63
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
MANAGEMENT’S ANNUAL REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
The management of McKesson Corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal
control over financial reporting, as such term is defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). With the participation of
the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, our management conducted an assessment of the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting based on the framework and criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated
Framework (2013), issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment,
our management has concluded that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of March 31, 2022.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, audited the financial statements included in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K and has also audited the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
March 31, 2022. This audit report appears on the following page of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
May 9, 2022
/s/ Brian S. Tyler
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
/s/ Britt J. Vitalone
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
64
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of McKesson Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of McKesson Corporation and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
March 31, 2022 and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income (loss), stockholders’ equity,
and cash flows, for each of the three years in the period ended March 31, 2022, and the related notes and the schedule listed in the
Index at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting as of March 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the
Company as of March 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended March 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also, in
our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of March 31,
2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these
financial statements and an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (“PCAOB”) and are required to
be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design
and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other
procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
65
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication
of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by
communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or
disclosures to which they relate.
Contingent Liabilities - Opioid Claims brought by United States (U.S.) Governmental Entities - Refer to Note 1 and Note 18 to
the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company and its affiliates are defendants in many cases asserting claims related to distribution of controlled substances,
including opioids. The Company is named as a defendant along with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors, pharmaceutical
manufacturers and retail pharmacy chains. The plaintiffs in these actions include state attorneys general, county and municipal
governments, hospitals, tribal nations, health and welfare funds, third-party payors and individuals.
On February 25, 2022, the Company and two other United States pharmaceutical distribution companies (collectively,
"Distributors") determined that there is sufficient State and subdivision participation to proceed with an agreement ("Settlement")
to settle a substantial majority of opioid-related lawsuits filed against the Distributors by U.S. states, territories and local
governmental entities (collectively, "Settling Governmental Entities"). The Settlement became effective on April 2, 2022. If all
conditions to the Settlement are satisfied, the Distributors would pay the Settling Governmental Entities up to approximately $19.5
billion over 18 years, with up to approximately $7.4 billion to be paid by the Company for its 38.1% portion. Although the
Settlement terminated the substantial majority of opioid-related suits pending against the Company, a small number of subdivisions
in participating states have opted not to participate in the Settlement, and those suits remain pending. The Company continues to
prepare for trial in these pending matters, and believes that it has valid defenses to the claims pending against it, and it intends to
vigorously defend against all such claims if acceptable settlement terms are not achieved.
When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, the Company records a liability in the amount of its estimate for the
ultimate loss. The Company reviews all loss contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has
changed and to assess whether a reasonable estimate of the loss or range of loss can be made. The Company also performs an
assessment of loss contingencies where a loss is reasonably possible. If it is reasonably possible that a loss may have been incurred
and the effect on the financial statements could be material, the Company discloses the nature of the loss contingency and an
estimate of the possible loss or range of loss or a statement that such an estimate cannot be made within the notes to the financial
statements. For the year ended March 31, 2022, management believes that a loss from opioid claims is both probable and
reasonably estimable, and accordingly, an $8.3 billion liability has been recorded by management, inclusive of claims brought by
U.S. governmental entities, which represents the Company’s best estimate of future loss related to opioid litigation.
66
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
We identified the liabilities associated with opioid claims brought by both Settling Governmental Entities, as well as U.S.
governmental entities who are not party to the Settlement, collectively “Governmental Entities,” as a critical audit matter because
of the significant judgment in auditing management’s accounting for these matters. Such judgment led to an increased extent of
effort, including the need to involve specialists. Specifically, auditing management’s assessment of the magnitude of the liability
and the determination of whether there is a reasonably estimable range of loss in excess of the amount accrued, is subjective and
requires significant judgment given the size and complexity of opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities included the following,
among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls related to liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental
Entities, and approval of the accounting treatment and related disclosures.
•We inquired of the Company’s internal and external legal counsel, as well as executives and other members of management, to
understand the basis for the Company’s conclusion that a loss related to opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities is
probable and reasonably estimable, and that it is not possible to estimate a range of loss in excess of the amount accrued as of
March 31, 2022. In addition, we inspected responses to inquiry letters sent to both internal and external legal counsel as it
relates to the terms of settlements with Governmental Entities. We also made inquiries of legal counsel regarding the status of
discussions and legal proceedings with Governmental Entities who are not currently party to the Settlement.
•We evaluated management’s analysis of liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities, including the
methodology used by management to determine the probability of such loss and conclusion that it is not possible to estimate a
range of loss in excess of the amount accrued as of March 31, 2022. We also evaluated the methodology used by management
to estimate the most likely loss to be incurred by the Company as a result of these specific opioid claims.
•We examined Board of Directors meeting minutes, including relevant sub-committee meeting minutes, held inquiries with a
director serving on the sub-committee, and compared to internal and external counsel’s written responses to our inquiry letters.
•With the assistance of our specialists in accounting for loss contingencies, we evaluated the facts, evidence and the Company’s
related accounting treatment for liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities.
•We evaluated any events subsequent to March 31, 2022 that might impact management’s accounting treatment.
•We obtained written representations from executives and internal counsel of the Company.
•We examined the terms related to settlements with Governmental Entities.
•We evaluated the adequacy of the Company’s related disclosures for consistency with our testing.
Uncertain Tax Position - Opioid Claims brought by Governmental Entities - Refer to Note 1 and Note 7 to the financial
statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company has recorded charges and related tax benefit for opioid-related claims, inclusive of those brought by Governmental
Entities. In order to account for the uncertainty associated with the ultimate realization of the tax benefit related to opioid claims,
the Company recorded an uncertain tax position reserve. Tax benefits from uncertain tax positions are recognized when it is more
likely than not that the position will be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation
processes, based on the technical merits. The net amount recognized by management is measured as the largest amount of tax
benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of being realized. The Company uses significant judgment in evaluating the technical
tax merits of income tax benefits that qualify for recognition, including the determination of the amount that is more likely than not
of being realized for U.S. federal and state income tax purposes.
67
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
We identified the Company’s uncertain tax position related to liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental
Entities as a critical audit matter because of the challenges in auditing management’s estimate of the amount of income tax benefit
that qualifies for recognition. Specifically, there is significant judgment associated with the assessment of the technical tax merits of
such a settlement, including the related interpretation of applicable, newly-enacted tax laws and regulations. Auditing the uncertain
tax position related to liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities required a high degree of auditor
judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve our tax specialists.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the Company's uncertain tax position associated with liabilities arising from opioid claims brought
by Governmental Entities included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls related to the Company’s assessment of the technical merits of its tax position,
including the Company’s assessment as to the amount of benefit that is more likely than not to be realized upon settlement with
a taxing authority that has full knowledge of all relevant information.
•With the assistance of our tax specialists, we evaluated the facts, evidence and the Company’s related income tax analysis for
liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities, including assumptions used by management to
measure the related recognized and unrecognized tax benefits.
•We inquired of the Company’s internal and external legal counsel to understand the basis for the Company’s conclusion that a
portion of the liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities would be deductible based on the
settlement terms, and expected documentation to be received from Governmental Entities regarding how settlement funds are
used.
•We held inquiries with the Company’s internal and external income tax specialists related to the uncertain tax position for
liabilities arising from opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities.
•We compared management's income tax assessment of this matter to the Company’s treatment of other recorded opioid charges
to evaluate the consistency of the Company’s judgments related to the uncertain tax position.
•We evaluated any events subsequent to March 31, 2022 that might impact management’s accounting treatment.
•We obtained written representations from executives and internal counsel of the Company.
•We examined terms related to settlements of opioid claims brought by Governmental Entities.
•We evaluated the Company’s related disclosures for consistency with our testing and also searched for contradictory evidence
by reading disclosures from peer companies, who are also party to the opioid litigation with Governmental Entities.
Goodwill - Refer to Note 1 and Note 11 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company’s evaluation of goodwill for impairment involves comparing the carrying amount of each reporting unit to its fair
value on the first day of the third fiscal quarter or whenever the Company believes a potential indicator of impairment requiring a
more frequent assessment has occurred. The Company uses a combination of the income and market approaches to estimate
reporting unit fair value. Under the market approach, fair value is estimated by comparing the business to similar businesses, or
guideline companies whose equity securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, the Company uses a
discounted cash flow (“DCF”) model where cash flows anticipated over future periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time
horizon, are discounted to their present value using an appropriate discount rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within
the reporting unit. The rate used to discount to present value includes an unsystematic risk premium, which is intended to address
uncertainty related to the reporting unit’s future cash flow projections. The goodwill balance was $9.5 billion as of March 31, 2022,
of which $1.5 billion was allocated to the McKesson Canada reporting unit. The fair value of all reporting units exceeded their
respective carrying amounts as of the measurement date and, therefore, no impairment was recognized.
68
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
We identified the estimation of the fair value of the McKesson Canada reporting unit used to evaluate the recoverability of goodwill
as a critical audit matter because of the challenges auditing significant judgments used in the selection of a discount rate, including
the unsystematic risk premium. In particular, the fair value estimate is sensitive to the unsystematic risk premium assumption,
which is affected by potential additional risk of changes in the Canadian business and regulatory environments. Auditing
management’s selected discount rate required a high degree of auditor judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the
need to involve our fair value specialists.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the Company’s selection of a discount rate, including determination of the unsystematic risk
premium, for the McKesson Canada reporting unit, included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of internal controls related to management’s goodwill impairment evaluation, including those
related to the selection of a discount rate and determination of an unsystematic risk premium.
•We evaluated management’s ability to accurately forecast operating results for the McKesson Canada reporting unit by
comparing actual results to management’s historical forecasts, in order to consider the reasonableness and adequacy of
management’s selected unsystematic risk premium.
•As part of our assessment of the unsystematic risk premium, we evaluated the reasonableness of strategic plans expected to be
implemented during the forecast period by comparing the forecasts to:
•Actual results of historical strategic plans
•Internal communications to management and the Board of Directors
•With the assistance of our fair value specialists, we evaluated the reasonableness of the discount rate, including the
unsystematic risk premium, by developing a range of independent estimates, testing the mathematical accuracy of the
calculation, and comparing to the discount rate selected by management.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Dallas, Texas
May 9, 2022
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1968.
69
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
Years Ended March 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Revenues $ 263,966 $ 238,228 $ 231,051 
Cost of sales (250,836) (226,080) (219,028)
Gross profit 13,130 12,148 12,023 
Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses (10,537) (8,849) (9,182)
Claims and litigation charges, net (274) (7,936) (82)
Goodwill impairment charges — (69) (2)
Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net (281) (334) (268)
Total operating expenses (11,092) (17,188) (9,534)
Operating income (loss) 2,038 (5,040) 2,489 
Other income, net 259 223 12 
Equity earnings and charges from investment in Change Healthcare Joint
Venture — — (1,108)
Loss on debt extinguishment (191) — — 
Interest expense (178) (217) (249)
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes 1,928 (5,034) 1,144 
Income tax benefit (expense) (636) 695 (18)
Income (loss) from continuing operations 1,292 (4,339) 1,126 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (5) (1) (6)
Net income (loss) 1,287 (4,340) 1,120 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (173) (199) (220)
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 1,114 $ (4,539) $ 900 
Earnings (loss) per common share attributable to McKesson Corporation
Diluted
Continuing operations $ 7.26 $ (28.26) $ 4.99 
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.04)
Total $ 7.23 $ (28.26) $ 4.95 
Basic
Continuing operations $ 7.35 $ (28.26) $ 5.01 
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.03)
Total $ 7.32 $ (28.26) $ 4.98 
Weighted-average common shares outstanding
Diluted 154.1 160.6 181.6 
Basic 152.3 160.6 180.6 
See Financial Notes
70
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS)
(In millions)
 
 Years Ended March 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net income (loss) $ 1,287 $ (4,340) $ 1,120 
Other comprehensive income, net of tax
Foreign currency translation adjustments 60 184 (66)
Unrealized gains (losses) on cash flow hedges 14 (36) 86 
Changes in retirement-related benefit plans 41 22 129 
Other comprehensive income, net of tax 115 170 149 
Comprehensive income (loss) 1,402 (4,170) 1,269 
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests (172) (146) (223)
Comprehensive income (loss) attributable to McKesson Corporation $ 1,230 $ (4,316) $ 1,046 
See Financial Notes
71
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except per share amounts)
March 31,
2022 2021
ASSETS
Current assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,532 $ 6,278 
Receivables, net 18,583 19,181 
Inventories, net 18,702 19,246 
Assets held for sale 4,516 12 
Prepaid expenses and other 898 665 
Total current assets 46,231 45,382 
Property, plant, and equipment, net 2,092 2,581 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 1,548 2,100 
Goodwill 9,451 9,493 
Intangible assets, net 2,059 2,878 
Other non-current assets 1,917 2,581 
Total assets $ 63,298 $ 65,015 
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS, AND EQUITY (DEFICIT)
Current liabilities
Drafts and accounts payable $ 38,086 $ 38,975 
Current portion of long-term debt 799 742 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 297 390 
Liabilities held for sale 4,741 9 
Other accrued liabilities 4,543 3,987 
Total current liabilities 48,466 44,103 
Long-term debt 5,080 6,406 
Long-term deferred tax liabilities 1,418 1,411 
Long-term operating lease liabilities 1,366 1,867 
Long-term litigation liabilities 7,220 8,067 
Other non-current liabilities 1,540 1,715 
Commitments and contingent liabilities (Note 18)
Redeemable noncontrolling interests — 1,271 
McKesson Corporation stockholders’ deficit
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value, 100 shares authorized, no shares issued or outstanding — — 
Common stock, $0.01 par value, 800 shares authorized, 275 and 273 shares issued at
March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively 2 2 
Additional paid-in capital 7,275 6,925 
Retained earnings 9,030 8,202 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (1,534) (1,480)
Treasury shares, at cost, 130 and 115 shares at March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively (17,045) (13,670)
Total McKesson Corporation stockholders’ deficit (2,272) (21)
Noncontrolling interests 480 196 
Total equity (deficit) (1,792) 175 
Total liabilities, redeemable noncontrolling interests, and equity (deficit) $ 63,298 $ 65,015 
See Financial Notes
72
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (DEFICIT)
(In millions, except per share amounts)
McKesson Corporation Stockholders’  Equity (Deficit)
Common
StockAdditional
Paid-in
CapitalOther
CapitalRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Compr ehensive
LossTreasury
Noncontr olling
Inter estsTotal
Equity
(Deficit) Shar es AmountCommon
Shar es Amount
Balances, Mar ch 31, 2019 271 $ 3 $ 6,435  $ (2)$12,409  $ (1,849 ) (81)$(8,902 )$ 193 $8,287  
Opening retained earnings adjustments:
adoption of new accounting standards — — — — 11 — — — — 11 
Balances, April 1, 2019 271 3 6,435  (2) 12,420  (1,849 ) (81) (8,902 ) 193 8,298  
Issuance of shares under employee plans,
net of forfeitures 1 — 113 — — — — (20) — 93 
Share-based compensation — — 115 — — — — — — 115 
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (154) (154)
Other comprehensive income — — — — — 146 — — — 146 
Net income — — — — 900 — — — 178 1,078  
Repurchase of common stock — — — — — — (14) (1,934 ) — (1,934 )
Change Healthcare share exchange — — — — — — (15) (2,036 ) — (2,036 )
Cash dividends declared, $ 1.62 per common
share — — — — (294) — — — — (294)
Other — (1) — 2 (4) — — — — (3)
Balances, Mar ch 31, 2020 272 2 6,663  — 13,022  (1,703 ) (110)(12,892 ) 217 5,309  
Opening retained earnings adjustments:
adoption of new accounting standard — — — — (13) — — — — (13)
Balances, April 1, 2020 272 2 6,663  — 13,009  (1,703 ) (110)(12,892 ) 217 5,296  
Issuance of shares under employee plans,
net of forfeitures 1 — 92 — — — — (28) — 64 
Share-based compensation — — 151 — — — — — — 151 
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (177) (177)
Other comprehensive income — — — — — 223 — — — 223 
Net income (loss) — — — — (4,539 ) — — — 156 (4,383 )
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe AG — — 3 — — — — — — 3 
Repurchase of common stock — — — — — — (5) (750) — (750)
Cash dividends declared, $ 1.67 per common
share — — — — (270) — — — — (270)
Other — — 16 — 2 — — — — 18 
Balances, Mar ch 31, 2021 273 2 6,925  — 8,202  (1,480 ) (115)(13,670 ) 196 175 
Issuance of shares under employee plans,
net of forfeitures 2 — 220 — — — — (71) — 149 
Share-based compensation — — 154 — — — — — — 154 
Payments to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — (155) (155)
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — — — 116 — — (4) 112 
Net income — — — — 1,114 — — — 165 1,279  
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe AG — — 178 — — (170) — — — 8 
Repurchase of common stock — — (204) — — — (15) (3,304 ) — (3,508 )
Reclassification of McKesson Europe AG
redeemable noncontrolling interests — — — — — — — — 287 287 
Reclassification of recurring compensation
to other accrued liabilities — — — — — — — — (7) (7)
Cash dividends declared, $ 1.83 per common
share — — — — (279) — — — — (279)
Other — — 2 — (7) — — — (2) (7)
Balances, Mar ch 31, 2022 275 $ 2 $ 7,275  $ — $9,030  $ (1,534 ) (130)$(17,045 )$ 480 $(1,792 )
See Financial Notes
73
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
 Years Ended Mar ch 31,
 2022 2021 2020
OPERA TING ACTIVITIES
Net income (loss) $ 1,287  $ (4,340 ) $ 1,120  
Adjustments to reconcile to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation 279 321 321 
Amortization 481 566 601 
Goodwill and long-lived asset impairment char ges 175 242 139 
Equity earnings and char ges from investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture — — 1,084  
Deferred taxes 34 (908) (342)
Credits associated with last-in, first-out inventory method (23) (38) (252)
Non-cash operating lease expense 241 334 366 
Loss (gain) from sales of businesses and investments (132) (9) 33 
European businesses held for sale 1,509  — — 
Other non-cash items 501 188 615 
Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:
Receivables (1,843 ) 1,145  (2,494 )
Inventories (1,169 ) (2,276 ) (376)
Drafts and accounts payable 2,802  1,267  3,952  
Operating lease liabilities (356) (362) (377)
Taxes 243 (166) (8)
Litigation liabilities 199 8,067  — 
Other 206 511 (8)
Net cash provided by operating activities 4,434  4,542  4,374  
INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Payments for property , plant, and equipment (388) (451) (362)
Capitalized software expenditures (147) (190) (144)
Acquisitions, net of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash acquired (6) (35) (133)
Proceeds from sales of businesses and investments, net 578 400 37 
Other (126) (139) 23 
Net cash used in investing activities (89) (415) (579)
FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 11,192  6,323  21,437  
Repayments of short-term borrowings (11,192 ) (6,323 ) (21,437 )
Proceeds from issuances of long-term debt 498 500 — 
Repayments of long-term debt (1,648 ) (1,040 ) (298)
Payments for debt extinguishments (184) — — 
Common stock transactions:
Issuances 220 92 113 
Share repurchases (3,516 ) (742) (1,934 )
Dividends paid (277) (276) (294)
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe AG (1,031 ) (49) (3)
Other (383) (178) (318)
Net cash used in financing activities (6,321 ) (1,693 ) (2,734 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash 55 (61) (19)
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash classified within Assets held for sale (540) — — 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash (2,461 ) 2,373  1,042  
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash at beginning of year 6,396  4,023  2,981  
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash at end of year 3,935  6,396  4,023  
Less: Restricted cash at end of year included in Prepaid expenses and other (403) (118) (8)
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 3,532  $ 6,278  $ 4,015  
SUPPLEMENT AL CASH FLOW  INFORMA TION
Cash paid for:
Interest, net $ 186 $ 220 $ 235 
Income taxes, net of refunds 359 379 368 
See Financial Notes
74
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES
1.    Significant Accounting Policies
Nature of Operations: McKesson Corporation (“McKesson,” or the “Company,”) is a diversified healthcare services leader
dedicated to advancing health outcomes for patients everywhere. McKesson’s teams partner with biopharma companies, care
providers, pharmacies, manufacturers, governments, and others to deliver insights, products, and services to help make quality care
more accessible and affordable. The Company reports its financial results in four reportable segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical,
Prescription Technology Solutions (“RxTS”), Medical-Surgical Solutions, and International. The Company’s equity method
investment in Change Healthcare LLC (“Change Healthcare JV”), which was split-off from McKesson in the fourth quarter of
2020, has been included in Other for retrospective periods presented. Refer to Financial Note 21, “Segments of Business,” for
additional information.
Basis of Presentation: The consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes are prepared in accordance with United
States (“U.S.”) generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). The consolidated financial statements of McKesson include
the financial statements of all wholly-owned subsidiaries and majority-owned or controlled companies. For those consolidated
subsidiaries where the Company’s ownership is less than 100%, the portion of the net income or loss allocable to the noncontrolling
interests is reported as “Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. All
significant intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation, including the intercompany portion of
transactions with equity method investees.
The Company considers itself to control an entity if it is the majority owner of or has voting control over such entity. The
Company also assesses control through means other than voting rights and determines which business entity is the primary
beneficiary of the variable interest entity (“VIE”). The Company consolidates VIEs when it is determined that it is the primary
beneficiary of the VIE. Investments in business entities in which the Company does not have control but has the ability to exercise
significant influence over operating and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method.
Fiscal Period: The Company’s fiscal year begins on April 1 and ends on March 31. Unless otherwise noted, all references to a
particular year shall mean the Company’s fiscal year.
Reclassifications: Certain prior period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates: The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires the Company to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts in the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes.
Actual amounts could differ from those estimated amounts. The Company continues to evaluate the ongoing impacts, including the
economic consequences, of the pandemic caused by the SARS-CoV-2 coronavirus (“COVID-19”). As COVID-19 further evolves,
the Company’s accounting estimates and assumptions may change over time and may change materially in future periods.
Cash and Cash Equivalents: All highly liquid debt and money market instruments purchased with an original maturity of three
months or less at the date of acquisition are included in cash and cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at fair value. Cash
equivalents are primarily invested in AAA-rated U.S. government money market funds and overnight deposits with financial
institutions. Deposits with financial institutions are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of the
Company’s foreign subsidiaries, including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollars. Deposits may exceed the amounts
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the U.S. and similar deposit insurance programs in other jurisdictions. The
Company mitigates the risk of its short-term investment portfolio by depositing funds with reputable financial institutions and
monitoring risk profiles and investment strategies of money market funds.
75
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Restricted Cash: Cash that is subject to legal restrictions or is unavailable for general operating purposes is classified as
restricted cash and is included in “Prepaid expenses and other” and “Other non-current assets” in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Restricted cash at March 31, 2022 primarily consists of $395 million held in escrow related to obligations under settlement
agreements for opioid-related claims of governmental entities, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and
Contingent Liabilities.” Additionally, restricted cash at March 31, 2022 and 2021 includes funds temporarily held on behalf of
unaffiliated medical practice groups related to their COVID-19 business continuity borrowings. These amounts have been
designated as restricted cash due to contractual provisions requiring their segregation from all other funds until utilized by the
medical practices for a limited list of qualified activities. Corresponding deposit liabilities associated with these funds have been
recorded by the Company within “Other accrued liabilities” in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets at March 31, 2022 and
2021.
Equity Method Investments: Investments in business entities in which the Company does not have control, but has the ability to
exercise significant influence over operating and financial policies, are accounted for using the equity method. The Company
evaluates its equity method investments for impairment whenever an event or change in circumstances occurs that may have a
significant adverse impact on the carrying value of the investment. If a loss in value has occurred that is deemed to be other-than-
temporary, an impairment loss is recorded.
Receivables, Net and Allowances for Credit Losses: The Company’s receivables are presented net of an allowance for credit
losses and primarily consist of trade accounts receivable from customers that result from the sale of goods and services.
Receivables, net also includes other receivables, which primarily represent amounts due from suppliers.
We are exposed to credit losses on accounts receivable balances. The Company estimates credit losses by considering historical
credit losses, the current economic environment, customer credit ratings, legal disputes, or bankruptcies, as well as reasonable and
supportable forecasts. Management reviews these factors quarterly to determine if any adjustments are needed to the allowance.
Trade accounts receivable represent the majority of the Company's financial assets, for which an allowance for credit losses of
$89 million and $198 million were included in “Receivables, net” on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2022 and
2021, respectively. Changes in the allowance for the year ended March 31, 2022, were primarily within the U.S Pharmaceutical and
International segments.
The following table presents the components of the Company’s receivables as of March 31, 2022 and 2021:
March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021
Customer accounts $ 16,438 $ 17,106 
Other 2,289 2,325 
Total receivables 18,727 19,431 
Allowances (144) (250)
Receivables, net $ 18,583 $ 19,181 
76
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Concentrations of Credit Risk and Receivables: The Company’s trade accounts receivable are subject to concentrations of
credit risk with customers primarily in its U.S. Pharmaceutical segment. During 2022, sales to the Company’s ten largest
customers, including group purchasing organizations (“GPOs”), accounted for approximately 52% of its total consolidated
revenues and approximately 43% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2022. Sales to the Company’s largest customer,
CVS Health Corporation (“CVS”), accounted for approximately 21% of its total consolidated revenues in 2022 and comprised
approximately 28% of total trade accounts receivable at March 31, 2022. As a result, the Company’s sales and credit concentration
is significant. The Company has agreements with GPOs, each of which functions as a purchasing agent on behalf of member
hospitals, pharmacies, and other healthcare providers, as well as with government entities and agencies. The accounts receivables
balances are with individual members of the GPOs, and therefore no significant concentration of credit risk exists. A material
default in payment, a material reduction in purchases from GPOs or any other large customers, or the loss of a large customer or
customer groups could have a material adverse impact on the Company’s financial condition, results of operations, and liquidity. In
addition, trade accounts receivables are subject to concentrations of credit risk with customers in the institutional, retail, and
healthcare provider sectors, which can be affected by a downturn in the economy and changes in reimbursement policies. This
credit risk is mitigated by the size and diversity of the Company’s customer base as well as its geographic dispersion.
Inventories: Inventories consist of merchandise held for resale. The Company reports inventories at the lower of cost or net
realizable value, except for inventories determined using the last-in, first-out (“LIFO”) method which are valued at the lower of
LIFO cost or market. The LIFO method presumes that the most recent inventory purchases are the first items sold and the inventory
cost under LIFO approximates market. The majority of the cost of domestic inventories is determined using the LIFO method. The
majority of the cost of inventories held in foreign and certain domestic locations is based on the first-in, first-out (“FIFO”) method
and weighted-average purchase prices. Rebates, cash discounts, and other incentives received from vendors are recognized in cost
of sales upon the sale of the related inventory.
At March 31, 2022 and 2021, total inventories, net were $18.7 billion and $19.2 billion, respectively, in the Company’s
Consolidated Balance Sheets. The LIFO method was used to value approximately 63% and 58% of the Company’s inventories at
March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. If the Company had used the moving average method of inventory valuation, inventories
would have been approximately $383 million and $406 million higher than the amounts reported at March 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. These amounts are equivalent to the Company’s LIFO reserves. The Company’s LIFO valuation amount includes both
pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products. The Company recognized LIFO credits of $23 million, $38 million, and $252
million in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively, in “Cost of sales” in its Consolidated Statements of Operations. The lower LIFO
credits in 2022 compared to 2021 and 2020 is primarily due to higher brand inflation and delays of branded off-patent to generic
drug launches. A LIFO charge is recognized when the net effect of price increases on pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical
products held in inventory exceeds the impact of price declines, including the effect of branded pharmaceutical products that have
lost market exclusivity. A LIFO credit is recognized when the net effect of price declines exceeds the impact of price increases on
pharmaceutical and non-pharmaceutical products held in inventory.
The Company believes that the moving average inventory costing method provides a reasonable estimation of the current cost
of replacing inventory (i.e., “market”). As such, its LIFO inventory is valued at the lower of LIFO cost or market. As of March 31,
2022 and 2021, inventories at LIFO did not exceed market.
Shipping and Handling Costs: The Company includes costs to pack and deliver inventory to its customers in “Selling,
distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in its Consolidated Statements of Operations. Shipping and handling costs of
$1.1 billion was recognized in 2022, and $1.0 billion was recognized in each of 2021 and 2020.
Held for Sale: Assets and liabilities to be disposed of by sale (“disposal groups”) are classified as “held for sale” if their
carrying amounts are principally expected to be recovered through a sale transaction rather than through continuing use. The
classification occurs when the disposal group is available for immediate sale and the sale is probable. These criteria are generally
met when management has committed to a plan to sell the assets within one year. Disposal groups are measured at the lower of
carrying amount or fair value less costs to sell, and long-lived assets included within the disposal group are not depreciated or
amortized. The fair value of a disposal group, less any costs to sell, is assessed each reporting period it remains classified as held
for sale and any remeasurement to the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell is reported as an adjustment to the
carrying value of the disposal group. When the net realizable value of a disposal group increases during a period, a gain can be
recognized to the extent that it does not increase the value of the disposal group beyond its original carrying value when the
disposal group was reclassified as held for sale. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” for additional information.
77
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Property, Plant, and Equipment, Net: Property, plant, and equipment, net is stated at historical cost and depreciated under the
straight-line method over the estimated useful life of each asset, which ranges from 15 to 30 years for building and improvements
and 3 to 15 years for machinery, equipment, and other. Leasehold improvements and property, plant, and equipment, net under
finance leases are amortized over their respective useful lives of the right-of-use (“ROU”) asset or over the term of the lease,
whichever is shorter. Depreciation and amortization begins when an asset is placed in service and ready for its intended use.
Repairs and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. When certain events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of an asset or asset group may not be recoverable, an impairment assessment may be performed on the recoverability of the
carrying amounts.
The following table presents the components of the Company’s property, plant, and equipment, net as of March 31, 2022 and
2021:
March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021
Land $ 104 $ 156 
Building and improvements 1,331 1,745 
Machinery, equipment, and other 2,338 2,512 
Construction in progress 313 382 
Total property, plant, and equipment 4,086 4,795 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,994) (2,214)
Property, plant, and equipment, net $ 2,092 $ 2,581 
Total depreciation expense for property, plant, and equipment, net and amortization of the ROU assets of finance leases was
$312 million, $344 million, and $335 million for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
Leases: The Company leases facilities and equipment primarily under operating leases. The Company recognizes lease
expense on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease, taking into account, when applicable, lessor incentives for tenant
improvements, periods where no rent payment is required, and escalations in rent payments over the term of the lease. As a
practical expedient, the Company does not separate lease components from non-lease components, such as common area
maintenance, utilities, and repairs and maintenance. Remaining terms for facility leases generally range from one to 15 years, while
remaining terms for equipment leases generally range from one to five years. Most real property leases contain renewal options
(typically for five-year increments). Generally, the renewal option periods are not included within the lease term as the Company is
not reasonably certain to exercise that right at lease commencement. The Company’s lease agreements do not contain any material
residual value guarantees or material restrictive covenants.
Operating ROU assets and operating lease liabilities are recognized at the lease commencement date. ROU assets represent the
Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and operating lease liabilities represent its obligation to make lease
payments arising from the lease. Operating lease liabilities are recognized based on the present value of the future lease payments
over the lease term, discounted at the Company’s incremental borrowing rate as the implicit rate in the lease is not readily
determinable for most of the Company’s leases. The Company estimates the discount rate as its incremental borrowing rate based
on qualitative factors including Company specific credit rating, lease term, general economics, and the interest rate environment.
For existing leases that commenced prior to the adoption of the amended leasing guidance, the Company determined the discount
rate on April 1, 2019 using the full lease term. Operating lease liabilities are recorded in “Current portion of operating lease
liabilities” and “Long-term operating lease liabilities,” and the corresponding lease assets are recorded in “Operating lease right-of-
use assets” in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets. Finance lease assets are included in “Property, plant, and equipment,
net” and finance lease liabilities are included in “Current portion of long-term debt” and “Long-term debt” in the Company’s
Consolidated Balance Sheets. As a practical expedient, short-term leases with an initial term of 12 months or less are excluded from
the Consolidated Balance Sheets and charges from these leases are expensed as incurred.
As a lessor, the Company primarily leases certain owned equipment, classified as direct financing or sales-type leases, to
physician practices.
78
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Refer to Financial Note 10, “Leases,” for additional information on the Company’s leases.
Goodwill: Goodwill is tested for impairment on an annual basis in the third quarter and more frequently if indicators of
potential impairment exist. Impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally defined as an operating
segment or one level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial information is
available and segment management regularly reviews the operating results.
The Company applies the goodwill impairment test by comparing the estimated fair value of a reporting unit to its carrying
value and recording an impairment charge equal to the amount of excess carrying value above estimated fair value, if any, but not
to exceed the amount of goodwill allocated to the reporting unit.
To estimate the fair value of its reporting units, the Company generally uses a combination of the market approach and the
income approach. Under the market approach, it estimates fair value by comparing the business to similar businesses, or guideline
companies whose securities are actively traded in public markets. Under the income approach, it uses a discounted cash flow
(“DCF”) model in which cash flows anticipated over future periods, plus a terminal value at the end of that time horizon, are
discounted to their present value using an appropriate rate that is commensurate with the risk inherent within the reporting unit.
Other estimates inherent in both the market and income approaches include long-term growth rates, projected revenues, and
earnings and cash flow forecasts for the reporting units. In addition, the Company compares the aggregate of the reporting units’
fair values to the Company’s market capitalization as a further corroboration of the fair values. Goodwill testing requires a complex
series of assumptions and judgments by management in projecting future operating results, selecting guideline companies for
comparisons and assessing risks. The use of alternative assumptions and estimates could affect the fair values and change the
impairment determinations.
Intangible Assets: Currently all of the Company’s intangible assets are subject to amortization and are amortized based on the
pattern of their economic consumption or on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from one to 24 years.
The Company reviews intangible assets for impairment at an asset group level whenever events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable. Determination of recoverability is based on the lowest level of
identifiable estimated future undiscounted cash flows resulting from use of the asset and its eventual disposition. Measurement of
any impairment loss is based on the excess of the carrying value of the asset group over its estimated fair market value.
Capitalized Software Held for Internal Use: The Company capitalizes costs of software held for internal use during the
application development stage of a project and amortizes those costs using the straight-line method over their estimated useful
lives, not to exceed 10 years. As of March 31, 2022 and 2021, capitalized software held for internal use was $320 million and $513
million, respectively, net of accumulated amortization of $1.4 billion, and is included in “Other non-current assets” in the
Consolidated Balance Sheets. The decrease in capitalized software held for internal use is primarily due to the planned exit of the
Company’s European businesses which resulted in an impairment of certain internal-use software that will not be utilized in the
future and classification of certain software as held for sale, as discussed in Note 2, “Held for Sale.” Costs incurred during the
preliminary project and post-implementation stages are expensed as incurred. Amortization expense for capitalized software held
for internal use was $116 million, $117 million, and $129 million for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020,
respectively.
Insurance Programs: The Company maintains insurance programs through its wholly-owned captive insurance subsidiaries
(“Captives”) from which it obtains coverage for various exposures, including certain exposures arising from the opioid-related
claims of governmental entities against the Company as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and
Contingent Liabilities,” as well as those risks required to be insured by law or contract. It is the Company’s policy to retain a
significant portion of certain losses, including those related to workers’ compensation and comprehensive general, product, and
vehicle liability. Provisions for losses expected under insurance programs are recorded based on the Company’s estimate of the
aggregate liability for claims incurred as well as for claims incurred but not yet reported. Such estimates utilize certain actuarial
assumptions followed in the insurance industry. The Captives receive direct premiums, which are eliminated on consolidation
against the Company’s premium costs within “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations.
Revenue Recognition: Revenue is recognized when an entity satisfies a performance obligation by transferring control of a
promised good or service to a customer in an amount that reflects the consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled for
that good or service.
79
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Revenues generated from the distribution of pharmaceutical and medical products represent the majority of the Company’s
revenues. The Company orders product from the manufacturer, receives and carries the product at its central distribution facilities,
and delivers the product directly to its customers’ warehouses, hospitals, or retail pharmacies. The distribution business primarily
generates revenue from a contract related to a confirmed purchase order with a customer in a distribution arrangement. Revenue is
recognized when control of goods is transferred to the customer which occurs upon the Company’s delivery to the customer or
upon customer pick-up. The Company also earns revenues from a variety of other sources including its retail, services, and
technology businesses. Retail revenues are recognized at the point of sale. Service revenues, including technology service revenues,
are recognized when services are rendered. Revenues derived from distribution and retail business at the point of sale, and revenues
derived from services represent approximately 98% and 2% of total revenues for each of the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021,
and 2020.
Revenues are recorded gross when the Company is the principal in the transaction, has the ability to direct the use of the goods
or services prior to transfer to a customer, is responsible for fulfilling the promise to its customer, has latitude in establishing prices,
and controls the relationship with the customer. The Company records its revenues net of sales taxes. Revenues are measured based
on the amount of consideration that the Company expects to receive, reduced by estimates for return allowances, discounts, and
rebates using historical data. Sales returns from customers were approximately $3.2 billion in 2022 and $3.1 billion in each of 2021
and 2020. Assets for the right to recover products from customers and the associated refund liabilities for return allowances were
not material as of March 31, 2022 and 2021. Shipping and handling costs associated with outbound freight after control over a
product has transferred to a customer are accounted for as fulfillment costs. The Company records deferred revenues when
payments are received or due in advance of its performance. Deferred revenues are primarily from the Company’s services
arrangements and are recognized as revenues over the periods when services are performed.
The Company had no material contract assets, contract liabilities, or deferred contract costs recorded in its Consolidated
Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2022 and 2021. The Company generally expenses costs to obtain a contract as incurred when the
amortization period is less than one year.
Supplier Incentives: Fees for services and other incentives received from suppliers, relating to the purchase or distribution of
inventory, are considered product discounts and are generally reported as a reduction to cost of sales.
Supplier Reserves: The Company establishes reserves against amounts due from suppliers relating to various fees for services
and price and rebate incentives, including deductions taken against payments otherwise due to it. These reserve estimates are
established based on judgment after considering the status of current outstanding claims, historical experience with the suppliers,
the specific incentive programs, and any other pertinent information available. The Company evaluates the amounts due from
suppliers on a continual basis and adjusts the reserve estimates when appropriate based on changes in facts and circumstances.
Adjustments to supplier reserves are generally included in cost of sales unless consideration from the vendor is in exchange for
distinct goods or services or for pass-through rebate purchases. The ultimate outcome of any outstanding claims may be different
than the Company’s estimate. The supplier reserves primarily pertain to the Company’s U.S. Pharmaceutical segment.
Income Taxes: The Company accounts for income taxes under the asset and liability method, which requires the recognition of
deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences of events that have been included in the financial
statements or the tax returns. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based on the difference between
the financial statements and the tax basis of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the
differences are expected to reverse. Tax benefits from uncertain tax positions are recognized when it is more likely than not that the
position will be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation processes, based on the
technical merits. The amount recognized is measured as the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of
being realized upon effective settlement.
Interest Expense: Interest expense primarily includes interest for the Company’s long-term debt obligations, commercial paper,
net interest settlements of interest rate swaps, and the amortization of deferred issuance costs and original issue discounts on debt.
80
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Foreign Currency Translation: The reporting currency of the Company and its subsidiaries is the U.S. dollar. Its foreign
subsidiaries generally consider their local currency to be their functional currency. Foreign currency-denominated assets and
liabilities of these foreign subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars at period-end exchange rates, while revenues and expenses
are translated at average exchange rates during the corresponding period and stockholders’ equity (deficit) accounts are primarily
translated at historical exchange rates. Foreign currency translation adjustments are included in “Other comprehensive income, net
of tax” in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss), and the cumulative effect is included in the stockholders’
equity (deficit) section of the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Realized gains and losses from currency exchange transactions are
recorded in “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and were not
material in 2022, 2021, or 2020. The Company releases cumulative translation adjustments from stockholders’ equity into earnings
as a gain or loss only upon a complete or substantially complete liquidation of a controlling interest in a subsidiary or a group of
assets within a foreign entity. It also releases all or a pro-rata portion of the cumulative translation adjustments into earnings upon
the sale of an equity method investment that is a foreign entity or has a foreign component.
Derivative Financial Instruments: Derivative financial instruments are used principally in the management of foreign currency
exchange and interest rate exposures and are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets at fair value. If a derivative is designated
as a fair value hedge, the changes in the fair value of the derivative and of the hedged item attributable to the hedged risk are
recognized in earnings. The Company uses foreign currency-denominated notes and cross-currency swaps to hedge a portion of its
net investment in its foreign subsidiaries. It uses cash flow hedges primarily to reduce the effects of foreign currency exchange rate
risk related to intercompany loans denominated in non-functional currencies. If the financial instrument is designated as a cash flow
hedge or net investment hedge, the effective portions of changes in the fair value of the derivative are included in “Other
comprehensive income, net of tax” in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss), and the cumulative effect is
included in the stockholders’ equity (deficit) section of the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The cumulative changes in fair value are
reclassified to the same line as the hedged item in the Consolidated Statements of Operations when the hedged item affects
earnings. The Company evaluates hedge effectiveness at inception and on an ongoing basis, and ineffective portions of changes in
the fair value of cash flow hedges and net investment hedges are recognized in earnings following the date when ineffectiveness
was identified. Derivative instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with the
change included in earnings. Refer to Financial Note 15, “Hedging Activities,” for additional information.
Comprehensive Income (Loss): Comprehensive income (loss) consists of two components: net income (loss) and other
comprehensive income (loss). Other comprehensive income (loss) refers to revenue, expenses, as well as gains and losses that are
recorded as an element of stockholders’ equity (deficit) but are excluded from earnings. The Company’s other comprehensive
income (loss) primarily consists of foreign currency translation adjustments from those subsidiaries where the local currency is the
functional currency, including gains and losses on net investment hedges, as well as unrealized gains and losses on cash flow
hedges and unrealized gains and losses on retirement-related benefit plans.
Noncontrolling Interests and Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests: Noncontrolling interests represent the portion of profit or
loss, net assets, and comprehensive income or loss that is not allocable to McKesson Corporation. Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests includes recurring compensation that McKesson is obligated to pay to the noncontrolling shareholders of
McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson Europe”), formerly known as Celesio AG, under the domination and profit and loss transfer
agreement. Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests also includes third-party equity interests in the Company’s
consolidated entities including Vantage Oncology Holdings, LLC (“Vantage”) and ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP
(“ClarusONE”), which was established between McKesson and Walmart, Inc in 2017. Noncontrolling interests with redemption
features, such as put rights, that are not solely within the Company’s control are considered redeemable noncontrolling interests.
Redeemable noncontrolling interests are presented outside of stockholders’ equity (deficit) in the Company’s Consolidated Balance
Sheets. Refer to Financial Note 8, “Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests,” for additional information.
Share-Based Compensation: The Company accounts for all share-based compensation transactions at fair value. The share-
based compensation expense, for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest, is recognized on a straight-line basis
over the requisite service period. The share-based compensation expense recognized is classified in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations in the same manner as cash compensation paid to the Company’s employees. Refer to Financial Note 5, “Share-Based
Compensation,” for additional information.
81
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Loss Contingencies: The Company is subject to various claims, including, but not limited to, claims with customers and
vendors, pending and potential legal actions for damages, investigations relating to governmental laws and regulations, and other
matters arising out of the normal conduct of its business. When a loss is considered probable and reasonably estimable, the
Company records a liability in the amount of its best estimate for the ultimate loss. However, the likelihood of a loss with respect to
a particular contingency is often difficult to predict and determining a meaningful estimate of the loss or a range of loss may not be
practicable based on the information available and the potential effect of future events and decisions by third parties that will
determine the ultimate resolution of the contingency. Moreover, it is not uncommon for such matters to be resolved over many
years, during which time relevant developments and new information must be reevaluated at least quarterly to determine both the
likelihood of potential loss and whether it is possible to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss. When a material
loss is reasonably possible or probable, but a reasonable estimate cannot be made, disclosure of the proceeding is provided. The
Company recognizes legal fees as incurred when the legal services are provided.
The Company reviews all material contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the likelihood of loss has changed and
to assess whether a reasonable estimate of the loss or a range of the loss can be made. As discussed above, development of a
meaningful estimate of loss or a range of potential loss is complex when the outcome is directly dependent on negotiations with or
decisions by third parties, such as regulatory agencies, the court system, and other interested parties. Refer to Financial Note 18,
“Commitments and Contingent Liabilities,” for additional information related to ongoing controlled substances claims to which the
Company is a party.
Restructuring Charges: Employee severance costs are generally recognized when payments are probable and amounts are
reasonably estimable. Costs related to contracts without future benefit or contract termination are recognized at fair value at the
earlier of the contract termination or the cease-use dates. Other exit-related costs are expensed as incurred. Refer to Financial Note
3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” for additional information.
Business Combinations: The Company accounts for business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting
whereby the identifiable assets and liabilities of the acquired business, as well as any noncontrolling interest in the acquired
business, are recorded at their estimated fair values as of the date that the Company obtains control of the acquired business. Any
purchase consideration in excess of the estimated fair values of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Acquisition-related
expenses and related restructuring costs are expensed as incurred.
Several valuation methods may be used to determine the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed. For intangible
assets, the Company typically uses a method that is a form or variation of the income approach, whereby a forecast of future cash
flows attributable to the asset are discounted to present value using a risk-adjusted discount rate. Some of the more significant
estimates and assumptions inherent in the income approach include the amount and timing of projected future cash flows, the
discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows, and the assessment of the asset’s expected useful life.
Treasury Stock: We record purchases of treasury stock at cost, which is reflected as a reduction to stockholders’ equity in the
Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets. Incremental direct costs to purchase treasury stock are included in the cost of the shares
acquired. Treasury stock also includes shares withheld to satisfy the tax obligations of recipients of share-based compensation.
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
In the first quarter of 2022, the Company prospectively adopted Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) 2019-12, Income Taxes
(Topic 740): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes, which eliminates certain exceptions related to the approach for
intraperiod tax allocation, the methodology for calculating income taxes in an interim period, and the recognition of deferred tax
liabilities for outside basis differences. The guidance also simplifies and clarifies certain other aspects of accounting for income
taxes. The adoption of this amended guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements
or disclosures.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements Not Yet Adopted
There were no recently issued accounting standards that could have a material impact to the Company’s financial position,
results of operations, cash flows, or notes to the financial statements upon their adoption.
82
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
2.    Held for Sale
In July 2021, the Company announced its intention to exit its businesses in Europe (“European Divestiture Activities”). These
activities, further described below, constitute the majority of the assets and liabilities classified as held for sale as of March 31,
2022. Total assets and liabilities that have met the classification as held for sale were $4.5 billion and $4.7 billion, respectively, as
of March 31, 2022 and $12 million and $9 million, respectively, as of March 31, 2021, primarily included within the Company’s
International segment. The Company determined that the disposal groups classified as held for sale do not meet the criteria for
classification as discontinued operations. During the year ended March 31, 2022, the Company recorded charges totaling
$1.6 billion, primarily to remeasure the assets and liabilities of the disposal groups to fair value less costs to sell. These charges
were largely driven by declines in the British pound sterling and the Euro. During the years ended March 31, 2021 and 2020, the
Company recorded losses of $58 million and $275 million, respectively, related to the contribution of a majority of its German
pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture with Walgreens Boots Alliance (“WBA”) which was completed on November
1, 2020. These charges in each year were recorded within “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the
Consolidated Statements of Operations.
European Divestiture Activities
On July 5, 2021, the Company entered into an agreement to sell certain of its businesses in the European Union (“E.U.”)
located in France, Italy, Ireland, Portugal, Belgium, and Slovenia, along with its German headquarters and wound-care business,
part of a shared services center in Lithuania, and its ownership stake in a joint venture in the Netherlands (“E.U. disposal group”) to
the PHOENIX Group for a purchase price of €1.2 billion (or, approximately $1.4 billion) adjusted for certain items, including cash,
net debt, and working capital adjustments, and reduced by the value of the noncontrolling interest held by minority shareholders of
McKesson Europe AG (“McKesson Europe”) at the transaction closing date. The transaction is anticipated to close within the
second half of fiscal year 2023, pursuant to the satisfaction of customary closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory
approvals, as applicable.
During the year ended March 31, 2022, the Company recorded charges totaling $438 million to remeasure the E.U. disposal
group to fair value less costs to sell. These charges also included impairments of individual assets, such as certain internal-use
software that will not be utilized in the future, prior to adjusting the E.U. disposal group as a whole. The remeasurement adjustment
includes net losses of $151 million related to the accumulated other comprehensive income balances associated with the E.U.
disposal group, driven by declines in the Euro. The charges were recorded within “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative
expenses” in the Consolidated Statement of Operations. The Company’s measurement of the fair value of the E.U. disposal group
was based on the total consideration expected to be received by the Company as outlined in the transaction agreement. Certain
components of the total consideration included fair value measurements that fall within Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.
83
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The total assets and liabilities of the E.U. disposal group that have met the classification of held for sale in the Company’s
Consolidated Balance Sheet are as follows:
(In millions) March 31, 2022
Assets
Current assets
Receivables, net $ 1,322 
Inventories, net 809 
Prepaid expenses and other 72 
Property, plant, and equipment, net 304 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 224 
Intangible assets, net 267 
Other non-current assets 328 
Remeasurement of assets of businesses held for sale to fair value less costs to sell (302)
Total assets held for sale $ 3,024 
Liabilities
Current liabilities
Drafts and accounts payable $ 1,826 
Current portion of long-term debt 4 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 33 
Other accrued liabilities 473 
Long-term debt 11 
Long-term deferred tax liabilities 55 
Long-term operating lease liabilities 180 
Other non-current liabilities 138 
Total liabilities held for sale $ 2,720 
(1)Excludes charges related to the impairment of individual assets, which are primarily comprised of a $113 million impairment of internally
developed software recorded directly against the gross value of the assets impacted.
On November 1, 2021, the Company announced an agreement to sell its retail and distribution businesses in the United
Kingdom (“U.K. disposal group”) to Aurelius Elephant Limited. In April 2022, the Company entered into an amendment to the
agreement for a purchase price of £110 million (or, approximately $144 million), including certain adjustments. During the year
ended March 31, 2022, the Company recorded charges totaling $1.2 billion, primarily consisting of adjustments to remeasure the
U.K. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell. The remeasurement adjustments include a $734 million loss related to the
accumulated other comprehensive income balances associated with the U.K. disposal group, driven by declines in the British pound
sterling. The charges were recorded within “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated
Statement of Operations. The Company’s measurement of the fair value of the U.K. disposal group was based on the total
consideration expected to be received by the Company as outlined in the transaction agreement. Certain components of the total
consideration included fair value measurements that fall within Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. The transaction closed on April
6, 2022 and, at closing the buyer assumed and repaid a note payable to the Company of approximately $118 million.(1)
84
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The total assets and liabilities of the U.K. disposal group that have met the classification of held for sale in the Company’s
Consolidated Balance Sheet are as follows:
(In millions) March 31, 2022
Assets
Current assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 531 
Receivables, net 931 
Inventories, net 563 
Prepaid expenses and other 50 
Property, plant, and equipment, net 91 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 270 
Intangible assets, net 117 
Other non-current assets 88 
Remeasurement of assets of businesses held for sale to fair value less costs to sell (1,159)
Total assets held for sale $ 1,482 
Liabilities
Current liabilities
Drafts and accounts payable $ 1,593 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 50 
Other accrued liabilities 59 
Long-term deferred tax liabilities 16 
Long-term operating lease liabilities 262 
Other non-current liabilities 38 
Total liabilities held for sale $ 2,018 
On January 31, 2022, the Company completed the sale of its Austrian business to Quadrifolia Management GmbH in a
management-led buyout for a purchase price of €244 million (or, approximately $276 million), including certain adjustments. The
Company divested net assets of the Austrian business of $272 million, primarily within the International segment, and the buyer
assumed a note payable to the Company of approximately $63 million which was paid to McKesson in the fourth quarter of 2022.
During the year ended March 31, 2022, the Company recognized a loss of $32 million which was recorded within “Selling,
distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated Statement of Operations.
German Pharmaceutical Wholesale Joint Venture
On November 1, 2020, the Company completed a transaction with WBA whereby the majority of its German pharmaceutical
wholesale business was contributed to a newly formed joint venture in which McKesson had a 30% noncontrolling interest.
Transaction consideration for the contribution included a receivable amount of $41 million, primarily related to working
capital and net debt adjustments from WBA, which was received in the first quarter of 2022, and the 30% interest in the newly
formed joint venture. At the transaction date, the carrying value of the equity investment in the joint venture was recorded at its fair
value, which was measured using inputs that fell within Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. The carrying value of the investment in
the joint venture was nil as of March 31, 2021. The Company accounted for its interest in the joint venture as an equity method
investment within the International segment. The joint venture also assumed a note payable to the Company in the amount of
approximately $291 million as of the transaction date, which was paid to the Company in 2021.
85
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In conjunction with the contribution, the Company recorded losses of $58 million and $275 million, respectively, in the years
ended March 31, 2021 and 2020, which included adjustments to remeasure the assets and liabilities held for sale to fair value less
costs to sell. These charges were included within “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations. The Company’s measurement of the fair value of the German pharmaceutical wholesale business
disposal group was based on estimates of total consideration to be received by the Company as outlined in the contribution
agreement between the Company and WBA.
3.    Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net
The Company recorded restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net, of $281 million, $334 million, and $268 million in
2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. These charges are included in “Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net” in the
Consolidated Statements of Operations. In addition, for the years ended March 31, 2021 and 2020, certain charges related to
restructuring initiatives were included in “Cost of sales” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and were not material.
Restructuring Initiatives
During the first quarter of 2022, the Company approved an initiative to increase operational efficiencies and flexibility by
transitioning to a partial remote work model for certain employees. This initiative primarily included the rationalization of the
Company’s office space in North America. Where the Company ceased using office space, it exited the portion of the facility no
longer used. It also retained and repurposed certain other office locations. The Company recorded charges of $124 million for the
year ended March 31, 2022, primarily related to lease right-of-use and other long-lived asset impairments, lease exit costs, and
accelerated depreciation and amortization. This initiative was substantially complete in 2022 after which immaterial charges will
continue to be incurred through the termination date of certain leases.
During the first quarter of 2021, the Company committed to an initiative within the United Kingdom (“U.K.”), which is
included in the Company’s International segment, to further drive operational changes in technologies and business processes,
efficiencies, and cost savings. The initiative included reducing the number of retail pharmacy stores, decommissioning obsolete
technologies and processes, reorganizing and consolidating certain business operations, and related headcount reductions. Charges
incurred for this initiative were not material for the year ended March 31, 2022 and were $57 million for the year ended March 31,
2021, primarily related to asset impairments and accelerated depreciation expense as well as employee severance and other
employee-related costs. This initiative was substantially complete in 2022 and remaining costs the Company expects to record
under this initiative are not material.
During the fourth quarter of 2019, the Company committed to certain programs to continue its operating model and cost
optimization efforts. The Company continues to implement centralization of certain functions and outsourcing through an expanded
arrangement with a third-party vendor to achieve operational efficiency. The programs also include reorganization and
consolidation of business operations, related headcount reductions, the further closures of retail pharmacy stores in Europe, and
closures of other facilities. The Company recorded charges of $62 million and $72 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively,
consisting primarily of employee severance, accelerated depreciation expense, and project consulting fees. This initiative was
substantially complete in 2021 and remaining costs the Company recorded under this initiative were not material.
As previously announced on November 30, 2018, the Company relocated its corporate headquarters, effective April 1, 2019,
from San Francisco, California to Irving, Texas to improve efficiency, collaboration, and cost competitiveness. As a result, the
Company recorded charges of $28 million and $44 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively, consisting primarily of employee
retention expenses, severance, long-lived asset impairments, and accelerated depreciation. The relocation was substantially
complete in January 2021 and remaining costs the Company recorded under this initiative, primarily relating to lease costs, were
not material.
On April 25, 2018, the Company announced a strategic growth initiative intended to drive long-term incremental profit growth
and to increase operational efficiency. The initiative consisted of multiple growth priorities and plans to optimize the Company’s
operating models and cost structures primarily through centralization, cost management, and outsourcing of certain administrative
functions. As part of the growth initiative, the Company committed to implement certain actions including a reduction in
workforce, facility consolidation, and store closures. This set of initiatives was substantially complete by the end of 2020 and
charges in 2021 were not material. The Company recorded charges of $15 million in 2020.
86
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fiscal 2022
Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net for the year ended March 31, 2022 consisted of the following:
Year Ended March 31, 2022
(In millions)U.S.
PharmaceuticalPrescription
Technology
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions International Corporate Total
Severance and
employee-related
costs, net $ 8 $ 1 $ (1)$ 8 $ (7)$ 9 
Exit and other-related
costs 9 4 5 33 46 97 
Asset impairments and
accelerated
depreciation 18 20 5 35 61 139 
Total $ 35 $ 25 $ 9 $ 76 $ 100 $ 245 
(1) Exit and other -related costs consist of accruals for costs to be incurred without future economic benefits, project consulting fees, and other
exit costs expensed as incurred. For the Company’ s International segment, costs primarily relate to optimization programs in Canada, exit-
related action s for the Com pany’ s European Divestiture Activities, and programs for operating model and cost optimization efforts in the
U.K. as described above. For Corporate, primarily represents costs related to the transition to the partial remote work model described above
and various other initiatives.
(2) Costs primarily relate to the transition to the partial remote work model described above.
Fiscal 2021
Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net for the year ended March 31, 2021 consisted of the following:
Year Ended March 31, 2021
(In millions)U.S.
PharmaceuticalPrescription
Technology
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions International Corporate Total
Severance and
employee-related
costs, net $ 10 $ 4 $ (1)$ 22 $ 69 $ 104 
Exit and other-related
costs 11 — 4 17 27 59 
Asset impairments and
accelerated
depreciation — — 1 46 9 56 
Total $ 21 $ 4 $ 4 $ 85 $ 105 $ 219 
(1) Primarily represents costs associated with the operating model and cost optimization ef forts described above.
(2) Represents costs associated with the operating mode l cost optimization efforts and the relocation of the Company’ s headquarters described
above in addition to various other initiatives.
(3) Exit and other -related costs primarily include project consulting fees.(1)
(2)
 (1)  (2)
(3)
87
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fiscal 2020
Restructuring, impairment, and related charges, net for the year ended March 31, 2020 consisted of the following:
Year Ended March 31, 2020
(In millions)U.S.
Pharmaceutical Prescription
Technology
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions International Corporate Total
Severance and
employee-related
costs, net $ 12 $ (1)$ 4 $ 2 $ 30 $ 47 
Exit and other-related
costs 1 — 19 13 46 79 
Asset impairments and
accelerated
depreciation 10 — 1 6 13 30 
Total $ 23 $ (1)$ 24 $ 21 $ 89 $ 156 
(1) Represents costs associated with dispositions and costs related to the relocation of the Company’ s corporate headquarters described above.
(2) Primarily represents costs associated with the growth initiative described above.
(3) Primarily represents costs associated with the operating model and cost optimization ef forts described above.
(4) Represents costs associated with the growth initiative, operating model cost optimization efforts, and with the relocation of the Company’ s
corporate headquarters described above.
(5) Exit and other -related costs primarily include project consulting fees.
The following table summarizes the activity related to the restructuring liabilities associated with the Company’s restructuring
initiatives for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021:
(In millions)U.S.
PharmaceuticalPrescription
Technology
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions International Corporate Total
Balance, March 31, 2020 $ 29 $ 1 $ 22 $ 66 $ 39 $ 157 
Restructuring, impairment, and
related charges, net 21 4 4 85 105 219
Non-cash charges — — (1) (46) (9) (56)
Cash payments (31) (1) (21) (31) (75) (159)
Other — — (1) (8) (1) (10)
Balance, March 31, 2021 19 4 3 66 59 151 
Restructuring, impairment, and
related charges, net 35 25 9 76 100 245 
Non-cash charges (18) (20) (5) (35) (61) (139)
Cash payments (18) (6) (6) (28) (29) (87)
Other (7) — — (23) (10) (40)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 11 $ 3 $ 1 $ 56 $ 59 $ 130 
(1)    As of March 31, 2021 , the total reserve balance was $151 million, of which $99 million was recorded in “Other accrued liabilities” and $52
million was recorded in “Other non-current liabilities” in the Company’ s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2)    As of March 31, 2022, the total reserve balance was $130 million, of which $58 million was recorded in “Other accrued liabilities,” $36
million was recorded in “Liabilities held for sale,” and $36 million was recorded in “Other non-current liabilities” in the Company’ s
Consolidated Balance Sheets.(1) (2)  (3)  (4)
(5)
(1)
(2)
88
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Long-Lived Asset Impairments
Fiscal 2022
In 2022, the Company recognized charges totaling $36 million to impair certain long-lived assets within the International
segment related to the Company’s operations in Denmark and its retail pharmacy businesses in Canada. The Company used an
income approach (a DCF method) and a market approach to estimate the fair value of the long-lived assets.
Fiscal 2021
In 2021, the Company recognized charges of $115 million to impair certain long-lived assets within the Company’s
International segment. These charges primarily related to long-lived assets associated with the Company’s retail pharmacy
businesses in Canada and Europe and were due to declines in estimated future cash flows partially driven by a revised outlook
regarding the impacts of COVID-19. The Company used both an income approach and a market approach to estimate the fair value
of the long-lived assets.
Fiscal 2020
In 2020, the Company recognized charges of $82 million to impair certain long-lived and intangible assets for its retail
pharmacy business in Europe within the Company’s International segment. These charges related primarily to intangible assets
associated with pharmacy licenses within the U.K. retail business due to a decline in estimated future cash flows driven by
additional U.K. government reimbursement reductions communicated in the third quarter of 2020. The Company used a
combination of an income approach and a market approach to estimate the fair value of the long-lived and intangible assets.
In 2020, the Company performed an interim impairment test of long-lived and intangible assets for its Rexall Health retail
business, within the Company's International segment, due to the decline in the estimated future cash flows primarily driven by
lower than expected growth in both prescription volume and sales of non-prescription goods. As a result, the Company recognized
a charge of $30 million to impair certain long-lived and intangible assets, primarily customer relationships. The Company used an
income approach for estimating the fair value of the long-lived and intangible assets.
4.    Business Acquisitions and Divestitures
Acquisitions
During 2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company did not complete any material acquisitions. For the three years presented, the
Company completed several de minimis acquisitions within its operating segments. Financial results for the Company’s business
acquisitions have been included in the Company’s consolidated financial statements since their respective acquisition dates.
Purchase prices for business acquisitions have been allocated based on estimated fair values at the respective acquisition dates.
Goodwill recognized for business acquisitions is generally not expected to be deductible for tax purposes. However, if the assets of
another company are acquired, the goodwill may be deductible for tax purposes.
Divestitures
In July 2021, the Company announced its intention to exit its businesses in Europe. In 2022, the Company entered into
agreements to sell the E.U. disposal group and U.K. disposal group and completed the previously announced sale of its Austrian
business, as described in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” In 2021, the Company contributed the majority of its German
pharmaceutical wholesale business to a newly formed joint venture with WBA as discussed in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,”
and, in 2022, sold its interest in the joint venture to WBA, as described in Financial Note 6, “Other Income, Net.” In 2020, the
Company completed the separation of the Change Healthcare JV, as described below.
Investment in the Change Healthcare Joint Venture
In the fourth quarter of 2017, the Company contributed the majority of its McKesson Technology Solutions businesses to form
a joint venture, the Change Healthcare JV, under a contribution agreement between McKesson and Change Healthcare Inc.
(“Change”) and others, including shareholders of Change. In exchange for the contribution, the Company initially owned
approximately 70% of the joint venture, with the remaining equity ownership of approximately 30% held by Change. The Change
Healthcare JV was jointly governed by McKesson and shareholders of Change.
89
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On June 27, 2019, common stock and certain other securities of Change began trading on the NASDAQ (“IPO”). Change was
a holding company and did not own any material assets or have any operations other than its interest in the Change Healthcare JV.
On July 1, 2019, upon the completion of its IPO, Change contributed net cash proceeds it received from its offering of common
stock to the Change Healthcare JV in exchange for additional membership interests of the Change Healthcare JV (“LLC Units”). As
a result, McKesson’s equity interest in the Change Healthcare JV was diluted from approximately 70% to approximately 58.5%.
Accordingly, in the second quarter of 2020, the Company recognized a dilution loss of $246 million, primarily representing the
difference between its proportionate share of the IPO proceeds and the dilution effect on the investment’s carrying value. This
amount was included in “Equity earnings and charges from investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” in the Company’s
Consolidated Statement of Operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
In the second quarter of 2020, the Company recorded an other-than-temporary impairment (“OTTI”) charge of $1.2 billion to
its investment in the Change Healthcare JV, representing the difference between the carrying value of the Company’s investment
and the fair value derived from the corresponding closing price of Change’s common stock at September 30, 2019. This charge was
included in “Equity earnings and charges from investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” in the Company’s Consolidated
Statement of Operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
Separation of the Change Healthcare Joint Venture
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed the separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV. The separation was
affected through the split-off of PF2 SpinCo, Inc. (“SpinCo”), a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company that held all of the
Company’s interest in the Change Healthcare JV, to certain of the Company’s stockholders through an exchange offer (“Split-off”),
followed by the merger of SpinCo with and into Change, with Change surviving the merger (“Merger”).
In connection with the Split-off, on March 9, 2020, the Company distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of common
stock of SpinCo to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares of McKesson
common stock which now are held as treasury stock on the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets. Refer to Financial Note 19,
“Stockholders' Equity (Deficit),” for more information. Following consummation of the exchange offer, on March 10, 2020,
SpinCo was merged with and into Change Healthcare, and each share of SpinCo common stock converted into one share of Change
common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being paid in lieu of fractional shares of Change common stock. The Split-off
and the Merger are intended to be generally tax-free transactions for U.S. federal income tax purposes. Following the Split-off, the
Company does not beneficially own any of Change’s outstanding securities. In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Company recognized
a net gain of $414 million related to the transaction which is included under the caption “Equity earnings and charges from
investment in Change Healthcare Joint Venture” in the Company’s Consolidated Statement of Operations for the year ended March
31, 2020. The net gain was calculated as follows:
(In millions, except per shar e data)
Fair value of McKesson common stock accepted (15.4 million shares at $131.97 per share on March 9, 2020) $ 2,036 
Investment in the Change Healthcare JV at exchange date (2,096)
Reversal of deferred tax liability 521 
Release of accumulated other comprehensive loss attributable to the joint venture (24)
Less: Transaction costs incurred (23)
Net gain on split-off of the Change Healthcare JV $ 414 
(1) Under the agreement with the Change Healthcare JV, McKesson, Change, and certain subsidiaries of the Change Healthcare JV, there may be
changes in future periods to the amount reversed as the relevant periods are audited by tax authorities. Any such change is not expected to
have a material impact on the Company’ s consolidated financial statements.
Equity Method Investment in the Change Healthcare Joint Venture
Until the separation of the Company’s interest in the Change Healthcare JV, this investment was accounted for using the equity
method of accounting. Effective April 1, 2019, the Change Healthcare JV adopted the amended revenue recognition guidance and,
in the first quarter of 2020, the Company recorded its proportionate share of the joint venture’s adoption impact of the amended
revenue recognition guidance of approximately $80 million, net of tax, in the Company’s opening retained earnings.(1)
90
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Excluding the OTTI and transaction-related items described above, the Company recorded its proportionate share of loss from
its investment in the Change Healthcare JV of $119 million in 2020, which includes transaction and integration expenses incurred
by the Change Healthcare JV and basis differences between the joint venture and McKesson, including amortization of fair value
adjustments primarily representing incremental intangible amortization and removal of profit associated with the recognition of
deferred revenue. This amount was recorded under the caption “Equity earnings and charges from investment in Change Healthcare
Joint Venture” in the Company’s Consolidated Statement of Operations for the year ended March 31, 2020.
Related Party Transactions
In connection with the formation of the Change Healthcare JV, McKesson, the Change Healthcare JV, and certain shareholders
of Change entered into various ancillary agreements, including a transition services agreement (“TSA”), a transaction and advisory
fee agreement (“Advisory Agreement”), a tax receivable agreement (“TRA”) and certain other agreements. The Advisory
Agreement was terminated in 2020 and fees incurred or earned from the agreement were not material for 2020. Fees incurred or
earned from the TSA were not material in 2022 nor 2021 and were $22 million in 2020.
Under the TRA, McKesson had the ability to adjust the manner in which certain depreciation or amortization deductions are
allocated among Change and McKesson. McKesson exercised its right under the agreement and allocated certain depreciation and
amortization deductions to Change for the tax year ended March 31, 2020.
After McKesson’s separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV, the aforementioned TRA agreement requires the
Change Healthcare JV to pay McKesson 85% of the net cash tax savings realized, or deemed to be realized, by Change resulting
from the depreciation or amortization allocated to Change by McKesson. The receipt of any payments from the Change
Healthcare JV under the TRA is dependent upon Change benefiting from this depreciation or amortization in future tax return
filings. This creates uncertainty over the amount, timing, and probability of the gain recognized. As such, the Company accounts
for the TRA as a gain contingency, with no receivable recognized as of March 31, 2022 or 2021.
5.    Share-Based Compensation
The Company provides share-based compensation to its employees, officers, and non-employee directors, including restricted
stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based stock units (“PSUs”), stock options, and an employee stock purchase plan (“ESPP”)
(collectively, “share-based awards”). Most of the share-based awards are granted in the first quarter of each fiscal year.
Compensation expense for the share-based awards is recognized for the portion of awards ultimately expected to vest. The
Company estimates the number of share-based awards that will ultimately vest primarily based on historical experience. The
estimated forfeiture rate established upon grant is re-assessed throughout the requisite service period and is adjusted when actual
forfeitures occur. The actual forfeitures in future reporting periods could be higher or lower than current estimates.
Compensation expense is classified in the Consolidated Statements of Operations in the same manner as cash compensation
paid to the Company’s employees.
91
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Impact on Net Income
The components of share-based compensation expense and related tax benefits are as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Restricted stock unit awards $ 148 $ 137 $ 104 
Stock options 2 4 7 
Employee stock purchase plan 11 10 8 
Share-based compensation expense 161 151 119 
Tax benefit for share-based compensation expense (35) (23) (18)
Share-based compensation expense, net of tax $ 126 $ 128 $ 101 
(1) Includes compensation expense recognized for RSUs and PSUs.
(2) Income tax benefit is comp uted using the tax rates of applicable tax jurisdictions. Additionally , a portion of compensation expense is not tax-
deductible. Income tax expense for 2022, 2021, and 2020 included discrete income tax expense of $10 million, $2 million, and $2 million,
respectively .
Stock Plans
In July 2013, the Company’s stockholders approved the 2013 Stock Plan to replace the 2005 Stock Plan. Under these stock
plans, the Company may issue restricted stock, RSUs, PSUs, stock options, and other share-based awards to selected employees,
officers, and non-employee directors. The 2013 Stock Plan reserves 30 million shares plus unused reserved shares under the 2005
Stock Plan. As of March 31, 2022, 19 million shares remain available for future grant under the 2013 Stock Plan.
Restricted Stock Unit Awards
RSUs entitle the holder to receive a specified number of shares of the Company’s common stock which vest over a period of
generally three to four years as determined by the Compensation Committee at the time of grant. The fair value of the award is
determined based on the price of the Company’s common stock on the grant date and the related compensation expense is
recognized over the vesting period on a straight-line basis.
Non-employee directors receive an annual grant of RSUs, which vest immediately and are expensed upon grant. The director
may elect to receive the underlying shares immediately or defer receipt of the shares if they meet director stock ownership
guidelines. The shares will be automatically deferred for those directors who do not meet the director stock ownership guidelines.
At March 31, 2022, approximately 57,000 RSUs for the Company’s directors are vested.
PSUs are conditional upon the attainment of market and performance objectives over a specified period. The number of vested
PSUs is assessed at the end of a three-year performance period upon attainment of meeting certain earnings per share targets,
average return on invested capital, and for certain participants, total shareholder return relative to a peer group of companies and,
for special PSUs granted in 2019, meeting certain cumulative operating profit metrics. The Company uses the Monte Carlo
simulation model to measure the fair value of the total shareholder return portion of the PSUs. The earnings per share portion of the
PSUs is measured at the grant date market price. PSUs have a requisite service period of generally three years. Expense is
attributed to the requisite service period on a straight-line basis based on the fair value of the PSUs, adjusted for the performance
modifier at the end of each reporting period. For PSUs that are designated as equity awards, the fair value is measured at the grant
date. (1)
(2)
92
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The weighted-average assumptions used in the Monte Carlo valuations are as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
2022 2021 2020
Expected stock price volatility 35 % 36 % 30 %
Expected dividend yield 0.9 % 1.1 % 1.3 %
Risk-free interest rate 0.3 % 0.2 % 2.2 %
Expected life (in years) 3 3 3
The following table summarizes activity for restricted stock unit awards (RSUs and PSUs) during 2022:
(In millions, except per shar e data) SharesWeighted-
Average
Grant Date Fair
Value Per Share
Nonvested, March 31, 2021 3 $ 142.13 
Granted 1 200.64 
Cancelled — 142.40 
Vested (1) 141.16 
Nonvested, March 31, 2022 3 $ 160.47 
The following table provides data related to restricted stock unit award activity:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total fair value of shares vested $ 144 $ 79 $ 67 
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to
nonvested restricted stock unit awards not yet recognized, pre-tax $ 165 $ 147 $ 155 
Weighted-average period in years over which restricted stock unit
award cost is expected to be recognized 2 2 3
Stock Options
Stock options are granted with an exercise price at no less than the fair market value and those options granted under the stock
plans generally have a contractual term of seven years and follow a four-year vesting schedule. The Company did not grant any
stock options during the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020.
Compensation expense for stock options is recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period and is based on
the grant-date fair value for the portion of the awards that is ultimately expected to vest. The Company uses the Black-Scholes
options-pricing model to estimate the fair value of its stock options. Once the fair value of an employee stock option is determined,
current accounting practices do not permit it to be changed, even if the estimates used are different from actual.
The following is a summary of stock options outstanding at March 31, 2022:
Options Outstanding Options Exercisable
Range of Exercise
PricesNumber of
Options
Outstanding
at Year End
(In millions)Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Life (Years)Weighted-
Average
Exercise PriceNumber of
Options
Exercisable at
Year End
(In millions)Weighted-
Average
Exercise Price
$123.98—$159.00 1 3 $ 150.35 1 $ 152.20 
159.00— 237.86 — 1 201.56 — 201.56 
1 1 
93
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The following table summarizes stock option activity during 2022:
(In millions, except per shar e data) SharesWeighted-
Average
Exercise
PriceWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term (Years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
Outstanding, March 31, 2021 2 $ 183.29 2 $ 36 
Granted — — 
Cancelled — 207.92 
Exercised (1) 190.96 
Outstanding, March 31, 2022 1 $ 175.23 2 $ 114 
Vested and expected to vest 1 $ 175.23 2 $ 114 
Vested and exercisable, March 31, 2022 1 178.48 2 101 
(1) The number of options expected to vest takes into account an estimate of expected forfeitures.
(2) The intrinsic value is calculated as the difference between the period-end market price of the Company’ s common stock and the exercise
price of “in-the-money” options.
The following table provides data related to stock option activity:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e data) 2022 2021 2020
Weighted-average grant date fair value per stock option $ — $ — $ — 
Aggregate intrinsic value on exercise $ 28 $ 5 $ 17 
Cash received upon exercise $ 157 $ 38 $ 66 
Tax benefits realized related to exercise $ 5 $ 4 $ 4 
Total fair value of stock options vested $ 5 $ 10 $ 16 
Total compensation cost, net of estimated forfeitures, related to
unvested stock options not yet recognized, pre-tax $ — $ 2 $ 6 
Weighted-average period in years over which stock option
compensation cost is expected to be recognized 0 2 2
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
The Company has an ESPP under which 21 million shares have been authorized for issuance. The ESPP allows eligible
employees to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock through payroll deductions. The deductions occur over three-month
purchase periods and the shares are then purchased at 85% of the market price at the end of each purchase period. Employees are
allowed to terminate their participation in the ESPP at any time during the purchase period prior to the purchase of the shares. The
15% discount provided to employees on these shares is included in compensation expense. The shares related to funds outstanding
at the end of a quarter are included in the calculation of diluted weighted-average shares outstanding. These amounts have not been
significant for all the years presented. The Company recognizes costs for employer matching contributions as ESPP expense over
the relevant purchase period. Shares issued under the ESPP were not material in 2022, 2021, and 2020. At March 31, 2022, 2
million shares remain available for issuance. (2)
 (1)
94
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
6.    Other Income, Net
Other income, net consists of the following:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Interest income $ 10 $ 12 $ 49 
Equity in earnings, net 43 48 36 
Net gains on investments in equity securities 98 133 17 
Actuarial gains (losses) from pension plans 5 — (127)
Other, net 103 30 37 
Total $ 259 $ 223 $ 12 
(1) Primarily recorded within the Company’ s International segment.
(2) Represents net realized and unrealized gains on the Company’ s investments in equity securities of certain U.S. growth stage companies in the
healthcare industry . These net gains primarily relate to mark-to-market adjustments for investments whic h are measured at fair value based
on chan ges in the observable price of the securities and realized gains on disposal of certain of these invest ments. Refer to Financial Note 16,
“Fair Value Measurements” and Financial Note 21, “Segments of Business” for more information.
(3) The year ended March 31, 2020 includes $116 million from the terminati on of the U.S. defined benefit pension plan and $11 million related
to a settlement from the executive benefit retirement  plan for a retired executive. Refer to Financial Note 14, “Pension Benefits” for more
information.
(4) Includes a gain of $42 million for the year ende d March 31, 2022 as part of the completed sale of the Company’ s 30% interest in its
German pharmaceutical wholesale joint venture to WBA. Other , net for all periods presented also includes income recognized from finance
charges to customers primarily for late fees.
7.    Income Taxes
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes
U.S. $ 1,944 $ (6,019) $ 216 
Foreign (16) 985 928 
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes $ 1,928 $ (5,034) $ 1,144 (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
95
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Income tax expense (benefit) related to continuing operations consists of the following:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Current
Federal $ 233 $ (15) $ 170 
State 129 47 48 
Foreign 240 181 142 
Total current 602 213 360 
Deferred
Federal 88 (562) (204)
State (16) (204) (105)
Foreign (38) (142) (33)
Total deferred 34 (908) (342)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 636 $ (695) $ 18 
The Company reported an income tax expense (benefit) rate of 33.0%, (13.8)%, and 1.6% in 2022, 2021, and 2020.
Fluctuations in the Company’s reported income tax rates are primarily due to non-cash charges related to remeasuring the value of
certain of its European businesses to fair value less costs to sell in 2022, the impact of opioid-related claims, including charges of
$8.1 billion ($6.8 billion after-tax) in 2021, the impact of the Change Healthcare joint venture divestiture in 2020, and changes in
the mix of earnings between various taxing jurisdictions.
The reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate
of 21.0% to income before income taxes is as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Income tax expense (benefit) at federal statutory rate $ 405 $ (1,057) $ 240 
State income taxes, net of federal tax benefit 83 (206) (41)
Tax effect of foreign operations (186) (77) (81)
Unrecognized tax benefits and settlements (26) 41 (7)
Opioid-related litigation and claims 38 715 — 
Net tax benefit on intellectual property transfer — (105) — 
Tax-free gain on investment exit — — (87)
E.U. disposal transaction loss 345 — — 
Capital loss carryback — — (19)
Other, net (23) (6) 13 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 636 $ (695) $ 18 
(1) Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” for additional information regard ing the separation of the Change
Healthcare JV .
(2) The Company’ s effective tax rates were impacted by other favorable U.S. federal permanent differences including research and development
credits of $ 4 million, $ 5 million, and $ 7 million in 2022, 2021, and 2020.
During the year ended March 31, 2022, the Company recorded non-deductible, non-cash pre-tax charges of $438 million
primarily to remeasure the E.U. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell, and $1.2 billion to remeasure the U.K. disposal group,
as described in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.”(1)
 (2)
96
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company’s reported income tax rates for 2021 and 2020 were unfavorably impacted by non-deductible, non-cash charges
of $58 million and $275 million, respectively, primarily to remeasure the carrying value of assets and liabilities held for sale related
to the formation of a new German pharmaceutical wholesale joint venture within the Company’s International segment. Refer to
Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” for more information.
The Company’s reported income tax rates for 2022 and 2021 were impacted by the charge for pending and future opioid-
related claims of $274 million ($237 million after-tax) and $8.1 billion ($6.8 billion after-tax), respectively, as described further in
Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities.”
During 2021, the Company sold intellectual property between wholly-owned legal entities within McKesson that are based in
different tax jurisdictions. The transferor entity recognized a gain on the sale of assets which was not subject to income tax in its
local jurisdiction; such gains were eliminated upon consolidation. The acquiring entities of the intellectual property were entitled to
amortize the purchase price of the assets for tax purposes. In accordance with ASU 2016-16, “Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other
Than Inventory,” discrete tax benefits of $105 million was recognized for 2021, with a corresponding increase to a deferred tax
assets for the temporary difference arising from the buyer’s excess tax basis.
On March 10, 2020, the Company completed the previously announced separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV
as described in Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures.” The Company’s reported income tax expense rate for
2020 was favorably impacted by this transaction given that it was intended to generally be a tax-free split-off for U.S. federal
income tax purposes. In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Company recognized a net gain for financial reporting purposes of $414
million related to the separation transaction.
Deferred tax balances consisted of the following:
March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021
Assets
Receivable allowances $ 49 $ 69 
Opioid-related litigation and claims 755 724 
Compensation and benefit related accruals 285 305 
Net operating loss and credit carryforwards 739 974 
Lease obligations 422 539 
Other 83 115 
Subtotal 2,333 2,726 
Less: valuation allowance (726) (864)
Total assets 1,607 1,862 
Liabilities
Inventory valuation and other assets (1,993) (1,939)
Fixed assets and systems development costs (184) (196)
Intangibles (233) (411)
Lease right-of-use assets (401) (505)
Other (17) (37)
Total liabilities (2,828) (3,088)
Net deferred tax liability $ (1,221) $ (1,226)
Long-term deferred tax asset $ 197 $ 185 
Long-term deferred tax liability (1,418) (1,411)
Net deferred tax liability $ (1,221) $ (1,226)
97
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Excluded from the amounts above were $48 million of net deferred tax liabilities which were classified as held for sale for
European divestitures at March 31, 2022, as discussed in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.”
The Company assesses the available positive and negative evidence to determine whether deferred tax assets are more likely
than not to be realized. As a result of this assessment, valuation allowances have been recorded on certain deferred tax assets in
various tax jurisdictions. The valuation allowances were approximately $726 million and $864 million in 2022 and 2021,
respectively, and primarily relate to net operating and capital losses incurred in certain tax jurisdictions for which no tax benefit
was recognized. The decrease in the valuation allowance of $138 million in the current year relates primarily to classification of
deferred tax balances as held for sale for European divestitures, as discussed in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” partially offset by
the net operating losses incurred and deferred tax movements in certain tax jurisdictions for which no tax benefit was recognized.
The Company has federal, state, and foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $303 million, $3.9 billion, and $1.5 billion at
March 31, 2022, respectively. Federal and state net operating losses will expire at various dates from 2023 through 2042.
Substantially all its foreign net operating losses have indefinite lives. In addition, the Company has foreign capital loss
carryforwards of $785 million with indefinite lives.
The following table summarizes the activity related to the Company’s gross unrecognized tax benefits for the last three years:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Unrecognized tax benefits at beginning of period $ 1,754 $ 958 $ 1,052 
Additions based on tax positions related to prior years 14 53 20 
Reductions based on tax positions related to prior years (131) (5) (168)
Additions based on tax positions related to current year 14 755 82 
Reductions based on settlements (20) (8) (8)
Reductions based on the lapse of the applicable statutes of limitations (102) (12) (13)
Exchange rate fluctuations (6) 13 (7)
Unrecognized tax benefits at end of period $ 1,523 $ 1,754 $ 958 
As of March 31, 2022, the Company had $1.5 billion of unrecognized tax benefits, of which $1.3 billion would reduce income
tax expense and the effective tax rate, if recognized. The decrease in unrecognized tax benefits in 2022 compared to 2021 is
primarily attributable to statute of limitation expirations in various taxing jurisdictions and the reclassification of $23 million of
unrecognized tax benefits as held for sale for European divestitures, as discussed in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” The increase
in unrecognized tax benefits in 2021 compared to 2020 is primarily attributable to uncertainty in connection with the deductibility
of opioid-related litigation and claims. Because many uncertainties associated with any potential settlement arrangements or other
resolutions of opioid claims including provisions related to deductibility have not been finalized, the actual amount of the tax
benefit related to uncertain tax positions may differ from these estimates. Refer to Financial Note 18, “Commitments and
Contingent Liabilities,” for more information.
During the next twelve months, it is reasonably possible that the Company’s unrecognized tax benefit may decrease by as
much as $170 million due to settlements of tax examinations and statute of limitations expirations in the U.S. federal and state
jurisdictions and in foreign jurisdictions. However, this amount may change as the Company continues to have ongoing
negotiations with various taxing authorities throughout the year.
The Company reports interest and penalties on income taxes as income tax expense. It recognized income tax expense of $8
million, $9 million, and $23 million in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively, representing interest and penalties, in its Consolidated
Statements of Operations. As of March 31, 2022 and 2021, it accrued $108 million and $101 million, cumulatively, in interest and
penalties on unrecognized tax benefits.
98
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company files income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, various U.S. state jurisdictions, and various foreign
jurisdictions. The Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) is currently examining the Company’s U.S. corporation income tax returns for
2018 and 2019. The Company is generally subject to audit by taxing authorities in various U.S. states and in foreign jurisdictions
for fiscal years 2014 through the current fiscal year.
Undistributed earnings of the Company’s foreign operations of approximately $5.0 billion were considered indefinitely
reinvested at March 31, 2022. Following enactment of the 2017 Tax Act, the repatriation of cash to the U.S. is generally no longer
taxable for federal income tax purposes. However, the repatriation of cash held outside the U.S. could be subject to applicable
foreign withholding taxes and state income taxes. The Company may remit foreign earnings to the U.S. to the extent it is tax
efficient to do so. It does not expect the tax impact from remitting these earnings to be material.
8.    Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests and Noncontrolling Interests
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests
The Company’s redeemable noncontrolling interests primarily related to its consolidated subsidiary, McKesson Europe. Under
the December 2014 domination and profit and loss transfer agreement (the “Domination Agreement”), the noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe are entitled to receive an annual recurring compensation amount of €0.83 per share. As a result,
during 2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company recorded a total attribution of net income to the noncontrolling shareholders of
McKesson Europe of $8 million, $43 million, and $42 million, respectively. All amounts were recorded in “Net income attributable
to noncontrolling interests” in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations and the corresponding liability balance was
recorded in “Other accrued liabilities” in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Under the Domination Agreement, the noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe had a right to put (“Put Right”) their
noncontrolling shares at €22.99 per share, increased annually for interest in the amount of five percentage points above a base rate
published by the German Bundesbank semi-annually, less any compensation amount or guaranteed dividend already paid by
McKesson with respect to the relevant time period (“Put Amount”).
Subsequent to the Domination Agreement’s registration, certain noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe initiated
appraisal proceedings (“Appraisal Proceedings”) with the Stuttgart Regional Court to challenge the adequacy of the Put Amount,
annual recurring compensation amount, and/or the guaranteed dividend. During the pendency of the Appraisal Proceedings, such
amount was paid as specified in the Domination Agreement. On September 19, 2018, that court ruled that the Put Amount shall be
increased by €0.51 resulting in an adjusted Put Amount of €23.50. The annual recurring compensation amount and/or the
guaranteed dividend remained unadjusted. Noncontrolling shareholders of McKesson Europe appealed this decision. McKesson
Europe Holdings GmbH & Co. KGaA also appealed the decision. On April 12, 2021, the Company received notice that the
Stuttgart Court of Appeals ruled that the Put Amount remained at €22.99, thereby rejecting the lower court’s increase, and the
recurring compensation remained at €0.83 per share.
Exercises of the Put Right reduced the balance of redeemable noncontrolling interests. The redeemable noncontrolling interest
was adjusted each period for the proportion of other comprehensive income or loss, primarily due to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates, attributable to the noncontrolling shareholders.
During 2022 and 2021, the Company paid $1.0 billion and $49 million, respectively, to purchase 34.5 million and 1.8 million
shares, respectively, of McKesson Europe through exercises of the Put Right by the noncontrolling shareholders. This decreased the
carrying value of the noncontrolling interests by $983 million and $49 million, respectively, and the Company recorded the
associated effect of the increase in the Company’s ownership interest of $178 million and $3 million, respectively, as an increase to
McKesson stockholders’ additional paid-in capital. During 2020, there were no material exercises of the Put Right. The Put Right
expired on June 15, 2021, at which point the remaining shares owned by the minority shareholders, with a carrying value of $287
million, were transferred from “Redeemable noncontrolling interests” to “Noncontrolling interests” in the Consolidated Balance
Sheet.
Prior to the expiration of the Put Right, the balance of the redeemable noncontrolling interests was reported at the greater of its
carrying value or its maximum redemption value at each reporting date. At March 31, 2021, the carrying value of redeemable
noncontrolling interests of $1.3 billion exceeded the maximum redemption value of $1.2 billion and the Company owned
approximately 78% of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares.
99
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Noncontrolling Interests
Noncontrolling interests represent third-party equity interests in the Company’s consolidated entities primarily related to
ClarusONE Sourcing Services LLP, and Vantage Oncology Holdings, LLC. As discussed above, after June 15, 2021, noncontrolling
interests also include minority shareholder equity interests in McKesson Europe. Noncontrolling interests in the Company’s
Consolidated Balance Sheets were $480 million and $196 million at March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
At March 31, 2022, the Company owned approximately 95% of McKesson Europe’s outstanding common shares. The
Company’s noncontrolling interest in McKesson Europe will be included in the sale of the E.U. disposal group, as discussed in
Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” During 2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company allocated a total of $165 million, $156 million, and
$178 million of net income to noncontrolling interests, respectively.
Changes in redeemable noncontrolling interests and noncontrolling interests for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and
2020 were as follows:
(In millions)Noncontrolling
InterestsRedeemable
Noncontrolling
Interests
Balance, March 31, 2019 $ 193 $ 1,393 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 178 42 
Other comprehensive income — 3 
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities — (42)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (154) — 
Other — 6 
Balance, March 31, 2020 217 1,402 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 156 43 
Other comprehensive loss — (79)
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities — (43)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (177) — 
Exercises of Put Right — (49)
Other — (3)
Balance, March 31, 2021 196 1,271 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests 165 8 
Other comprehensive income (loss) (4) 3 
Reclassification of recurring compensation to other accrued liabilities (7) (8)
Payments to noncontrolling interests (155) — 
Exercises of Put Right — (983)
Reclassification of McKesson Europe redeemable noncontrolling interests 287 (287)
Other (2) (4)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 480 $ — 
9.    Earnings (Loss) Per Common Share
Basic earnings (loss) per common share are computed by dividing net income (loss) by the weighted-average number of
common shares outstanding during the reporting period. The computation of diluted earnings (loss) per common share is similar to
that of basic earnings (loss) per common share, except that the former reflects the potential dilution that could occur if dilutive
securities or other obligations to issue common stock were exercised or converted into common stock. Potentially dilutive securities
include outstanding stock options, restricted stock units, and performance-based and other restricted stock units.
100
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Diluted loss per common share for the year ended March 31, 2021 was calculated by excluding all dilutive securities from the
denominator of the share computation due to their anti-dilutive effects. Approximately nil and 2 million of potentially dilutive
securities for 2022 and 2020, respectively, were excluded from the computation of diluted net earnings per common share, as they
were anti-dilutive.
The computations for basic and diluted earnings or loss per common share are as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions, except per shar e amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Income (loss) from continuing operations $ 1,292 $ (4,339) $ 1,126 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (173) (199) (220)
Income (loss) from continuing operations attributable to McKesson 1,119 (4,538) 906 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (5) (1) (6)
Net income (loss) attributable to McKesson $ 1,114 $ (4,539) $ 900 
Weighted-average common shares outstanding:
Basic 152.3 160.6 180.6 
Effect of dilutive securities:
Stock options 0.2 — — 
Restricted stock units 1.6 — 1.0 
Diluted 154.1 160.6 181.6 
Earnings (loss) per common share attributable to McKesson: 
Diluted
Continuing operations $ 7.26 $ (28.26) $ 4.99 
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.04)
Total $ 7.23 $ (28.26) $ 4.95 
Basic
Continuing operations $ 7.35 $ (28.26) $ 5.01 
Discontinued operations (0.03) — (0.03)
Total $ 7.32 $ (28.26) $ 4.98 
(1) Includes dilutive ef fect from restricted stock units and performance-based stock units.
(2) Certain computations may reflect rounding adjustments.
10.    Leases
In the first quarter of 2020, the Company adopted amended guidance for leases using the modified retrospective method. Upon
adoption of this amended guidance, the Company recorded $2.2 billion of operating lease liabilities, $2.1 billion of operating lease
ROU assets, and a cumulative-effect adjustment of $69 million to opening retained earnings as of April 1, 2019. The adjustment to
opening retained earnings included impairment charges of $89 million, net of tax, to the ROU assets primarily related to previously
impaired long-lived assets at the retail pharmacies in the Company’s U.K. and Canadian businesses, partially offset by the
derecognition of an existing deferred gain on the Company’s sale-leaseback transaction related to its former corporate headquarters
building. The Company also elected to adopt the transition package of practical expedients provided within the amended guidance
which eliminated the requirements to reassess lease identification, lease classification, and initial direct costs for leases which
commenced before April 1, 2019. The adoption of this guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated
statements of operations and cash flows.(1)
(2)
101
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Lessee
Supplemental balance sheet information related to leases was as follows:
March 31,
(In millions, except lease term and discount rate) 2022 2021
Operating leases 
Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 1,548 $ 2,100 
Current portion of operating lease liabilities $ 297 $ 390 
Long-term operating lease liabilities 1,366 1,867 
Total operating lease liabilities $ 1,663 $ 2,257 
Finance leases
Property, plant and equipment, net $ 206 $ 237 
Current portion of long-term debt $ 25 $ 22 
Long-term debt 185 206 
Total finance lease liabilities $ 210 $ 228 
Weighted-average remaining lease term (Years) 
Operating leases 6.9 7.8
Finance leases 8.8 10.1
Weighted-average discount rate 
Operating leases 2.47 % 2.53 %
Finance leases 2.50 % 2.71 %
(1) As discussed in Financial  Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Char ges, Net,” the Comp any rationalized its office space,
including certain property leases, in North America during 2022. Where the Company ceased using office space, it exited the portion of the
facility no longer used and repurposed other office locations which resulted in changes to certain lease agreements. This initiative did not
have a material financial impact to the Company’ s operating lease ROU assets and liabilities.
(2) Excludes operating lease right-of-use assets of approximately $494 million as of March 31, 2022 related to the European divestiture activities
discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” These amounts were included under the caption “Assets held for sale” in the
Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2022. Amortization of these assets ceased upon classification as held for sale.
(3) Excludes current and long-term operating lease liabilities of approximately $83 million and $442 million, respectively , as of March 31, 2022
related to the European divestiture activities discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” These amounts were included
under the caption “Liabilities held for sale” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2022.
(4) Lease terms and discount rates as of March 31, 2022  exclude leases classified as held for sale in the Consolidated Balance Sheet related to
the European divestiture activities discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.”(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
102
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The components of lease cost were as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Short-term lease cost $ 43 $ 32 $ 29 
Operating lease cost 431 465 459 
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of right-of-use assets 33 23 14 
Interest on lease liabilities 5 6 5 
Total finance lease cost 38 29 19 
Variable lease cost 127 125 125 
Sublease income (41) (36) (33)
Total lease cost $ 598 $ 615 $ 599 
(1)     These amounts inclu de payments for maintena nce, taxes, payments affected by the consumer price index, and other similar metrics and
payments contingent on usage.
(2)    These amounts were primarily recorded in “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expense s” in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations.
Supplemental cash flow information related to leases was as follows:
Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease
liabilities:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ (356) $ (362) $ (377)
Operating cash flows from finance leases — (4) (3)
Financing cash flows from finance leases (31) (31) (18)
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for lease obligations:
Operating leases $ 286 $ 321 $ 2,378 
Finance leases 32 75 166 
(1)     The amount for the year ended March 31, 2020 includes the transition adjustment of $2.1 billion for operating lease right-of-use assets
recorded as of April 1, 2019 upon adoption of the amended leasing guidance included in ASU 2016-02, Leases.(1)
(2)
(1)
103
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Maturities of lease liabilities as of March 31, 2022 were as follows:
(In millions)Operating
Leases Finance Leases Total
2023 $ 328 $ 29 $ 357 
2024 310 29 339 
2025 268 27 295 
2026 223 25 248 
2027 180 24 204 
Thereafter 506 103 609 
Total lease payments 1,815 237 2,052 
Less imputed interest (152) (27) (179)
Present value of lease liabilities $ 1,663 $ 210 $ 1,873 
(1) Total lease payments are not reduced by minimum sublease income of $ 201 million which are due under future noncancellable subleases.
As of March 31, 2022, the Company entered into additional leases primarily for facilities that have not yet commenced with
future lease payments of $285 million that are not reflected in the table above. These operating leases will commence between 2023
and 2024 with noncancellable lease terms of five to 15 years.
Lessor
The Company leases certain owned equipment, classified as direct financing or sales-type leases, to physician practices. As of
March 31, 2022 and 2021, the total lease receivable was $298 million, respectively, with a weighted-average remaining lease term
of approximately seven years. Interest income from these leases was not material for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and
2020.
11.    Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net
Goodwill
Changes in the carrying amount of goodwill were as follows:
(In millions)U.S.
PharmaceuticalPrescription
Technology
SolutionsMedical-
Surgical
Solutions International Total
Balance, March 31, 2020 $ 3,924 $ 1,540 $ 2,453 $ 1,443 $ 9,360 
Goodwill acquired — — — 5 5 
Acquisition accounting, transfers,
and other adjustments — 2 — — 2 
Other changes/disposals (1) — — — (1)
Impairment charges — — — (69) (69)
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net 40 — — 156 196 
Balance, March 31, 2021 3,963 1,542 2,453 1,535 9,493 
Goodwill acquired — — — 5 5 
Foreign currency translation
adjustments, net (40) — — (7) (47)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 3,923 $ 1,542 $ 2,453 $ 1,533 $ 9,451 (1)
104
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Goodwill Impairment Charges
The Company evaluates goodwill for impairment as of October 1 on an annual basis each year and at an interim date if
indicators of potential impairment exist. Goodwill impairment testing is conducted at the reporting unit level, which is generally
defined as an operating segment or one level below an operating segment (also known as a component), for which discrete financial
information is available and segment management regularly reviews the operating results of that reporting unit.
The fair value of the reporting units was determined using a combination of an income approach based on a DCF model and a
market approach based on appropriate valuation multiples observed for the reporting unit’s guideline public companies. Fair value
estimates result from a complex series of judgments about future events and uncertainties and rely heavily on estimates and
assumptions that have been deemed reasonable by management as of the measurement date. Any material changes in key
assumptions, including failure to improve operations of certain retail pharmacy stores, additional government reimbursement
reductions, deterioration in the financial markets, an increase in interest rates or an increase in the cost of equity financing by
market participants within the industry, or other unanticipated events and circumstances, may affect such estimates. The discount
rates are the weighted-average cost of capital measuring the reporting unit’s cost of debt and equity financing weighted by the
percentage of debt and percentage of equity in a company’s target capital. The unsystematic risk premium is an input factor used in
calculating the discount rate that specifically addresses uncertainty related to the reporting unit’s future cash flow projections. Fair
value assessments of the reporting unit are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs
developed using company-specific information.
The annual impairment testing performed for 2022, 2021, and 2020 did not indicate any impairment of goodwill.
In the second quarter of 2021, the Company implemented a new segment reporting structure which resulted in four reportable
segments: U.S. Pharmaceutical, RxTS, Medical-Surgical Solutions, and International. These reportable segments encompass all
operating segments of the Company. This segment change prompted changes in multiple reporting units across the Company. As a
result, goodwill included in impacted reporting units was reallocated using a relative fair value approach and assessed for
impairment both before and after the reallocation.
The Company recorded a goodwill impairment charge of $69 million in 2021 as the estimated fair value of the Europe Retail
Pharmacy reporting unit was lower than its reassigned carrying value based on changes in the composition of the Europe Retail
Pharmacy reporting unit within the International segment. This charge was recorded in “Goodwill impairment charges” in the
Consolidated Statements of Operations. At March 31, 2021, the balance of goodwill for the reporting units in Europe was
approximately nil and the remaining balance of goodwill in the International segment primarily relates to one of its reporting units
in Canada.
Refer to Financial Note 16, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on these nonrecurring fair value measurements.
As of March 31, 2022 and 2021, accumulated goodwill impairment losses in the Company’s International segment were $0.7
billion and $3.6 billion, respectively. Most of the goodwill impairment for these reporting units was generally not deductible for
income tax purposes.
105
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Intangible Assets
Information regarding intangible assets is as follows:
March 31, 2022 March 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions)Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Amortization
Period
(Years)Gross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet
Carrying
AmountGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet
Carrying
Amount
Customer relationships 12$ 2,777 $ (1,691)$1,086 $ 3,739 $ (2,269)$ 1,470 
Service agreements 9 1,085 (573) 512 1,081 (513) 568
Pharmacy licenses — — — — 497 (244) 253
Trademarks and trade
names 12 819 (386) 433 925 (394) 531
Technology 1 128 (116) 12 150 (122) 28
Other 9 187 (171) 16 254 (226) 28
Total $ 4,996 $ (2,937)$2,059 $ 6,646 $ (3,768)$ 2,878 
(1) Excludes net intangible assets of approximately $384 million related to the European divestiture activities discussed in more detail in
Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” This amount was included under the caption “Assets held for sale” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of
March 31, 2022. Amortization of these assets ceased upon classification as held for sale in the second and third quarters of 2022.
All intangible assets were subject to amortization as of March 31, 2022 and 2021. Amortization expense of intangible assets
was $332 million, $422 million, and $462 million for 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Estimated annual amortization expense of
intangible assets is as follows: $225 million, $214 million, $208 million, $177 million, and $171 million for 2023 through 2027,
and $1.1 billion thereafter.
Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net,” for more information on intangible asset
impairment charges recorded in 2022, 2021, and 2020.(1)
106
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
12.    Debt and Financing Activities
Long-term debt consisted of the following:
March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021
U.S. Dollar notes 
2.70% Notes due December 15, 2022 $ 400 $ 400 
2.85% Notes due March 15, 2023 360 400 
3.80% Notes due March 15, 2024 918 1,100 
0.90% Notes due December 3, 2025 500 500 
1.30% Notes due August 15, 2026 498 — 
7.65% Debentures due March 1, 2027 150 167 
3.95% Notes due February 16, 2028 343 600 
4.75% Notes due May 30, 2029 196 400 
6.00% Notes due March 1, 2041 217 282 
4.88% Notes due March 15, 2044 255 411 
Foreign currency notes
0.63% Euro Notes due August 17, 2021 — 704 
1.50% Euro Notes due November 17, 2025 662 700 
1.63% Euro Notes due October 30, 2026 554 587 
3.13% Sterling Notes due February 17, 2029 582 627 
Lease and other obligations 244 270 
Total debt 5,879 7,148 
Less: Current portion 799 742 
Total long-term debt $ 5,080 $ 6,406 
(1) These notes are unsecured and unsubordinated obligations of the Company .
(2) Interest on these U.S. dollar notes is payable semi-annually .
(3) Interest on these foreign currency notes is payable annually .
(4) Excludes current and long-term debt of approximately $4 million and $11 million, respectively , as of March 31, 2022 related to the European
divestiture activities discu ssed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.” These amounts were included under the caption
“Liabilities held for sale” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2022.
Long-Term Debt
The Company’s long-term debt includes both U.S. dollar and foreign currency-denominated borrowings. At March 31, 2022
and 2021, $5.9 billion and $7.1 billion, respectively, of total debt was outstanding, of which $799 million and $742 million,
respectively, was included in “Current portion of long-term debt” in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
On August 12, 2021, the Company completed a public offering of 1.30% Notes due August 15, 2026 (the “2026 Notes”) in a
principal amount of $500 million. Interest on the 2026 Notes is payable semi-annually on February 15th and August 15th of each
year, commencing on February 15, 2022. Proceeds received from this note issuance, net of discounts and offering expenses, were
$495 million. The Company utilized the net proceeds from this note for general corporate purposes.
On December 3, 2020, the Company completed a public offering of 0.90% Notes due December 3, 2025 (the “2025 Notes”) in
a principal amount of $500 million. Interest on the 2025 Notes is payable semi-annually on June 3rd and December 3rd of each
year, commencing on June 3, 2021. Proceeds received from this note issuance, net of discounts and offering expenses, were
$496 million. The Company utilized the net proceeds from this note for general corporate purposes.(1) (2)
 (1) (3)
(4)
107
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Each note, which constitutes a “Series,” is an unsecured and unsubordinated obligation of the Company and ranks equally with
all of the Company’s existing and, from time-to-time, future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness outstanding. Each Series
is governed by materially similar indentures and officers’ certificates. Upon required notice to holders of notes with fixed interest
rates, the Company may redeem those notes at any time prior to maturity, in whole or in part, for cash at redemption prices. In the
event of the occurrence of both (1) a change of control of the Company and (2) a downgrade of a Series below an investment grade
rating by each of Fitch Inc., Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., and Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services within a specified period, an
offer must be made to purchase that Series from the holders at a price equal to 101% of the then outstanding principal amount of
that Series, plus accrued and unpaid interest to, but not including, the date of repurchase. The indenture and the related officers’
certificate for each Series, subject to the exceptions and in compliance with the conditions as applicable, specify that the Company
may not consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of its assets, incur liens, or enter into sale-leaseback transactions
exceeding specific terms, without the lenders’ consent. The indentures also contain customary events of default provisions.
On July 17, 2021, the Company redeemed its 0.63% €600 million (or, approximately $709 million) total principal Euro-
denominated notes, originally due on August 17, 2021, prior to maturity. The notes were redeemed at par value using cash on hand.
On December 1, 2020, the Company redeemed its 4.75% $323 million total principal of notes due on March 1, 2021 prior to
maturity. On November 30, 2020, the Company retired its 3.65% $700 million total principal of notes upon maturity. These notes
were redeemed using cash on hand and the proceeds of the notes offering discussed above. In 2020, the Company repaid at
maturity its €250 million Floating Rate Euro Notes due February 12, 2020.
Tender Offer
On July 23, 2021, the Company completed a cash tender offer for a portion of its existing outstanding (i) 2.85% Notes due
2023, (ii) 3.80% Notes due 2024, (iii) 7.65% Debentures due 2027, (iv) 3.95% Notes due 2028, (v) 4.75% Notes due 2029, (vi)
6.00% Notes due 2041, and (vii) 4.88% Notes due 2044 (collectively referred to herein as the “Tender Offer Notes”). In connection
with the tender offer, the Company paid an aggregate consideration of $1.1 billion to redeem $922 million principal amount of the
notes at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount and premiums of $182 million, plus accrued and unpaid interest
of $14 million. The redemption of the Tender Offer Notes was accounted for as a debt extinguishment. As a result of the
redemption, the Company incurred a pre-tax loss on debt extinguishment of $191 million in the year ended March 31, 2022, which
included premiums of $182 million as well as the write-off of unamortized debt issuance costs and transaction fees incurred
totaling $9 million.
Other Information
Scheduled principal payments of long-term debt are $799 million in 2023, $966 million in 2024, $35 million in 2025,
$1.2 billion in 2026, $1.2 billion in 2027, and $1.7 billion thereafter.
Revolving Credit Facilities
In the second quarter of 2020, the Company entered into a Credit Agreement, dated as of September 25, 2019 (the “2020
Credit Facility”), that provides a syndicated $4.0 billion five-year senior unsecured credit facility with a $3.6 billion aggregate
sublimit of availability in Canadian dollars, British pound sterling, and Euro. Borrowings under the 2020 Credit Facility bear
interest based upon the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”), Canadian Dealer Offered Rate for credit extensions
denominated in Canadian dollars, a prime rate, or alternative overnight rates as applicable, plus agreed margins. The 2020 Credit
Facility matures in September 2024 and had no borrowings during 2022 and 2021 and no amounts outstanding as of March 31,
2022 and 2021.
On March 31, 2021, the Company entered into Amendment No. 2 to the 2020 Credit Facility, which superseded Amendment
No. 1, dated as of February 1, 2021. The 2020 Credit Facility, as amended, contains various customary investment grade covenants,
including a financial covenant which obligates the Company to maintain a maximum Total Debt to Consolidated EBITDA ratio, as
defined in the amended credit agreement. If the Company does not comply with these covenants, its ability to use the 2020 Credit
Facility may be suspended and repayment of any outstanding balances under the 2020 Credit Facility may be required. At March
31, 2022, the Company was in compliance with all covenants. The remaining terms and conditions of the 2020 Credit Facility are
substantially similar to those previously in place under the $3.5 billion five-year senior unsecured revolving credit facility (the
“Global Facility”), which was scheduled to mature in October 2020. The Global Facility was terminated in connection with the
execution of the 2020 Credit Facility in September 2019 and had no borrowings during the six months ended September 30, 2019.
108
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company also maintains bilateral credit facilities primarily denominated in Euros with a committed amount of $7 million
and an uncommitted amount of $111 million as of March 31, 2022. Borrowings and repayments were not material in 2022 and
2021 and amounts outstanding under these credit lines were not material as of March 31, 2022 and 2021.
Commercial Paper
The Company maintains a commercial paper program to support its working capital requirements and for other general
corporate purposes. Under the program, the Company can issue up to $4.0 billion in outstanding commercial paper notes. During
2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company borrowed $11.2 billion, $6.3 billion, and $21.4 billion, respectively, and repaid $11.2 billion,
$6.3 billion, and $21.4 billion, respectively, under the program. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, there were no commercial paper notes
outstanding.
13.    Variable Interest Entities
The Company evaluates its ownership, contractual, and other interests in entities to determine if they are VIEs if it has a
variable interest in those entities, and the nature and extent of those interests. These evaluations are highly complex and involve
management judgment and the use of estimates and assumptions based on available historical information, among other factors.
Based on its evaluations, if the Company determines it is the primary beneficiary of such VIEs, it consolidates such entities into its
financial statements.
Consolidated Variable Interest Entities
The Company consolidates a VIE when it has the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the VIE’s
economic performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of the VIE and, as a result, is considered
the primary beneficiary of the VIE. It consolidates certain single-lessee leasing entities where it, as the lessee, has the majority risk
of the leased assets due to its minimum lease payment obligations to these leasing entities. As a result of absorbing this risk, the
leases provide the Company with the power to direct the operations of the leased properties and the obligation to absorb losses or
the right to receive benefits of the entity. Consolidated VIEs do not have a material impact on the Company’s Consolidated
Statements of Operations and Cash Flows. Total assets and liabilities included in its Consolidated Balance Sheets for these VIEs
were $660 million and $65 million, respectively, at March 31, 2022, and $662 million and $74 million, respectively, at March 31,
2021.
Investments in Unconsolidated Variable Interest Entities
The Company is involved with VIEs which it does not consolidate because it does not have the power to direct the activities
that most significantly impact their economic performance and thus is not considered the primary beneficiary of the entities. Its
relationships include equity method investments and lending, leasing, contractual, or other relationships with the VIEs. The
Company’s most significant VIE relationships are with oncology and other specialty practices. Under these practice arrangements,
the Company generally owns or leases all of the real estate and equipment used by the practices and manages the practices’
administrative functions. Prior to the divestment of the Austrian businesses in 2022, the Company had relationships with certain
pharmacies in Europe with whom it provided financing, had equity ownership, and/or had a supply agreement whereby it supplied
the vast majority of the pharmacies’ purchases. The Company’s maximum exposure to loss (regardless of probability) as a result of
all unconsolidated VIEs was $1.4 billion and $1.5 billion at March 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively, which primarily represents the
value of intangible assets related to service agreements, equity investments, and lease and loan receivables. This amount excludes
the customer loan guarantees discussed in Financial Note 17, “Financial Guarantees and Warranties.” The Company believes there
is no material loss exposure on these assets or from these relationships.
14.    Pension Benefits
The Company maintains a number of qualified and nonqualified defined benefit pension plans and defined contribution plans
for eligible employees.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
The Company has an unfunded nonqualified supplemental defined benefit plan for certain U.S. executives, as well as benefit
pension plans for eligible employees outside the U.S.
109
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On May 23, 2018, the Company’s Board of Directors approved the termination of its frozen U.S. defined benefit pension plan
(“Plan”). During the first quarter of 2020, the Company offered the option of receiving a lump sum payment to certain participants
with vested qualified Plan benefits in lieu of receiving monthly annuity payments. Approximately 1,300 participants elected to
receive the settlement, and lump sum payments of approximately $49 million were made from Plan assets to these participants in
June 2019. The benefit obligation settled approximated payments to Plan participants and a settlement charge of $17 million was
recorded during the first quarter of 2020. During the second quarter of 2020, the Company transferred the remainder of the Plan’s
pension obligation to a third-party insurance provider by purchasing annuity contracts for approximately $280 million which was
fully funded directly by Plan assets. The third-party insurance provider assumed the obligation to pay future pension benefits and
provide administrative services on November 1, 2019 and a pre-tax settlement charge of $105 million was recorded during the
second quarter of 2020. Settlement charges were included within “Other income, net,” in the Consolidated Statement of Operations
for the year ended March 31, 2020. As of March 31, 2020, this defined benefit pension plan had an accumulated comprehensive
loss of approximately nil.
The Company’s non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans cover eligible employees located predominantly in Norway, the United
Kingdom, Germany, and Canada. Benefits for these plans are based primarily on each employee’s final salary, with annual
adjustments for inflation. The obligations in Norway are largely related to the state-regulated pension plan which is managed by the
Norwegian Public Service Pension Fund (“SPK”). According to the terms of the SPK, the plan assets of state regulated plans in
Norway must correspond very closely to the pension obligation calculated using the principles codified in Norwegian law. In the
U.K., the Company has subsidiaries that participate in a joint pension plan. The pension obligation in Germany is unfunded with
the exception of the contractual trust arrangement used to fund pensions of McKesson Europe’s Management Board.
During the fourth quarter of 2022, the Company derecognized $43 million of pension liabilities included in liabilities held for
sale and $11 million of accumulated other comprehensive loss related to the sale of its Austrian business. During the third quarter
of 2021, the Company derecognized $187 million of pension liabilities included in liabilities held for sale and $33 million of
accumulated other comprehensive loss related to its German pharmaceutical wholesale business contributed to a joint venture, as
discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.”
Defined benefit plan assets and obligations are measured as of the Company’s fiscal year-end. The net periodic expense for the
Company’s pension plans is as follows:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Service cost - benefits earned during the year $ — $ — $ — $ 11 $ 15 $ 16 
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation — — 6 14 19 19 
Expected return on assets — — (4) (19) (20) (22)
Amortization of unrecognized actuarial loss and prior
service costs — — 2 3 5 6 
Curtailment/settlement loss (gain) — — 127 (5) — — 
Net periodic pension expense $ — $ — $ 131 $ 4 $ 19 $ 19 
The projected unit credit method is utilized in measuring net periodic pension expense over the employees’ service life for the
pension plans. Unrecognized actuarial losses exceeding 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the market value of
assets are amortized straight-line over the average remaining future service period of active employees.
110
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the changes in benefit obligations and plan assets for the Company’s pension plans is as follows:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Change in benefit obligations
Benefit obligation at beginning of period $ 9 $ 10 $ 875 $ 896 
Service cost — — 11 15 
Interest cost — — 14 19 
Actuarial loss (gain) — — (55) 89 
Benefits paid (1) (1) (35) (34)
Curtailment/settlement — — (32) — 
Expenses paid — — (1) — 
Divestiture — — (43) (187)
Foreign exchange impact and other — — (33) 77 
Benefit obligation at end of period $ 8 $ 9 $ 701 $ 875 
Change in plan assets
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of period $ — $ — $ 735 $ 594 
Actual return on plan assets — — (4) 87 
Employer and participant contributions 1 1 43 27 
Benefits paid (1) (1) (35) (34)
Expenses paid — — (1) — 
Settlements — — (24) — 
Foreign exchange impact and other — — (33) 61 
Fair value of plan assets at end of period $ — $ — $ 681 $ 735 
Funded status at end of period $ (8)$ (9) $ (20)$ (140)
Amounts recognized on the balance sheet
Current assets $ — $ — $ 49 $ — 
Long-term assets — — 40 54 
Current liabilities (1) (1) (90) (9)
Long-term liabilities (7) (8) (19) (185)
Total $ (8)$ (9) $ (20)$ (140)
(1) The benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation.
(2) The divestiture relates to the sale of the Company’ s Austrian business in 2022 and to the contribution of the Company’ s German
pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture in 2021 as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale.”
(3) Current assets  at March 31, 2022 include $49 million reclassified from long-term assets to assets held for sale as part of the Company’ s U.K.
disposal group. Current liabilities at March 31, 2022 include $85 million reclassified from long-term liabilities to liabilities held for sale as
part of the Company’ s E.U. disposal group. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale” for additional information.
The actuarial gain of $55 million in 2022 was primarily attributable to:
•Discount rates ($69 million gain): The weighted average discount rate for Non-U.S. plans increased to 2.67% as of March
31, 2022 from 1.89% as of March 31, 2021.(1)
(2)
(1)
(3)
(3)
111
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
•Demographic and assumption changes ($14 million loss): This represents the difference between actual and estimated
participant data and demographic factors, including items such as inflation assumption, compensation changes, mortality,
and other changes including losses related to the divestitures in 2022.
The actuarial loss of $89 million in 2021 was primarily attributable to:
•Discount rates ($32 million loss): The weighted average discount rate for Non-U.S. plans decreased to 1.89% as of March
31, 2021 from 2.03% as of March 31, 2020.
•Demographic and assumption changes ($57 million loss): This represents the difference between actual and estimated
participant data and demographic factors, including items such as inflation assumption, compensation changes, mortality,
and other changes including losses related to the divestiture in 2021.
The following table provides the projected benefit obligation, accumulated benefit obligation, and fair value of plan assets for
all the Company’s pension plans, including accumulated benefit obligation in excess of plan assets:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
March 31, March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Projected benefit obligation $ 8 $ 9 $ 701 $ 875 
Accumulated benefit obligation 8 9 689 847 
Fair value of plan assets — — 681 735 
Amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss consist of:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
March 31, March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Net actuarial loss $ 1 $ 1 $ 70 $ 120 
Prior service credit — — (2) (2)
Total $ 1 $ 1 $ 68 $ 118 
Other changes in accumulated other comprehensive income were as follows:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net actuarial loss (gain) $ — $ — $ (3)$ (32)$ (9)$ (24)
Amortization of:
Net actuarial loss — — (129) (14) (35) (6)
Prior service credit (cost) — — — 1 1 — 
Foreign exchange impact and other — — — (5) 15 (6)
Total recognized in other comprehensive loss
(income) $ — $ — $(132)$ (50)$ (28)$ (36)
112
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In 2022, the Company recognized $11 million in actuarial losses for pension plans to stockholders’ equity as a result of the sale
of its Austrian business. In 2021, the Company recognized $33 million in actuarial losses for pension plans to stockholders’ equity
as a result of the contribution of its German pharmaceutical wholesale business to a joint venture. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held
for Sale,” for more information. The Company recognized $127 million in actuarial losses for the pension plans to stockholders’
equity in 2020 as a result of the termination of the U.S. defined benefit pension plan and the settlement from the executive benefit
retirement plan for a retired executive.
Projected benefit obligations related to the Company’s unfunded U.S. plans were $8 million and $9 million at March 31, 2022
and 2021, respectively. Pension obligations for its unfunded plans are based on the recommendations of independent actuaries.
Projected benefit obligations relating to the Company’s unfunded non-U.S. plans were $101 million and $162 million at March 31,
2022 and 2021, respectively. Funding obligations for its non-U.S. plans vary based on the laws of each non-U.S. jurisdiction.
Expected benefit payments for the Company’s pension plans are as follows: $34 million, $33 million, $33 million, $34 million,
and $35 million for 2023 to 2027, respectively, and $186 million for 2028 through 2032. Expected benefit payments are based on
the same assumptions used to measure the benefit obligations and include estimated future employee service. Expected
contributions to be made for the Company’s pension plans are $13 million for 2023.
Weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the net periodic pension expense and the actuarial present value of benefit
obligations were as follows:
U.S. Plans Non-U.S. Plans
Years Ended March 31, Years Ended March 31,
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net periodic pension expense
Discount rates 2.35% 3.08% 3.66% 1.89 % 1.89 % 2.03 %
Rate of increase in compensation N/A N/A N/A 3.20 3.20 2.93 
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets N/A N/A 4.00 2.56 2.56 3.01 
Benefit obligation
Discount rates 3.35% 2.35% 3.08% 2.67 % 1.89 % 2.03 %
Rate of increase in compensation N/A N/A N/A 3.67 3.20 2.93 
(1)    This assumption is no longer needed in actuarial valuations as U.S. plans are frozen or have fixed benefits for the remaining active
participants.
The Company’s defined benefit pension plan liabilities are valued using a discount rate based on a yield curve developed from
a portfolio of high quality corporate bonds rated AA or better whose maturities are aligned with the expected benefit payments of
its plans. For March 31, 2022, the Company’s U.S. defined benefit liabilities are valued using a weighted-average discount rate of
3.35%, which represents an increase of 100 basis points from its 2021 weighted-average discount rate of 2.35%. The Company’s
non-U.S. defined benefit pension plan liabilities are valued using a weighted-average discount rate of 2.67%, which represents an
increase of 78 basis points from its 2021 weighted-average discount rate of 1.89%.
Plan Assets
Investment Strategy: For non-U.S. plan assets, the investment strategies are subject to local regulations and the asset/liability
profiles of the plans in each individual country. Plan assets of the non-U.S. plans are broadly invested in a manner appropriate to
the nature and duration of the expected future retirement benefits payable under the plans. Plan assets are primarily invested in
high-quality corporate and government bond funds and equity securities. Assets are properly diversified to avoid excessive reliance
on any particular asset, issuer, or group of undertakings so as to avoid accumulations of risk in the portfolio as a whole.
The Company develops the expected long-term rate of return assumption based on the projected performance of the asset
classes in which plan assets are invested. The target asset allocation was determined based on the liability and risk tolerance
characteristics of the plans and at times may be adjusted to achieve overall investment objectives.(1) (1)  (1)
(1) (1) (1)
113
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Fair Value Measurements: The fair value hierarchy has three levels based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine fair
value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2
refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs and Level 3 includes fair values estimated using significant
unobservable inputs. The following tables represent the Company’s pension plan assets as of March 31, 2022 and 2021, using the
fair value hierarchy by asset class:
Non-U.S. Plans
March 31, 2022 March 31, 2021
(In millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Cash and cash equivalents $ 15 $ — $ — $ 15 $ 5 $ — $ — $ 5 
Equity securities:
Equity commingled funds — 38 — 38 64 117 — 181 
Fixed income securities:
Government securities — 6 — 6 5 144 — 149 
Corporate bonds — 11 — 11 6 30 — 36 
Fixed income commingled
funds 336 25 — 361 51 222 1 274 
Other:
Annuity contracts — — 173 173 — — — — 
Real estate funds and Other 31 4 2 37 31 4 3 38 
Total $ 382 $ 84 $ 175 $ 641 $ 162 $ 517 $ 4 $ 683 
Assets held at NAV practical
expedient :
Other 40 52 
Total plan assets $ 681 $ 735 
(1)    Equity commingled funds, fixed income commingled funds, real estate funds, and other investments for which fair value is measured
using the NAV per share as a practical expedient are not leveled within the fair value hierarchy and are included as a reconciling item to
total investments.
Cash and cash equivalents - Cash and cash equivalents include short-term investment funds that maintain daily liquidity and
aim to have constant unit values of $1.00. The funds invest in short-term fixed income securities and other securities with debt-like
characteristics emphasizing short-term maturities and high credit quality. Directly held cash and cash equivalents are classified as
Level 1 investments. Cash and cash equivalents include money market funds and other commingled funds, which have daily net
asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1 investments.
Equity commingled funds - Some equity investments are held in commingled funds, which have daily net asset values derived
from quoted prices for the underlying securities in active markets; these are classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
Fixed income securities - Government securities consist of bonds and debentures issued by central governments or federal
agencies; corporate bonds consist of bonds and debentures issued by corporations. Inputs to the valuation methodology include
quoted prices for similar assets in active markets, and inputs that are observable for the asset, either directly or indirectly, for
substantially the full term of the asset. Multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible,
enabling cross-provider price validations. Fixed income securities are generally classified as Level 1 or Level 2 investments.
Fixed income commingled funds - Some fixed income investments are held in exchange traded or commingled funds, which
have daily net asset values derived from the underlying securities; these are classified as Level 1, 2, or 3 investments.(1)
114
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Annuity contracts - The value of the annuity contracts is reported by the Trustee and is based on a valuation of the remaining
contracted cash flow of the contract. Inputs in the valuation include discounted future cash flows; these are classified as Level 3
investments.
Real estate funds - The value of the real estate funds is reported by the fund manager and is based on a valuation of the
underlying properties. Inputs used in the valuation include items such as cost, discounted future cash flows, independent appraisals,
and market based comparable data. The real estate funds are classified as Level 1, 2, or 3 investments.
Other - At March 31, 2022 and 2021, this includes $35 million and $36 million, respectively, of plan asset value relating to the
SPK. In principle, the SPK is organized as a pay-as-you-go system guaranteed by the Norwegian government as it holds no
Company-owned assets to back the pension liabilities. The Company pays a pension premium used to fund the plan, which is paid
directly to the Norwegian government who establishes an account for each participating employer to keep track of the financial
status of the plan, including managing the contributions and the payments. Further, the investment return credited to this account is
determined annually by the SPK based on the performance of long-term government bonds.
The following table presents the changes in the Level 3 plan assets measured on a recurring basis for the year ended March 31,
2022:
(In millions) Level 3
Balance as of March 31, 2021 $ 4 
Purchases 196 
Return on assets (25)
Balance as of March 31, 2022 $ 175 
The activity attributable to Level 3 plan assets was not material for the year ended March 31, 2021.
Multiemployer Plans
The Company contributes to a number of multiemployer pension plans under the terms of collective-bargaining agreements
that cover union-represented employees in the U.S. In 2017, it also contributed to the Pensjonsordningen for Apoteketaten
(“POA”), a mandatory multiemployer pension scheme for its pharmacy employees in Norway, managed by the association of
Norwegian Pharmacies.
The risks of participating in these multiemployer plans are different from single-employer pension plans in the following
aspects: (i) assets contributed to the multiemployer plan by one employer may be used to provide benefits to employees of other
participating employers; (ii) if a participating employer stops contributing to the plan, the unfunded obligations of the plan may be
borne by the remaining participating employers; and (iii) if the Company chooses to stop participating in some of its multiemployer
plans, the Company may be required to pay those plans an amount based on the underfunded status of the plan, referred to as a
withdrawal liability. Actions taken by other participating employers may lead to adverse changes in the financial condition of a
multiemployer benefit plan and the Company’s withdrawal liability and contributions may increase.
Contributions and amounts accrued for U.S. plans were not material for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020.
Contributions to the POA for non-U.S. plans exceeding 5% of total plan contributions were $20 million, $22 million, and $17
million in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Based on actuarial calculations, the Company estimates the funded status for its non-
U.S. Plans to be approximately 88% as of March 31, 2022. No amounts were accrued for liability associated with the POA as the
Company has no intention to withdraw from the plan.
115
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company has a contributory retirement savings plan (“RSP”) for U.S. eligible employees. Eligible employees may
contribute to the RSP up to 75% of their eligible compensation on a pre-tax or post-tax basis not to exceed IRS limits. The
Company makes matching contributions in an amount equal to 100% of the employee’s first 3% of pay contributed and 50% for the
next 2% of pay contributed. The Company also may make an additional annual matching contribution for each plan year to enable
participants to receive a full match based on their annual contribution. The Company also contributed to non-U.S. plans that are
available in certain countries. Contribution expenses for the RSP and non-U.S. plans were $116 million for the year ended March
31, 2022 and $102 million for each of the years ended March 31, 2021 and 2020.
Postretirement Benefits
The Company maintains a number of postretirement benefit plans, primarily consisting of healthcare and life insurance
(“welfare”) benefits, for certain eligible U.S. employees. Eligible employees consist of those who retired before March 31, 1999
and those who retired after March 31, 1999, but were an active employee as of that date, after meeting other age-related criteria. It
also provides postretirement benefits for certain U.S. executives. Defined benefit plan obligations are measured as of the
Company’s fiscal year-end. The net periodic (credit) expense for the Company’s postretirement welfare benefits was not material
for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020. The benefit obligation at March 31, 2022 and 2021 was $56 million and $64
million, respectively.
15.    Hedging Activities
In the normal course of business, the Company is exposed to interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations. At
times, the Company limits these risks through the use of derivatives such as cross-currency swaps, foreign currency forward
contracts, and interest rate swaps. In accordance with the Company’s policy, derivatives are only used for hedging purposes. It does
not use derivatives for trading or speculative purposes.
Foreign currency exchange risk
The Company conducts its business worldwide in U.S. dollars and the functional currencies of its foreign subsidiaries,
including Euro, British pound sterling, and Canadian dollars. Changes in foreign currency exchange rates could have a material
adverse impact on the Company’s financial results that are reported in U.S. dollars. The Company is also exposed to foreign
currency exchange rate risk related to its foreign subsidiaries, including intercompany loans denominated in non-functional
currencies. The Company has certain foreign currency exchange rate risk programs that use foreign currency forward contracts and
cross-currency swaps. These forward contracts and cross-currency swaps are generally used to offset the potential income statement
effects from intercompany loans and other obligations denominated in non-functional currencies. These programs reduce but do not
entirely eliminate foreign currency exchange rate risk.
Non-Derivative Instruments Designated as Hedges
At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the Company had €1.1 billion and €1.7 billion, respectively, of Euro-denominated notes
designated as non-derivative net investment hedges. These hedges are utilized to hedge portions of the Company’s net investments
in non-U.S. subsidiaries against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S.
dollar. For all notes that are designated as net investment hedges and meet effectiveness requirements, the changes in carrying value
of the notes attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded in foreign currency translation adjustments in “Accumulated other
comprehensive loss” in the Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity (Deficit) where they offset foreign currency
translation gains and losses recorded on the Company’s net investments. To the extent foreign currency-denominated notes
designated as net investment hedges are ineffective, changes in carrying value attributable to the change in spot rates are recorded
in earnings.
On September 30, 2019, the Company de-designated its £450 million British pound sterling-denominated notes prospectively
from net investment hedges as the hedging relationship ceased to be effective.
Foreign currency gains or losses from net investment hedges recorded within Other comprehensive income were gains of $73
million in 2022, losses of $118 million in 2021, and gains of $39 million in 2020. Ineffectiveness on the Company’s non-derivative
net investment hedges during 2020 resulted in gains of $34 million which were recorded in earnings in “Other income, net” in the
Consolidated Statement of Operations. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s net investment hedges for the years ended
March 31, 2022 and 2021.
116
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Derivatives Designated as Hedges
At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the Company had cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges with a total gross
notional amount of $500 million Canadian dollars. Under the terms of the cross-currency swap contracts, the Company agrees with
third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in one currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at specified
intervals and to exchange principal in one currency for principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-upon
notional amounts. These swaps are utilized to hedge portions of the Company’s net investments denominated in Canadian dollars
against the effect of exchange rate fluctuations on the translation of foreign currency balances to the U.S. dollar. The changes in the
fair value of these derivatives attributable to the changes in spot currency exchange rates and differences between spot and forward
interest rates are recorded in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” in the Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity
(Deficit) where they offset foreign currency translation gains and losses recorded on the Company’s net investments denominated
in Canadian dollars. To the extent cross-currency swaps designated as hedges are ineffective, changes in carrying value attributable
to the change in spot rates are recorded in earnings. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s net investment hedges for the
years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020. The cross-currency swaps will mature in November 2024.
In 2020, the Company terminated its cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges with a total gross notional
amount of £932 million British pound sterling swaps. The termination was due to ineffectiveness in its British pound sterling
hedging program that arose due to 2019 impairments of goodwill and certain long-lived assets in the U.K. businesses. Proceeds
from the termination of these swaps totaled $84 million and resulted in a settlement gain of $34 million in 2020. This gain was
recorded in earnings in “Other income, net” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Gains or losses from the Company’s cross-currency swaps designated as net investment hedges recorded in Other
comprehensive income were losses of $4 million and $119 million in 2022 and 2021, respectively, and gains of $76 million in
2020. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s hedges for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020.
On September 30, 2019, the Company entered into a number of cross-currency swaps designated as fair value hedges with total
notional amounts of £450 million British pound sterling. Under the terms of the cross-currency swap contracts, the Company
agreed with third parties to exchange fixed interest payments in British pound sterling for floating interest payments in U.S. dollars
based on three-month LIBOR plus a spread. These swaps are utilized to hedge the changes in the fair value of the underlying £450
million British pound sterling notes resulting from changes in benchmark interest rates and foreign exchange rates. The changes in
the fair value of these derivatives, which are designated as fair value hedges, and the offsetting changes in the fair value of the
hedged notes are recorded in earnings. Gains from these fair value hedges recorded in earnings were largely offset by the losses
recorded in earnings related to these notes. The swaps will mature in February 2023.
From time to time, the Company also enters into cross-currency swaps to hedge intercompany loans denominated in non-
functional currencies. For cross-currency swap transactions, the Company agrees with third parties to exchange fixed interest
payments in one currency for fixed interest payments in another currency at specified intervals and to exchange principal in one
currency for principal in another currency, calculated by reference to agreed-upon notional amounts. These cross-currency swaps
are designed to reduce the income statement effects arising from fluctuations in foreign exchange rates and have been designated as
cash flow hedges. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the Company had cross-currency swaps with total gross notional amounts of
approximately $1.3 billion and $2.6 billion, respectively, which are designated as cash flow hedges. These swaps will mature
between July 2022 and January 2024.
For forward contracts and cross-currency swaps that are designated as cash flow hedges, the effective portion of changes in the
fair value of the hedges is recorded in Accumulated other comprehensive loss and reclassified into earnings in the same period in
which the hedged transaction affects earnings. Changes in fair values representing hedge ineffectiveness are recognized in current
earnings.
117
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On April 27, 2020, the Company entered into forward starting interest rate swaps designated as cash flow hedges, with
combined notional amounts of $500 million and €600 million, to hedge the variability of future benchmark interest rates on
planned bond issuances. Under the terms of the forward interest rate swap contracts, the Company agreed with third parties to pay
fixed interest payments for the $500 million swaps for floating interest payments in U.S. dollars based on three-month LIBOR and
to pay fixed interest payments for floating interest payments in Euros based on six-month Euro Interbank Offered Rate
(“EURIBOR”) for the €600 million swaps. The $500 million swaps were terminated upon the issuance of the 2025 Notes in
November 2020. The settlement loss on the swaps was not material and will be amortized on a straight-line basis as interest
expense over the five-year life of the 2025 Notes. The €600 million swaps were terminated in the second quarter of 2022 and the
loss on termination of the swaps recorded in interest expense was not material for the year ended March 31, 2022. Refer to
Financial Note 12, “Debt and Financing Activities,” for more information.
During 2022, the Company entered into forward starting interest rate swaps designated as cash flow hedges, with a combined
notional amount of $500 million, to hedge the variability of future benchmark interest rates on a planned bond issuance. Under the
terms of the forward interest rate swap contracts, the Company agreed with third parties to pay fixed interest payments for the $500
million swaps for floating interest payments in U.S. dollars based on three-month LIBOR.
Gains or losses from cash flow hedges recorded in Other comprehensive income were gains of $21 million in 2022, losses of
$42 million in 2021, and gains of $98 million in 2020. Gains or losses reclassified from Accumulated other comprehensive income
and recorded in “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations were not
material in 2022, 2021, and 2020. There was no ineffectiveness in the Company’s cash flow hedges for the years ended March 31,
2022, 2021, and 2020.
Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges
Derivative instruments not designated as hedges are marked-to-market at the end of each accounting period with the change in
value included in earnings.
From time to time, the Company enters into forward contracts to hedge the Euro against cash flows denominated in British
pound sterling and other European currencies. At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the total gross notional amounts of these contracts
were nil and $39 million, respectively. Changes in the fair values for contracts not designated as hedges are recorded directly into
earnings in “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Changes in
the fair values were not material in 2022, 2021, and 2020. Gains or losses from these contracts are largely offset by changes in the
value of the underlying intercompany obligations.
In 2020, the Company also entered into a number of forward contracts and swaps to offset a portion of the earnings impacts
from the ineffectiveness of the non-derivative net investment hedges discussed above. These contracts matured through January
2020 and none of these contracts were designated for hedge accounting. In December 2019, the Company entered into a series of
forward contracts with a total notional amount of €250 million to offset the earnings impact from its Euro-denominated notes.
These contracts and the notes against which they are offsetting matured in February 2020 and were not designated for hedge
accounting. Changes in the fair value for contracts not designated as hedges are recorded directly in earnings. In 2020, losses of $44
million were recorded in earnings in “Other income, net” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations, which offset the
ineffectiveness on the Company’s non-derivative net investment hedges noted above.
118
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding the fair value of derivatives on a gross basis is as follows:
Balance Sheet
CaptionMarch 31, 2022 March 31, 2021
Fair Value of
Derivative
U.S. Dollar
NotionalFair Value of
Derivative
U.S. Dollar
Notional (In millions) Asset Liability Asset Liability
Derivatives designated for
hedge accounting
Cross-currency swaps
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other/Other
accrued liabilities$ 30 $ 39 $ 1,537 $ 4 $ 47 $ 826 
Cross-currency swaps (non-
current)Other non-current
assets/liabilities — 36 679 72 92 2,663 
Forward starting interest rate
swaps (current)Other accrued
liabilities 31 — 500 — 7 704 
Total $ 61 $ 75 $ 76 $ 146 
Derivatives not designated for
hedge accounting
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Prepaid expenses
and other $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 29 
Foreign exchange contracts
(current)Other accrued
liabilities — — — — 1 10
Total $ — $ — $ — $ 1 
Refer to Financial Note 16, “Fair Value Measurements,” for more information on these recurring fair value measurements.
16.    Fair Value Measurements
The Company measures certain assets and liabilities at fair value in accordance with Accounting Standards Codification
(“ASC”) Topic 820, Fair Value Measurements and Disclosures. The fair value hierarchy consists of three levels of inputs that may
be used to measure fair value as follows:
Level 1 - quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
Level 2 - significant other observable market-based inputs.
Level 3 - significant unobservable inputs for which little or no market data exists and requires considerable assumptions that
are significant to the fair value measurement.
Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis
Cash and cash equivalents at March 31, 2022 and 2021 included investments in money market funds of $981 million and $1.6
billion, respectively, which are reported at fair value. The fair value of money market funds was determined using quoted prices for
identical investments in active markets, which are considered to be Level 1 inputs under the fair value measurements and disclosure
guidance. The carrying value of all other cash equivalents approximates their fair value due to their relatively short-term nature.
Fair values for the Company’s marketable securities were not material at March 31, 2022 and 2021.
Fair values of the Company’s interest rate swaps and foreign currency forward contracts were determined using observable
inputs from available market information, including quoted interest rates, foreign currency exchange rates, and other observable
inputs from available market information. These inputs are considered Level 2 under the fair value measurements and disclosure
guidance, and may not be representative of actual values that could have been realized or that will be realized in the future. Refer to
Financial Note 15, “Hedging Activities,” for fair value and other information on the Company’s derivatives including interest rate
swaps, forward foreign currency contracts, and cross-currency swaps.
119
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company holds investments in equity securities of U.S. growth stage companies that address both current and emerging
business challenges in the healthcare industry and which had carrying values of $346 million and $269 million at March 31, 2022
and 2021, respectively. These investments primarily consist of equity securities without readily determinable fair values and are
included in “Other non-current assets” in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. During 2022 and 2021, certain of the Company’s
investments in equity securities without readily determinable fair values experienced transactions which resulted in changes in the
observable price of those securities. Additionally, in 2021, certain of the Company’s investments in equity securities were converted
into shares of public common stock through initial public offerings and an acquisition. The Company exited most of its investments
in publicly traded shares in the fourth quarter of 2021. Net gains related to the Company’s investments in these equity securities
were approximately $98 million and $133 million, respectively, for the years ended March 31, 2022 and 2021. These net gains were
recorded in “Other income, net” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. The carrying value of publicly traded investments
was determined using quoted prices for identical investments in active markets and are considered to be Level 1 inputs.
Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
In addition to assets and liabilities that are measured at fair value on a recurring basis, the Company’s assets and liabilities are
also subject to nonrecurring fair value measurements. Generally, assets are recorded at fair value on a nonrecurring basis as a result
of impairment charges, including long-lived assets associated with the Company’s restructuring initiatives as discussed in more
detail in Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net.”
At March 31, 2022, the assets and liabilities associated with the E.U. disposal group and U.K. disposal group classified as held
for sale were measured at the lower of carrying value or fair value less costs to sell, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2,
“Held for Sale." Additionally, at March 31, 2022, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis included certain long-lived
assets within the International segment related to the Company’s operations in Denmark and its retail pharmacy businesses in
Canada, as discussed in Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net.”
At March 31, 2021, assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis included long-lived assets of the Company’s
International segment and its Europe Retail Pharmacy reporting unit within the International segment. Refer to Financial Note 3,
“Restructuring, Impairment, and Related Charges, Net” and Financial Note 11, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” for more
information.
The aforementioned investments in equity securities of U.S. growth stage companies include the carrying value of investments
without readily determinable fair values, which were determined using a measurement alternative and are recorded at cost less
impairment, plus or minus any changes in observable price from orderly transactions of the same or similar security of the same
issuer. These inputs are considered Level 2 under the fair value measurements and disclosure guidance and may not be
representative of actual values that could have been realized or that will be realized in the future.
There were no other liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis at March 31, 2022 and 2021.
Other Fair Value Disclosures
At March 31, 2022 and 2021, the carrying amounts of cash, certain cash equivalents, restricted cash, marketable securities,
receivables, drafts and accounts payable, short-term borrowings, and other current liabilities approximated their estimated fair
values because of the short maturity of these financial instruments.
The Company determines the fair value of commercial paper using quoted prices in active markets for identical instruments,
which are considered Level 1 inputs under the fair value measurements and disclosure guidance.
The Company’s long-term debt is also recorded at amortized cost. The carrying value and fair value of the Company’s long-
term debt was as follows:
March 31, 2022 March 31, 2021
(In millions)Carrying
Value Fair ValueCarrying
Value Fair Value
Long-term debt, including current maturities $ 5,879 $ 5,999 $ 7,148 $ 7,785 
120
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The estimated fair value of the Company’s long-term debt was determined using quoted market prices in a less active market
and other observable inputs from available market information, which are considered to be Level 2 inputs, and may not be
representative of actual values that could have been realized or that will be realized in the future.
Goodwill
Fair value assessments of the reporting unit and the reporting unit's net assets, which are performed for goodwill impairment
tests, are considered a Level 3 measurement due to the significance of unobservable inputs developed using company-specific
information. The Company considered a market approach as well as an income approach using a DCF model to determine the fair
value of each reporting unit.
Refer to Financial Note 11, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net,” for more information regarding goodwill impairment
charges recorded for certain reporting units during 2021.
Long-lived Assets
The Company utilizes multiple approaches including the DCF model and market approaches for estimating the fair value of
intangible assets. The future cash flows used in the analysis are based on internal cash flow projections from its long-range plans
and include significant assumptions by management. Accordingly, the fair value assessment of the long-lived assets is considered a
Level 3 fair value measurement.
The Company measures certain long-lived and intangible assets at fair value on a nonrecurring basis when events occur that
indicate an asset group may not be recoverable. If the carrying amount of an asset group is not recoverable, an impairment charge is
recorded to reduce the carrying amount by the excess over its fair value. Refer to Financial Note 3, “Restructuring, Impairment, and
Related Charges, Net” under the heading “Long-Lived Asset Impairments” for more information.
17.    Financial Guarantees and Warranties
Financial Guarantees
The Company has agreements with certain of its customers’ financial institutions, primarily in its International segment, under
which it has guaranteed the repurchase of its customers’ inventory or its customers’ debt in the event these customers are unable to
meet their obligations to those financial institutions. For the Company’s inventory repurchase agreements, among other
requirements, inventories must be in a resalable condition and any repurchase would be at a discount. The inventory repurchase
agreements mostly relate to certain Canadian customers and generally range from one to two years. Customers’ debt guarantees
generally range from one to 10 years and are primarily provided to facilitate financing for certain customers. The majority of the
Company’s customers’ debt guarantees are secured by certain assets of the customer. At March 31, 2022, the maximum amounts of
inventory repurchase guarantees and customers’ debt guarantees were $367 million and $84 million, respectively, of which the
Company has not accrued any material amounts. The expirations of these financial guarantees are as follows: $309 million, $45
million, $6 million, $15 million, and $12 million from 2023 through 2027, respectively, and $64 million thereafter.
At March 31, 2022, the Company’s banks and insurance companies have issued $214 million of standby letters of credit and
surety bonds, which were issued on the Company’s behalf primarily related to its customer contracts and in order to meet the
security requirements for statutory licenses and permits, court and fiduciary obligations, pension obligations in Europe, and its
workers’ compensation and automotive liability programs.
The Company’s software license agreements generally include certain provisions for indemnifying customers against liabilities
if its software products infringe a third party’s intellectual property rights. To date, the Company has not incurred any material costs
as a result of such indemnification agreements and has not accrued any liabilities related to such obligations.
In conjunction with certain transactions, primarily divestitures, the Company may provide routine indemnification agreements
(such as retention of previously existing environmental, tax, and employee liabilities) whose terms vary in duration and often are
not explicitly defined. Where appropriate, obligations for such indemnifications are recorded as liabilities. Because the amounts of
these indemnification obligations often are not explicitly stated, the overall maximum amount of these commitments cannot be
reasonably estimated. Other than obligations recorded as liabilities at the time of divestiture, the Company has historically not made
material payments as a result of these indemnification provisions.
121
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Warranties
In the normal course of business, the Company provides certain warranties and indemnification protection for its products and
services. For example, the Company provides warranties that the pharmaceutical and medical-surgical products it distributes are in
compliance with the U.S. Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and other applicable laws and regulations. It has received the same
warranties from its suppliers, which customarily are the manufacturers of the products. In addition, the Company has indemnity
obligations to its customers for these products, which have also been provided from its suppliers, either through express agreement
or by operation of law. Accrued warranty costs were not material to the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
18.    Commitments and Contingent Liabilities
In addition to commitments and obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business, the Company is subject to a variety of
claims and legal proceedings, including claims from customers and vendors, pending and potential legal actions for damages,
governmental investigations, and other matters. The Company and its affiliates are parties to the legal claims and proceedings
described below. The Company is vigorously defending itself against those claims and in those proceedings. Significant
developments in those matters are described below. If the Company is unsuccessful in defending, or if it determines to settle, any of
these matters, it may be required to pay substantial sums, be subject to injunction and/or be forced to change how it operates its
business, which could have a material adverse impact on its financial position or results of operations.
Unless otherwise stated, the Company is unable to reasonably estimate the loss or a range of possible loss for the matters
described below. Often, the Company is unable to determine that a loss is probable, or to reasonably estimate the amount of loss or
a range of loss, for a claim because of the limited information available and the potential effects of future events and decisions by
third parties, such as courts and regulators, that will determine the ultimate resolution of the claim. Many of the matters described
are at preliminary stages, raise novel theories of liability or seek an indeterminate amount of damages. It is not uncommon for
claims to remain unresolved over many years. The Company reviews loss contingencies at least quarterly to determine whether the
likelihood of loss has changed and whether it can make a reasonable estimate of the loss or range of loss. When the Company
determines that a loss from a claim is probable and reasonably estimable, it records a liability for an estimated amount. The
Company also provides disclosure when it is reasonably possible that a loss may be incurred or when it is reasonably possible that
the amount of a loss will exceed its recorded liability. Amounts included within “Claims and litigation charges, net” in the
Consolidated Statement of Operations consist of estimated loss contingencies related to opioid-related litigation matters.
I. Litigation and Claims Involving Distribution of Controlled Substances
The Company and its affiliates have been sued as defendants in many cases asserting claims related to distribution of
controlled substances. They have been named as defendants along with other pharmaceutical wholesale distributors, pharmaceutical
manufacturers, and retail pharmacy chains. The plaintiffs in these actions have included state attorneys general, county and
municipal governments, school districts, tribal nations, hospitals, health and welfare funds, third-party payors, and individuals.
These actions have been filed in state and federal courts throughout the U.S., and in Puerto Rico and Canada. They seek monetary
damages and other forms of relief based on a variety of causes of action, including negligence, public nuisance, unjust enrichment,
and civil conspiracy, as well as alleging violations of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (“RICO”), state and
federal controlled substances laws, and other statutes.
On July 21, 2021, the Company and the two other national pharmaceutical distributors (collectively “Distributors”) announced
that they had negotiated a comprehensive proposed settlement agreement which, if all conditions were satisfied, would result in the
settlement of a substantial majority of opioid lawsuits filed by state and local governmental entities. On February 25, 2022, the
Distributors determined that there was sufficient State and subdivision participation to proceed with an agreement ("Settlement") to
settle a substantial majority of opioids-related lawsuits filed against the Distributors by U.S. states, territories, and local
governmental entities. As previously disclosed, 46 of 49 eligible states and their participating subdivisions, as well as the District of
Columbia and all eligible territories (collectively, “Settling Governmental Entities”), have agreed to join the Settlement. To date,
over 98% of eligible political subdivisions that have brought opioid-related suits against the Company, as calculated by population
under the agreement, have agreed to participate in the settlement or have had their claims addressed by state legislation.
122
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Settlement became effective on April 2, 2022. If all conditions to the Settlement are satisfied, including the receipt of
approval by relevant courts of consent decrees to dismiss the lawsuits, the Distributors would pay the Settling Governmental
Entities up to approximately $19.5 billion over 18 years, with up to approximately $7.4 billion to be paid by the Company for its
38.1% portion. Under the Settlement, a minimum of 85% of the settlement payments must be used by state and local governmental
entities to remediate the opioid epidemic. Most of the remaining percentage relates to plaintiffs’ attorneys’ fees and costs, and
would be payable over a shorter time period. Under the Settlement, the Distributors will establish a clearinghouse to consolidate
their controlled-substance distribution data, which will be available to the settling U.S. states to use as part of their anti-diversion
efforts. The Settlement provides that the Distributors do not admit liability or wrongdoing and do not waive any defenses.
Before the effective date of the Settlement, the Company entered into separate settlement agreements with the states of New
York, Ohio, Rhode Island, Texas, and Florida. These states intended to participate in the Settlement when it was finalized, and these
agreements provided that each state and its participating subdivisions would receive a settlement consistent with their allocation
under the comprehensive Settlement framework, as well as, in some cases, certain attorneys’ fees and costs. Now that the
Settlement has become effective, these separate settlement agreements have become part of that broader agreement.
Three eligible states, Alabama, Oklahoma, and Washington, did not join the Settlement.
With respect to the claims of the Alabama attorney general, the Company has negotiated an agreement in principle under which
the Company will pay $141 million in ten equal annual installments and an additional approximately $33 million in attorney fees
and costs to resolve the opioid-related claims of the state of Alabama and its subdivisions. On May 3, 2022, the Distributors
announced an agreement with the attorney general of Washington to settle the claims of the state of Washington and its
subdivisions. Under that agreement, Washington and its subdivisions would be paid up to $518 million, of which the Company’s
portion would be 38.1% (or approximately $197 million), consistent with Washington’s allocation under the comprehensive
framework, as well as certain additional attorneys’ fees and costs. The claims of the Oklahoma attorney general are pending in the
District Court of Bryan County, Oklahoma (Case No. CJ-2020-84, 85, and 86), and trial is scheduled to begin in January 2023. The
Company’s loss contingency accruals for these three states and their subdivisions reflect the amounts of these agreements in
principle or, where there is no agreement in principle, amounts equivalent to what that state and its subdivisions would have been
allocated under the framework of the Settlement.
The Company previously settled with the state of West Virginia, and West Virginia and its subdivisions were not eligible to
participate in the comprehensive Settlement. Claims of various West Virginia subdivisions remain pending in both state and federal
courts. Trial in the case of Cabell County and City of Huntington occurred in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of
West Virginia and concluded on July 28, 2021. The outcome of that trial is pending. The claims of certain other West Virginia
subdivisions are pending in the federal Multi-district Litigation and before the state Mass Litigation Panel. On September 30, 2021,
the Mass Litigation Panel issued an order scheduling a liability-only trial on the public nuisance claims of certain political
subdivisions against the Distributors for July 5, 2022. The Company’s loss contingency accruals for the West Virginia subdivisions
are reflected in the estimated liability for the opioid-related claims as of March 31, 2022.
With respect to the claims of Native American tribes, on September 28, 2021, the Company announced that the Distributors
reached an agreement with the Cherokee Nation to pay approximately $75 million over 6.5 years to resolve opioid-related claims,
of which the Company’s portion would be 38.1% (or, approximately $29 million). The Company has also negotiated a broad
resolution of opioid-related claims brought by Native American tribes. Under the proposed agreement, which has been endorsed by
the leadership committee of counsel representing the tribes, the Distributors would pay the Native American tribes other than the
Cherokee Nation approximately $440 million over 6 years, of which the Company’s portion would be 38.1% (or, approximately
$167 million). This broad resolution is contingent on the participation of a substantial majority of the Native American tribes that
have brought opioid-related claims against the Distributors. Under these agreements, a minimum of 85% of the settlement
payments must be used by the Native American tribes to remediate the opioid epidemic. The Company’s loss-contingency accruals
for the Native American tribes reflect these amounts and are reflected in the estimated liability for the opioid-related claims as of
March 31, 2022.
123
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Although the Settlement terminated the substantial majority of opioid-related suits pending against the Company, a small
number of subdivisions in participating states have opted not to participate in the comprehensive settlement, and other suits brought
by subdivisions in non-participating states remain pending. The Company continues to prepare for trial in these pending matters
and believes that it has valid defenses to the claims pending against it, and it intends to vigorously defend against all such claims if
acceptable settlement terms are not achieved. The Company’s loss contingency accruals for these subdivisions are reflected in the
estimated liability for the opioid-related claims consistent with what would be allocated under the framework of the settlement.
The Company has paid $157 million in payments to date associated with the Settlement and separate settlement agreements of
opioid-related claims of participating states, subdivisions, and Native American tribes.
The Company’s estimated accrued liability for the opioid-related claims of governmental entities is as follows:
(In millions) March 31, 2022 March 31, 2021
Current litigation liabilities $ 1,046 $ — 
Long-term litigation liabilities 7,220 8,067 
Total litigation liabilities $ 8,266 $ 8,067 
(1) This amount, recorded in “Other accrued liabilities” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet, is the amount estim ated to be paid prior to March 31,
2023.
(2) In light of the uncertainty of the timing of amounts that would be paid with respect to the charge, the charge was recorded in “Long-term
litigation liabilities” in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2021.
Consistent with the terms of the Settlement, the Company placed approximately $354 million into escrow on September 30,
2021. During the second half of 2022, the Company placed an additional net $41 million into escrow to reflect the participation of
additional states, and as part of a separate agreement in principle with the Alabama attorney general. Those escrow amounts were
presented as restricted cash within “Prepaid expenses and other” in our Consolidated Balance Sheet as of March 31, 2022. These
amounts excluded the proportionate allocation under the Settlement for each non-participating state. The Settlement created a
binding obligation to release the funds from escrow upon entry of consent judgments and establishment of a settlement
administrator.
Although the vast majority of opioid claims have been brought by governmental entities in the U.S., the Company is also a
defendant in cases brought in the U.S. by private plaintiffs, such as hospitals, health and welfare funds, third-party payors, and
individuals, as well as four cases brought in Canada (three by governmental or tribal entities and one by an individual). These
claims, and those of private entities generally, are not included in the Settlement or in the charges recorded by the Company,
described above. The Company believes it has valid legal defenses in these matters and intends to mount a vigorous defense. Trial
is scheduled for July 18, 2022 in one such case brought by a group of individual plaintiffs in Glynn County, Georgia Superior
Court. These plaintiffs seek to recover for damages allegedly arising from their family members’ abuse of prescription opioids.
Poppell v. Cardinal Health, Inc. et al., CE19-00472. The Company has not concluded a loss is probable in any of these matters; nor
is any possible loss or range of loss reasonably estimable.
Because of the many uncertainties associated with the remaining opioid-related litigation matters, the Company is not able to
reasonably estimate the upper or lower ends of the range of ultimate possible loss for all opioid-related litigation matters. An
adverse judgment or negotiated resolution in any of these matters could have a material adverse impact on the Company’s financial
position, cash flows or liquidity, or results of operations.
On August 8, 2018, the Company was served with a qui tam complaint pending in the United States District Court for the
District of Massachusetts alleging that the Company violated the federal False Claims Act and various state false claims acts due to
the alleged failure of the Company and other defendants to report providers who were engaged in diversion of controlled
substances. United States ex rel. Manchester v. Purdue Pharma, L.P., et al., Case No. 1-16-cv-10947. On August 22, 2018, the
United States filed a motion to dismiss. The relator died, and on February 25, 2019 the court entered an order staying the matter
until a proper party can be substituted, and providing that if no party is substituted within 90 days of February 25, 2019, the case
would be dismissed. In April 2019, the widow of the relator filed a motion to substitute their daughter as the relator; the United
States and defendants opposed this substitution request. The motion remains pending and the case remains stayed.(1) (2)
124
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In December 2019, the Company was served with two qui tam complaints filed by the same two relators alleging violations of
the federal False Claims Act, the California False Claims Act, and the California Unfair Business Practices statute based on alleged
predicate violations of the Controlled Substances Act and its implementing regulations, United States ex rel. Kelley, 19-cv-2233,
and State of California ex rel. Kelley, CGC-19-576931. The complaints seek relief including treble damages, civil penalties,
attorney fees, and costs in unspecified amounts. On February 16, 2021, the court in the federal action dismissed the second
amended complaint with prejudice, and the relators appealed the dismissal to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, which
affirmed the dismissal on March 10, 2022. On June 28, 2021, the court in the state action dismissed the complaint with prejudice,
and the relators appealed the dismissal to the Superior Court of California, County of San Francisco.
Insurance Coverage Litigation
Two cases pending in the Northern District of California were filed against McKesson by its liability umbrella insurers about
policies they issued to the Company for the period 1999-2017, AIU Insurance Company and National Union Fire Insurance
Company of Pittsburgh, Pa. (together "AIG") and ACE Property and Casualty Insurance Company ("ACE"). AIU Insurance
Company et al. v. McKesson Corporation, No. 3:20-cv-07469 (N.D. Cal.) was initiated by AIG in the Northern District of
California on October 23, 2020. Ace Property and Casualty Insurance Company v. McKesson Corporation et al., No. 3:20-cv-
09356 (N.D. Cal.) was brought by ACE in California state court on November 2, 2020, and was removed by McKesson to federal
court, transferred to the Northern District of California, and designated as related to the AIU action. AIG and ACE are seeking
declarations that they have no duty to defend or indemnify McKesson in the thousands of lawsuits pending in federal and state
courts related to opioids. In both actions, McKesson has asserted claims under the AIG and ACE policies seeking declarations and
damages for past and future defense and indemnity costs. On April 5, 2022, the court issued an order granting partial summary
judgment to the insurers that the Company’s defense costs in certain opioid-related litigation were not covered by two of the
insurance policies.
II. Other Litigation and Claims
On May 17, 2013, the Company was served with a complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District
of California by True Health Chiropractic Inc., alleging that McKesson sent unsolicited marketing faxes in violation of the
Telephone Consumer Protection Act of 1991 (“TCPA”), as amended by the Junk Fax Protection Act of 2005 or JFPA, True Health
Chiropractic Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation, et al., No. CV-13-02219 (HG). Plaintiffs seek statutory damages
from $500 to $1,500 per violation plus injunctive relief. True Health Chiropractic later amended its complaint, adding McLaughlin
Chiropractic Associates as an additional named plaintiff and McKesson Technologies Inc. as a defendant. Both plaintiffs alleged
that defendants violated the TCPA by sending faxes that did not contain notices regarding how to opt out of receiving the faxes. On
August 13, 2019, the court granted plaintiffs’ renewed motion for class certification. After class notice and the opt-out period, 9,490
fax numbers remain in the class, representing 48,769 faxes received. On October 8, 2021, the court de-certified the class citing the
plaintiffs lacked class-wide proof identifying the manner of receipt, thus leaving two named Plaintiffs remaining in the case. On
April 27, 2022, the Court found that the named Plaintiffs had failed to meet their burden to show Defendants willfully or knowingly
violated the TCPA and therefore were not entitled to treble damages. The Court found McKesson liable for statutory damages in the
amount of $6,500.
On April 16, 2013, the Company’s subsidiary, U.S. Oncology, Inc. (“USON”), was served with a third amended qui tam
complaint filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by two relators, purportedly on behalf of the
United States, 21 states and the District of Columbia, against USON and five other defendants, alleging that USON solicited and
received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the False Claims Act, and various state false
claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified amounts,
United States ex rel. Piacentile v. Amgen Inc., et al., CV 04-3983 (SJ). Previously, the United States declined to intervene in the
case as to all allegations and defendants except for Amgen. On September 30, 2013, the court granted the United States’ motion to
dismiss the claims pled against Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USON’s motion to dismiss the claims pled
against it, with leave to amend. On November 16, 2018, the relators filed a fourth amended complaint; that complaint was
dismissed with prejudice on December 1, 2021. Plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal with the Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit
on January 4, 2022.
125
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On June 17, 2014, U.S. Oncology Specialty, LP (“USOS”) was served with a fifth amended qui tam complaint filed in the
United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York by a relator alleging that USOS, among others, solicited and
received illegal “kickbacks” from Amgen in violation of the Anti-Kickback Statute, the federal False Claims Act, and various state
false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit, all in unspecified
amounts, United States ex rel. Hanks v. Amgen, Inc., et al., CV-08-03096 (SJ). Previously, the U.S. declined to intervene in the case
as to all allegations and defendants except for Amgen. On September 17, 2018, the court granted USOS’s motion to dismiss.
Following the relator’s appeal, the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit vacated the district court’s order and
remanded the suit to the district court, directing it to consider the question of whether the suit should be dismissed for lack of
jurisdiction. The district court granted the relator leave to amend the complaint for a seventh time. The relator filed the seventh
amended complaint on November 30, 2020.
On April 3, 2018, a second amended qui tam complaint was filed in the United States District Court for the Eastern District of
New York by a relator, purportedly on behalf of the United States, 30 states, the District of Columbia, and two cities against
McKesson Corporation, McKesson Specialty Care Distribution Corporation, McKesson Specialty Distribution LLC, McKesson
Specialty Care Distribution Joint Venture, L.P., Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation, Oncology Therapeutics Network
Joint Venture, L.P., US Oncology, Inc. and US Oncology Specialty, L.P., alleging that from 2001 through 2010 the defendants
repackaged and sold single-dose syringes of oncology medications in a manner that violated the federal False Claims Act and
various state and local false claims statutes, and seeking damages, treble damages, civil penalties, attorneys’ fees and costs of suit,
all in unspecified amounts, United States ex rel. Omni Healthcare Inc. v. McKesson Corporation, et al., 12-CV-06440 (NG). The
United States and the named states have declined to intervene in the case. On October 15, 2018, the Company filed a motion to
dismiss the complaint as to all named defendants. On February 4, 2019, the court granted the motion to dismiss in part and denied it
in part, leaving the Company and Oncology Therapeutics Network Corporation as the only remaining defendants in the case. On
December 9, 2019, the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York ordered the unsealing of another complaint
filed by the same relator, alleging the same misconduct and seeking the same relief with respect to US Oncology, Inc., purportedly
on behalf of the same government entities, United States ex rel. Omni Healthcare, Inc. v. US Oncology, Inc., 19-cv-05125. The
United States and the named states declined to intervene in the case.
The Company is a defendant in an amended complaint filed on June 15, 2018 in a case pending in the United States District
Court for the Southern District of Illinois alleging that the Company’s subsidiary, McKesson Medical-Surgical Inc., among others,
violated the Sherman Act by restraining trade in the sale of safety and conventional syringes and safety IV catheters. Marion
Diagnostic Center, LLC v. Becton, Dickinson, et al., No. 18:1059. The action is filed on behalf of a purported class of purchasers,
and seeks treble damages and further relief, all in unspecified amounts. On July 20, 2018, the defendants filed a motion to dismiss.
On November 30, 2018, the district court granted the motion to dismiss, and dismissed the complaint with prejudice. On December
27, 2018, plaintiffs appealed the order to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit. On March 5, 2020, the United
States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit vacated the district court’s order, and ruled that dismissal was appropriate on
alternative grounds. The case was remanded to the district court to allow the plaintiffs an opportunity to amend their complaint.
Plaintiffs filed an amended complaint on August 21, 2020. Defendants filed a motion to dismiss the amended complaint, which the
district court granted on March 15, 2021. Plaintiffs appealed the order to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit,
which affirmed the district court’s dismissal on March 18, 2022.
On December 30, 2019, a group of independent pharmacies and a hospital filed a purported class action complaint alleging that
the Company and other distributors violated the Sherman Act by colluding with manufacturers to restrain trade in the sale of
generic drugs. Reliable Pharmacy, et al. v. Actavis Holdco US, et al., No. 2:19-cv-6044; MDL No. 16-MD-2724. The complaint
seeks relief including treble damages, disgorgement, attorney fees, and costs in unspecified amounts.
On December 12, 2018, the Company received a purported class action complaint in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of California, alleging that McKesson and two of its former officers, CEO John Hammergren and CFO James
Beer, violated the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by reporting profits and revenues from 2013 until early 2017 that were false and
misleading, due to an alleged undisclosed conspiracy to fix the prices of generic drugs. Evanston Police Pension Fund v. McKesson
Corporation, No. 3:18-06525. The complaint seeks relief including damages, attorney fees, and costs in unspecified amounts. On
February 8, 2019, the court appointed the Pension Trust Fund for Operating Engineers as the lead plaintiff. On April 10, 2019, the
lead plaintiff filed an amended complaint that added insider trading allegations against defendant Hammergren. On April 8, 2021,
the court granted plaintiff’s motion for class certification.
126
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
In July 2015, The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company (“A&P”), a former customer of the Company, filed for reorganization
in bankruptcy under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code in the Bankruptcy Court for the Southern District of New
York. In re The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al., Case No. 15-23007. A suit filed in 2017 against the Company in
this bankruptcy case seeks to recover alleged preferential transfers. The Official Committee of Unsecured Creditors on behalf of the
bankruptcy estate of The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Company, Inc., et al. v. McKesson Corporation d/b/a McKesson Drug Co.,
Adv. Proc. No. 17-08264.
In October 2019, the Company’s subsidiary NDCHealth Corporation dba RelayHealth (“RelayHealth”) was served with three
purported class action complaints filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois. The complaints
allege that RelayHealth violated the Sherman Act by entering into an agreement with co-defendant Surescripts, LLC not to compete
in the electronic prescription routing market, and by conspiring with Surescripts, LLC to monopolize that market, Powell
Prescription Center, et al. v. Surescripts, LLC, et al., No. 1:19-cv-06627; Intergrated Pharmaceutical Solutions LLC v. Surescripts,
LLC, et al., 1:19-cv-06778; Falconer Pharmacy, Inc. v. Surescripts LLC, et al., No. 1:19-cv-07035. In November 2019, three
similar complaints were filed in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Illinois. Kennebunk Village Pharmacy,
Inc. v. SureScripts, LLC, et al., 1:19-cv-7445; Whitman v. SureScripts, LLC et al., No. 1:19-cv-7448; BBK Global Corp. v.
SureScripts, LLC et al., 1:19-cv-7640. In December 2019, the six actions were consolidated in the Northern District of Illinois. The
complaints seek relief including treble damages, attorney fees, and costs. Plaintiffs and RelayHealth reached an agreement in June
2020 to resolve the class action lawsuits and RelayHealth paid into escrow an amount not material in the context of the Company’s
overall financial results. The settlement does not include any admission of liability, and RelayHealth expressly denies wrongdoing.
The Court granted Plaintiffs’ motion for final approval of the settlement on February 24, 2022.
In July 2020, the Company was served with a first amended qui tam complaint filed in the United States District Court for the
Southern District of New York by a relator on behalf of the U.S., 27 states and the District of Columbia against McKesson
Corporation, McKesson Specialty Distribution LLC, and McKesson Specialty Care Distribution Corporation, alleging that
defendants violated the Anti-Kickback Statute, federal False Claims Act, and various state false claims statutes by providing certain
business analytical tools to oncology practice customers, United States ex rel. Hart v. McKesson Corporation, et al., 15-cv-00903-
RA. The U.S. and the named states have declined to intervene in the case. The complaint seeks relief including damages, treble
damages, civil penalties, attorney fees, and costs of suit, all in unspecified amounts. On May 5, 2022, the district court granted the
Company’s motion to dismiss the complaint, but granted the plaintiff leave to amend the complaint.
III. Government Subpoenas and Investigations
From time to time, the Company receives subpoenas or requests for information from various government agencies. The
Company generally responds to such subpoenas and requests in a cooperative, thorough, and timely manner. These responses
sometimes require time and effort and can result in considerable costs being incurred by the Company. Such subpoenas and
requests can lead to the assertion of claims or the commencement of civil or criminal legal proceedings against the Company and
other members of the health care industry, as well as to settlements of claims against the Company. The Company responds to these
requests in the ordinary course of business. The following are examples of the type of subpoenas or requests the Company receives
from time to time.
In May 2017 and August 2018, respectively, the Company was served with two separate Civil Investigative Demands by the
U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of New York relating to the certification the Company obtained for two software
products under the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services’ Electronic Health Record Incentive Program.
In April and June 2019, the United States Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of New York served grand jury subpoenas
seeking documents related to the Company’s anti-diversion policies and procedures and its distribution of Schedule II controlled
substances. The Company believes the subpoenas are part of a broader investigation by that office into pharmaceutical
manufacturers’ and distributors’ compliance with the Controlled Substances Act and related statutes.
In January 2020, the United States Attorney’s Office for the District of Massachusetts served a Civil Investigative Demand on
the Company seeking documents related to certain discounts and rebates paid to physician practice customers.
127
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
On November 21, 2016, the Belgian Competition Authority carried out inspections at the premises of several Belgian
wholesalers, including Belmedis SA, which was subsequently acquired by the Company. Pharma Belgium NV was also part of the
investigation. The Company resolved this matter in April 2022 by paying fines not material in the context of the Company’s overall
financial results that had been fully reserved for in the third quarter of 2022.
On May 19, 2021, the Norwegian Competition Authority carried out an inspection of Norsk Medisinaldepot AS regarding its
and its competitors alleged sharing of competitively sensitive information.
In June 2021, the United States Department of Justice served a Civil Investigative Demand on the Company seeking
documents related to distribution arrangements for ophthalmology products.
IV. State Opioid Statutes
Legislative, regulatory, or industry measures to address the misuse of prescription opioid medications could affect the
Company’s business in ways that it may not be able to predict. For example, in April 2018, the State of New York adopted the
Opioid Stewardship Act (the “OSA”) which required the creation of an aggregate $100 million annual surcharge on all
manufacturers and distributors licensed to sell or distribute opioids in New York. The initial surcharge payment would have been
due on January 1, 2019 for opioids sold or distributed during calendar year 2017. On July 6, 2018, the Healthcare Distribution
Alliance filed a lawsuit challenging the constitutionality of the law and seeking an injunction against its enforcement. On December
19, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York found the law unconstitutional and issued an injunction
preventing the State of New York from enforcing the law. The State appealed that decision. On September 14, 2020, a panel of the
U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit reversed the district court’s decision on procedural grounds. The Company has
accrued a $50 million pre-tax charge ($37 million after-tax) as its estimated share of the OSA surcharge for calendar years 2017 and
2018. This OSA provision was recognized in “Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses” in the Consolidated
Statement of Operations for the year ended March 31, 2021 and in “Other accrued liabilities” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet as
of March 31, 2021. The State of New York adopted an excise tax on sales of opioids in the State, which became effective July 1,
2019. The law adopting the excise tax made clear that the OSA does not apply to sales or distributions occurring after December
31, 2018. The Healthcare Distribution Alliance filed a petition for panel rehearing, or, in the alternative, for rehearing en banc with
the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit; that petition was denied on December 18, 2020. On February 12, 2021, the Court
of Appeals for the Second Circuit granted a motion by the Healthcare Distribution Alliance to stay its mandate pending the filing
and disposition of a petition for writ of certiorari before the U.S. Supreme Court. That petition was denied on October 4, 2021. In
December 2021, McKesson paid $26 million for the assessment for calendar year 2017 while reserving all rights to challenge the
constitutionality of the assessment.
V. Environmental Matters
Primarily as a result of the operation of the Company’s former chemical businesses, which were fully divested by 1987, the
Company is involved in various matters pursuant to environmental laws and regulations. The Company has received claims and
demands from governmental agencies relating to investigative and remedial actions purportedly required to address environmental
conditions alleged to exist at five sites where it, or entities acquired by it, formerly conducted operations and the Company, by
administrative order or otherwise, has agreed to take certain actions at those sites, including soil and groundwater remediation.
Based on a determination by the Company’s environmental staff, in consultation with outside environmental specialists and
counsel, the current estimate of the Company’s probable loss associated with the remediation costs for these five sites is $15
million, net of amounts anticipated from third parties. The $15 million is expected to be paid out between April 2022 and March
2052. The Company has accrued for the estimated probable loss for these environmental matters.
128
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Company has been designated as a Potentially Responsible Party (“PRP”) under the Superfund law for environmental
assessment and cleanup costs as the result of its alleged disposal of hazardous substances at 14 sites. With respect to these sites,
numerous other PRPs have similarly been designated and while the current state of the law potentially imposes joint and several
liabilities upon PRPs, as a practical matter, costs of these sites are typically shared with other PRPs. At one of these sites, the
United States Environmental Protection Agency has selected a preferred remedy with an estimated cost of approximately $1.4
billion. It is not certain at this point in time what proportion of this estimated liability will be borne by the Company. Accordingly,
the Company’s estimated probable loss at those 14 sites is approximately $29 million, which has been accrued for in the
Consolidated Balance Sheets. However, it is possible that the ultimate costs of these matters may exceed or be less than the
reserves.
VI. Value Added Tax Assessments
The Company operates in various countries outside the U.S. which collect value added taxes (“VAT”). The determination of
the manner in which a VAT applies to the Company’s foreign operations is subject to varying interpretations arising from the
complex nature of the tax laws. The Company has received assessments for VAT which are in various stages of appeal. The
Company disagrees with these assessments and believes that it has a strong legal argument to defend its tax positions. Certain VAT
assessments relate to years covered by an indemnification agreement. Due to the complex nature of the tax laws, it is not possible to
estimate the outcome of these matters. However, based on currently available information, the Company believes the ultimate
outcome of these matters will not have a material adverse effect on its financial position, cash flows or results of operations.
VII. Antitrust Settlements
Numerous lawsuits have been filed against certain brand pharmaceutical manufacturers alleging that the manufacturer, by itself
or in concert with others, took improper actions to delay or prevent generic drugs from entering the market. These lawsuits are
typically brought as class actions. The Company has not been named a plaintiff in any of these class action lawsuits, but has been a
member of the class of those who purchased directly from the pharmaceutical manufacturers. Some of these class action lawsuits
have settled in the past with the Company receiving proceeds, including $46 million, $181 million, and $22 million in 2022, 2021,
and 2020, respectively, which were included in “Cost of sales” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
VIII. Other Matters
The Company is involved in various other litigation, governmental proceedings, and claims, not described above, that arise in
the normal course of business. While it is not possible to determine the ultimate outcome or the duration of such litigation,
governmental proceedings, or claims, the Company believes, based on current knowledge and the advice of counsel, that such
litigation, proceedings, and claims will not have a material impact on the Company’s financial position or results of operations.
19.    Stockholders' Equity (Deficit)
Each share of the Company’s outstanding common stock is permitted one vote on proposals presented to stockholders and is
entitled to share equally in any dividends declared by the Board.
In July 2021, the quarterly dividend was raised from $0.42 to $0.47 per common share for dividends declared on or after such
date by the Board. Dividends were $1.83 per share in 2022, $1.67 per share in 2021, and $1.62 in 2020. The Company anticipates
that it will continue to pay quarterly cash dividends in the future. However, the payment and amount of future dividends remain
within the discretion of the Board and will depend upon the Company’s future earnings, financial condition, capital requirements,
and other factors.
Share Repurchase Plans
Stock repurchases may be made from time-to-time in open market transactions, privately negotiated transactions, through
accelerated share repurchase (“ASR”) programs, or by combinations of such methods, any of which may use pre-arranged trading
plans that are designed to meet the requirements of Rule 10b5-1(c) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The timing of any
repurchases and the actual number of shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including the Company’s stock price,
corporate and regulatory requirements, restrictions under the Company’s debt obligations, and other market and economic
conditions. During the last three years, the Company’s share repurchases were transacted through both open market transactions
and ASR programs with third-party financial institutions.
129
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Information regarding share repurchase activity over the last three years is as follows:
Share Repurchases 
(In millions, except price per shar e data)Total
Number of
Shares
Purchased Average Price
Paid Per ShareApproximate
Dollar Value of
Shares that May
Yet Be Purchased
Under the
Programs
Balance, March 31, 2019 $ 3,469 
Shares repurchased - Open market 9.2 $ 144.68 (1,334)
Shares repurchased - May 2019 ASR 4.7 $ 127.68 (600)
Balance, March 31, 2020 1,535 
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2021 2,000 
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.7 $ 160.33 (750)
Balance, March 31, 2021 2,785 
Shares repurchased - May 2021 ASR 5.2 $ 193.22 (1,000)
Shares repurchased - Open market 4.6 $ 217.73 (1,007)
Shares repurchase authorization increase in 2022 4,000 
Shares repurchased - February 2022 ASR 4.8 $ 265.56 (1,500)
Balance, March 31, 2022 $ 3,278 
(1) This table does not include the value of equity award s surrendered to satisfy tax withholding obligations or forfeitures of equity awards. It
also excludes shares related to the Company’ s Split-of f of the Change Healthcare JV  as described below .
(2) The number of shares purchased reflects rounding adjustments.
(3) Of the total dollar value, $8 million was accrued within “Other accrued liabilitie s” in the Company’ s Consolidated Balance Sheet as of
March 31, 2021 for share repurchases that were executed in late March and settled in early April.
(4) In February 2022, the Company entered into an ASR program with a third-party financial institution to repurchase $1.5 billion of the
Company’ s common stock. The average price paid per share and total number of shares purchased under this program are estimates based
on the initial share purchas e price and initial delivery of shares under an ASR agreement and may differ from the average price paid per
share and total number of shares purchased under the ASR program upon its final settlement in May 2022.
On March 9, 2020, the Company completed the Split-off of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV. In connection with the
Split-off, the Company distributed all 176.0 million outstanding shares of SpinCo common stock, which held all of the Company’s
interests in the Change Healthcare JV, to participating holders of the Company’s common stock in exchange for 15.4 million shares
of McKesson stock, which are now held as treasury stock on the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets. Following
consummation of the exchange offer, on March 10, 2020, SpinCo merged with and into Change with each share of SpinCo
common stock converted into one share of Change common stock, par value $0.001 per share, with cash being paid in lieu of
fractional shares of Change common stock. See Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” for more information.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
130
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Information regarding changes in the Company’s accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) by component are as
follows:
Foreign Currency Translation
Adjustments
(In millions)Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments,
Net of Tax Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Net
Investment
Hedges,
Net of Tax Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
Hedges,
Net of TaxUnrealized
Gains (Losses)
and Other
Components of
Benefit Plans,
Net of TaxTotal
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Loss
Balance at March 31, 2019 $ (1,628)$ 53 $ (37)$ (237)$ (1,849)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications (151) 85 86 33 53 
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other — — — 96 96 
Other comprehensive income (loss) (151) 85 86 129 149 
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests 1 — — 2 3 
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson (152) 85 86 127 146 
Balance at March 31, 2020 (1,780) 138 49 (110) (1,703)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications 312 (175) (36) (2) 99 
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other 47 — — 24 71 
Other comprehensive income (loss) 359 (175) (36) 22 170 
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests (60) (1) — 8 (53)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to McKesson 419 (174) (36) 14 223 
Balance at March 31, 2021 (1,361) (36) 13 (96) (1,480)
Other comprehensive income (loss)
before reclassifications (51) 41 18 31 39 
Amounts reclassified to earnings and
other 71 (1) (4) 10 76 
Other comprehensive income 20 40 14 41 115 
Less: amounts attributable to
noncontrolling and redeemable
noncontrolling interests 5 (6) — — (1)
Other comprehensive income
attributable to McKesson 15 46 14 41 116 
Exercise of put right by noncontrolling
shareholders of McKesson Europe AG (158) — — (12) (170)
Balance at March 31, 2022 $ (1,504)$ 10 $ 27 $ (67)$ (1,534)
(1) Primarily results from the conversion of non-U.S. dollar financial statements of the Company’ s operations in Europe and Canada into the
Company’ s reporting currency , U.S. dollars.
(2) Amounts before reclassifications recorded in 2022, 2021, and 2020 include gains (losses) of $73 million, $(118) million, and $39 million,
respectively , related to net investment hedges from  Euro-denominated notes and gains (losses) of $(4) million, $(119) million, and
$76 million, respectively , related to net investment hedges from cross-currency swaps. These amounts are net of income tax benefit
(expense) of $( 23) million, $ 62 million, and $( 30) million in 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively .(1) (2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
131
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
(3) Primarily reflects a reclassification of losses of $127 million, net of $33 million of income tax benefit, predominantly on the termination of
the Company’ s U.S. defined benefit pension plan from “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” to “Other income, net” in the Company’ s
Consolidated Statement of Operations.
(4) Primarily includes adjustments for amounts related to the contribution of the Company’ s German pharmaceutical wholesale business to a
joint venture,  as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale” and Financial Note 6, “Other Income, Net.” These amounts
were included in the 2021 and 2020 calculation of charges to remeasure the assets and liabilities held for sale to fair value less costs to sell
recorded within Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(5) Primarily includes adjustments for amounts related to the sale of the Company’ s Austrian business, as discussed in more detail in Financial
Note 2, “Held for Sale.” These amounts were included in the 2022 calculation of charges to remeasure the assets and liabilities held for sale
to fair value less costs to sell recorded within Selling, distribution, general, and administrative expenses in the Consolidated Statement of
Operations.
20.    Related Party Balances and Transactions
McKesson Europe has investments in pharmacies located across Europe that are accounted for under the equity method.
McKesson Europe maintains distribution arrangements with these pharmacies for the sale of related goods and services under
which revenues of $137 million, $178 million, and $141 million are included in the Consolidated Statements of Operations for the
years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively, and receivables related to these transactions included in the
Consolidated Balance Sheets were not material as of March 31, 2022 and 2021. Predominately all of these pharmacies were
divested from the Company in the fourth quarter of 2022 as part of the completed sale of the Company’s Austrian business, while
certain other remaining pharmacies are included in the E.U. disposal group and U.K. disposal group. Refer to Financial Note 2,
“Held for Sale,” for additional information.
In 2022, 2021, and 2020, the Company’s pharmaceutical sales to one of its equity method investees in the U.S. Pharmaceutical
segment totaled $100 million, $111 million, and $60 million, respectively. Trade receivables related to these transactions from this
investee were not material as of March 31, 2022 and 2021. During 2022, the Company’s investment in this investee was no longer
accounted for using the equity method and is not considered a related party as of March 31, 2022.
Refer to Financial Note 4, “Business Acquisitions and Divestitures,” for information regarding related party balances and
transactions with Change and the Change Healthcare JV.
21.    Segments of Business
Commencing with the second quarter of 2021, the Company began reporting under four reportable segments: U.S.
Pharmaceutical, RxTS, Medical-Surgical Solutions, and International. Other, for retrospective periods presented, consists of the
Company’s previous equity method investment in the Change Healthcare JV, which was split-off from McKesson in the fourth
quarter of 2020. The organizational structure also includes Corporate, which consists of income and expenses associated with
administrative functions and projects, and the results of certain investments. The factors for determining the reportable segments
include the manner in which management evaluates the performance of the Company combined with the nature of the individual
business activities. The Company evaluates the performance of its operating segments on a number of measures, including
revenues and operating profit (loss) before interest expense and income taxes. Assets by operating segment are not reviewed by
management for the purpose of assessing performance or allocating resources.
The U.S. Pharmaceutical segment distributes branded, generic, specialty, biosimilar and over-the-counter pharmaceutical
drugs, and other healthcare-related products. This segment also provides practice management, technology, clinical support, and
business solutions to community-based oncology and other specialty practices. In addition, the segment sells financial, operational,
and clinical solutions to pharmacies (retail, hospital, alternate site) and provides consulting, outsourcing, technological, and other
services.
The RxTS segment serves McKesson’s biopharma and life sciences partners and patients to address medication challenges for
patients throughout their journeys. RxTS works across healthcare to connect pharmacies, providers, payers, and biopharma
companies to deliver innovative access and adherence solutions designed to benefit stakeholders and help people get the medicine
they need to live healthier lives. RxTS also offers third-party logistics and wholesale distribution support across various therapeutic
categories and temperature ranges to biopharma customers throughout the product lifecycle.
132
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
The Medical-Surgical Solutions segment provides medical-surgical supply distribution, logistics, and other services to
healthcare providers, including physician offices, surgery centers, nursing homes, hospital reference labs, and home health care
agencies. This segment offers more than 285,000 national brand medical-surgical products as well as McKesson’s own line of high-
quality products through a network of distribution centers within the U.S.
The International segment includes the Company’s operations in Europe and Canada, bringing together non-U.S.-based drug
distribution services, specialty pharmacy, retail, and infusion care services. The Company’s operations in Europe provide
distribution and services to wholesale, institutional, and retail customers in 11 European countries where it owns, partners, or
franchises with retail pharmacies and operates through two businesses: Pharmaceutical Distribution and Retail Pharmacy. The
Company’s Canada operations deliver vital medicines, supplies, and information technology solutions throughout Canada and
includes Rexall Health retail pharmacies. In 2022, the Company entered into agreements to sell the E.U. disposal group and U.K.
disposal group, and completed the sale of its Austrian business. Refer to Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” for more information.
Other, for retrospective periods presented consists of the Company’s previous investment in the Change Healthcare JV, which
was split-off from the Company in the fourth quarter of 2020.
133
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
Financial information relating to the Company’s reportable operating segments and reconciliations to the consolidated totals is
as follows:
 Years Ended March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021 2020
Segment revenues 
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 212,149 $ 189,274 $ 181,700 
Prescription Technology Solutions 3,864 2,890 2,705 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 11,608 10,099 8,305 
International 36,345 35,965 38,341 
Total revenues $ 263,966 $ 238,228 $ 231,051 
Segment operating profit (loss) 
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 2,879 $ 2,763 $ 2,745 
Prescription Technology Solutions 500 395 396 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 959 707 499 
International (968) (37) (161)
Other — — (1,113)
Subtotal 3,370 3,828 2,366 
Corporate expenses, net (1,073) (8,645) (973)
Loss on debt extinguishment (191) — — 
Interest expense (178) (217) (249)
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes $ 1,928 $ (5,034) $ 1,144 
Segment depreciation and amortization 
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 228 $ 211 $ 208 
Prescription Technology Solutions 82 87 85 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 129 130 136 
International 204 334 357 
Corporate 117 125 136 
Total depreciation and amortization $ 760 $ 887 $ 922 
Segment expenditures for long-lived assets 
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 137 $ 246 $ 109 
Prescription Technology Solutions 10 22 23 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 74 57 36 
International 177 212 218 
Corporate 137 104 120 
Total expenditures for long-lived assets $ 535 $ 641 $ 506 
(1) Revenues from services on a disaggregated basis represent less than 1% of the U.S. Pharmaceutical segment’ s total revenues, less than 40%
of the RxTS segment’ s total revenues, less than 3% of the Medical-Sur gical  Solutions segment’ s total revenues, and less than 8% of the
International segment’ s total revenues. The International segment reflects foreign revenues. Revenues for the remaining three reportable
segments are domestic.
(2) Segment operating profit (loss) includes gross profit, net of total operating expenses, as well as other income (expense), net, for the
Company’ s reportable segments. For retrospective periods presented, operating loss for Other reflects equity earnings and charges from the
Company’ s previous equity method investment in the Change Healthcare JV, which was split-of f from McKesson in the fourth quarter of
2020.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
 (6)
(7)
(8)
(9)
(10)
134
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Continued)
(3) The Company’ s U.S. Pharmaceutical segment’ s operating profit for 2022, 2021, and 2020 includes credits of $23 millio n, $38 millio n, and
$252 million, respectively , related to the LIFO method of accounting for inventories. Operating profit for 2022, 2021, and 2020 also includes
$46 million, $181 million, and $22 million, respectively , of cash receipts for the Company’ s share of antitrust legal settlements. In addition,
operating profit for 2021 includes a charge of $50 million recorded in conne ction with the Company’ s estimated liability under the State of
New York’s OSA, as further discussed in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities.”
(4) The Company’ s Medical-Sur gical Solutions segment’ s operating profit for 2022 and 2021 includes inventory charges of $164 millio n and
$136 million, respectively , on certain PPE and other related products.
(5) The Company’ s International segment’ s operating loss for 2022, 2021, and 2020 reflects the following:
• 2022 includes charges of $1.1 billion  to remeasure assets and liabilities of the U.K.  disposal group to fair value less costs to sell, as
discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale;”
• 2022 includes  charges of $383 million to remeasure assets and liabilities of the E.U. disposal group to fair value less costs to sell
and to impair  certain assets, including internal-use software that will not be utilized in the future, as discussed in more detail in
Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale;”
• 2022 includes  a gain of $59 million related to the sale of the Company’ s Canadian health benefit claims management and plan
administrative services business;
• 2022 includes a gain of $42 million related to the sale of the Company’ s 30% interest in its German pharmaceutical wholesale joint
venture to WBA. 2021 and 2020 includes charges of $58 millio n and $275 millio n, respectively , related to the contribution of a
majority of its German pharmaceutical wholesale business to the joint venture with WBA  completed on November 1, 2020. See
Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale,” and Financial Note 6, “Other Income, Net,” for further details;
• 2021 includes a goodwill impairment charge of $69 million related to one of the Company’ s reporting units in Europe, as discussed
in more detail in Financial Note 1 1, “Goodwill and Intangible Assets, Net;” and
• 2021 and 2020 includes long-lived asset impairment charges of $115 millio n and $112 millio n, respectively , primarily related to
retail pharmacy businesses in Canada and Europe, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 3, “Restru cturing, Impairment, and
Related Char ges, Net.”
(6) Operating loss for Other for 2020 includes an impairment charge of $1.2 billion and a dilution loss of $246 million associated with the
Company’ s previous investment in the Change Healt hcare JV, partially offset by a net gain of $414 million (pre-tax and after-tax) related to
the separation of its interest in the Change Healthcare JV completed during the fourth quarter of 2020. Operating loss for 2020 also includes
the Company’ s proportionate share of loss from the Change Healthcare JV  of $119 million.
(7) Corporate expenses, net, for 2022, 2021, and 2020 reflects the following:
• 2022 includes charges of $55 million primarily related to the effect of accumulated other comprehensive loss components from the
E.U. disposal group, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale;”
• 2022 includes charges of $42 million primarily related to the effect of accumulated other comprehensive loss components from the
U.K. disposal group, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 2, “Held for Sale;”
• 2022 and 2021 includes charges of $274 million and $8.1 billion, respectively , relate d to the estimated liability for opioid-related
claims, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 18, “Commitments and Contingent Liabilities;"
• 2022 and 2021 includes net gains of $98 million and $133 million, respectively , associated with certain of the Company’ s equity
investments, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 16, “Fair Value Measurements;”
• 2021 includes a net gain of $131 million recorded in connection with insurance proceeds received from the settlement of the
shareholder derivative action related to the Company’ s controlled substances monitoring program;
• 2020 includes settlement char ges of $ 122 million for the termination of the Company’ s defined benefit pension plan; and
• 2020 includes a settlement char ge of $ 82 million related to opioid claims.
(8) Loss on debt extinguishme nt for 2022 consists of a charge of $191 millio n related to the Com pany’ s July 2021 tender offer to redeem a
portion of its existing debt, as discussed in more detail in Financial Note 12, “Debt and Financing Activities.”
(9) Amounts primarily consist of amortization of acquired intangible assets purchased in connection with business acquisitions and capitalized
software for internal use as well as depreciation and amortization of property , plant, and equipment, net.
(10) Long-lived assets consist of property , plant, and equipment, net and capitalized software.
135
Table of Contents Item 8 Index
McKESSON CORPORATION
FINANCIAL NOTES (Concluded)
Segment assets and long-lived assets by geographic areas were as follows:
 March 31,
(In millions) 2022 2021
Segment assets
U.S. Pharmaceutical $ 38,346 $ 35,236 
Prescription Technology Solutions 3,528 3,446 
Medical-Surgical Solutions 5,830 5,986 
International 13,717 14,987 
Corporate 1,877 5,360 
Total assets $ 63,298 $ 65,015 
Long-lived assets 
United States $ 2,060 $ 2,110 
Foreign 352 984 
Total long-lived assets $ 2,412 $ 3,094 
(1) Long-lived assets consist of property , plant, and equipment, net and capitalized software and excludes amounts classified as assets held for
sale.(1)
136
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 9.    Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, with the participation of other members of the Company’s
management, have evaluated the effectiveness of the Company’s “disclosure controls and procedures” (as such term is defined in
Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) as of the end of the period covered by this report and have concluded that our
disclosure controls and procedures are effective based on their evaluation of these controls and procedures as required by paragraph
(b) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15.
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Management’s report on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Exchange Act
Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) and the related report of our independent registered public accounting firm are included in this
Annual Report, under the headings, “Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting” and “Report of
Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” and are incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Controls
There was no change in our internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation required by
paragraph (d) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15 that occurred during our fourth quarter of 2022 that has materially affected,
or is reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B.    Other Information.
None.
Item 9C.    Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections.
Not applicable.
PART III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance.
Information about our Directors is incorporated by reference from the discussion under Item 1 of our Proxy Statement for the
2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (the “Proxy Statement”) under the heading “Election of Directors.” Information about our
Executive Officers is incorporated by reference from the discussion in Part I of this report under the heading “Information about
our Executive Officers.” Information about our Audit Committee, including the members of the committee and our Audit
Committee Financial Experts, is incorporated by reference from the discussion in Item 1 of our Proxy Statement under the heading
“The Board, Committees and Meetings,” and in Item 2 of our Proxy Statement under the heading “Audit Committee Report.”
Information about the Code of Conduct applicable to all employees, officers, and directors can be found on our website,
www.mckesson.com, under the caption “Investors - Governance.” The Company’s Corporate Governance Guidelines and Charters
for the Audit, Compensation, and Governance Committees can also be found on our website under the same caption.
The Company intends to post on its website required information regarding any amendment to, or waiver from, the Code of
Conduct that applies to our Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Controller, and persons performing similar functions
within four business days after any such amendment or waiver.
137
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 11.    Executive Compensation.
Information with respect to this item is incorporated by reference from the discussion under the heading “Executive
Compensation” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.
Information about security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management is incorporated by reference from the
discussion under the heading “Principal Shareholders” in our Proxy Statement.
The following table sets forth information as of March 31, 2022 with respect to the plans under which the Company’s common
stock is authorized for issuance:
Plan Category
(In millions, except per shar e amounts)Number  of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rightsWeighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights Number  of securities
remaining available for
futur e issuance under
equity compensation
plans (excluding
securities r eflected in the
first column)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 3.0 $ 175.23 20.4 
Equity compensation plans not approved by
security holders — $ — — 
(1) The weighted -average exercise price set forth in this column is calculated excluding outstanding restricted  stock unit (“RSU”) awards, since
recipients are not required to pay an exercise price to receive the shares subject to these awards.
(2) Represents option and RSU awards outstanding under the following plans: (i) 1997 Non-Employee Directors’  Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan; (ii) the 2005 Stock Plan; and (iii) the 2013 Stock Plan.
(3) Represents 1.9 million shares available for purchase  under the 2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan and 18.5 million shares available for
grant under the 2013 Stock Plan.
The following are descriptions of equity plans that have been approved by the Company’s stockholders. The plans are
administered by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors, except for the portion of the 2013 Stock Plan and 2005
Stock Plan related to non-employee directors, which is administered by the Board of Directors or its Governance Committee.
2013 Stock Plan: The 2013 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 22, 2013 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 31, 2013. The 2013 Stock Plan permits the grant of awards in the form of stock options, stock
appreciation rights, restricted stock (“RS”), restricted stock units (“RSUs”), performance-based restricted stock units (“PeRSUs”),
performance shares, and other share-based awards. The number of shares reserved for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan equals
the sum of (i) 30.0 million shares, (ii) the number of shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date
of the 2013 Stock Plan, and (iii) the number of shares that become available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the
effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan. For any one share of common stock issued in connection with an RS, RSU, performance
share, or other full-share award, three and one-half shares shall be deducted from the shares available for future grants. Shares of
common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, including in respect of the payment of
applicable taxes, or shares repurchased on the open market with proceeds from the exercise of options shall not be returned to the
reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan. Shares withheld to satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting
of a full-share award shall be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2013 Stock Plan.(1)
(2) (3)
138
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Stock options are granted at no less than fair market value and those options granted under the 2013 Stock Plan generally have
a contractual term of seven years. Options generally become exercisable in four equal annual installments beginning one year after
the grant date. The vesting of RS or RSUs is determined by the Compensation Committee at the time of grant. Beginning with
awards granted in fiscal year 2021, RS and RSUs generally vest over three years. RSUs granted under the PeRSU program vest
three years following the end of the performance period. The Company’s executive officers and other members of senior
management are annually granted performance awards called performance stock units (“PSUs”), which have a three-year
performance period and are payable in shares without an additional vesting period.
Non-employee directors may be granted an award on the date of each annual meeting of the stockholders for up to 5,000
RSUs, as determined by the Board of Directors. Such non-employee director award is fully vested on the date of the grant.
2005 Stock Plan: The 2005 Stock Plan was adopted by the Board of Directors on May 25, 2005 and approved by the
Company’s stockholders on July 27, 2005. The 2005 Stock Plan permits the granting of up to 42.5 million shares in the form of
stock options, RS, RSUs, PeRSUs, performance shares, and other share-based awards. For any one share of common stock issued
in connection with an RS, RSU, performance share, or other full-share award, two shares shall be deducted from the shares
available for future grants. Shares of common stock not issued or delivered as a result of the net exercise of a stock option, shares
withheld to satisfy tax obligations relating to the vesting of a full-share award or shares repurchased on the open market with
proceeds from the exercise of options shall not be returned to the reserve of shares available for issuance under the 2005 Stock
Plan. Stock options were granted at no less than fair market value and options granted under the 2005 Stock Plan generally have a
contractual term of seven years.
Following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, no further shares were made subject to award under the 2005 Stock Plan.
Shares reserved but unissued under the 2005 Stock Plan as of the effective date of the 2013 Stock Plan, and shares that become
available for reuse under the 2005 Stock Plan following the effectiveness of the 2013 Stock Plan, will be available for awards under
the 2013 Stock Plan.
1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and Deferral Plan: The 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity
Compensation and Deferral Plan was approved by the Company’s stockholders on July 30, 1997; however, stockholder approval of
the 2005 Stock Plan on July 27, 2005 had the effect of terminating the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan such that no new awards would be granted under the 1997 Non-Employee Directors’ Equity Compensation and
Deferral Plan.
2000 Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the “ESPP”): The ESPP is intended to qualify as an “employee stock purchase plan”
within the meaning of Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. In March 2002, the Board amended the ESPP to allow for
participation in the plan by employees of certain of the Company’s international and other subsidiaries. Currently, 21.1 million
shares have been approved by stockholders for issuance under the ESPP.
The ESPP is implemented through a continuous series of three-month purchase periods (“Purchase Periods”) during which
contributions can be made toward the purchase of common stock under the plan. Each eligible employee may elect to authorize
regular payroll deductions during the next succeeding Purchase Period, the amount of which may not exceed 15% of a participant’s
compensation. At the end of each Purchase Period, the funds withheld by each participant will be used to purchase shares of the
Company’s common stock. The purchase price of each share of the Company’s common stock is 85% of the fair market value of
each share on the last day of the applicable Purchase Period. In general, the maximum number of shares of common stock that may
be purchased by a participant for each calendar year is determined by dividing $25,000 by the fair market value of one share of
common stock on the offering date.
There currently are no equity awards outstanding that were granted under equity plans that were not submitted for approval by
the Company’s stockholders.
139
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence.
Information with respect to certain transactions with directors and management is incorporated by reference from the Proxy
Statement under the heading “Related Party Transactions Policy and Transactions with Related Persons.” Information regarding
Director independence is incorporated by reference from the Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence.”
Additional information regarding certain related party balances and transactions is included in the Financial Review section of this
Annual Report and Financial Note 20, “Related Party Balances and Transactions” to the consolidated financial statements included
in this Annual Report.
Item 14.    Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
Information regarding principal accountant fees and services is set forth under the heading “Ratification of Appointment of
Deloitte & Touche LLP as the Company’s Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm for Fiscal Year 2023” in our Proxy
Statement and all such information is incorporated herein by reference.
140
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
PART IV
Item 15.    Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedule.
Page
(a)(1) Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID: 34) 65
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 70
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss) for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 71
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2022 and 2021 72
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity (Deficit) for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 73
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 74
Financial Notes 75
(a)(2) Financial Statement Schedule
Schedule II-Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 142
All other schedules not included have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they are
required or because the required information, where material, is shown in the financial statements, financial notes, or
supplementary financial information.
(a)(3) Exhibits submitted with this Annual Report on Form 10-K as filed with the SEC and those incorporated by
reference to other filings are listed on the Exhibit Index 143
141
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SCHEDULE II
SUPPLEMENTARY CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
(In millions)
Additions
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning of
YearCharged to
Costs and
ExpensesCharged to
Other
Accounts Deductions
From
Allowance
Accounts Balance at
End of
Year 
Year Ended March 31, 2022
Allowances for credit losses $ 211 $ 29 $ (35)$ (106)$ 99 
Other allowances 50 — 4 (2) 52 
$ 261 $ 29 $ (31)$ (108)$ 151 
Year Ended March 31, 2021
Allowances for credit losses $ 252 $ 4 $ 1 $ (46)$ 211 
Other allowances 30 11 9 — 50 
$ 282 $ 15 $ 10 $ (46)$ 261 
Year Ended March 31, 2020
Allowances for credit losses $ 273 $ 91 $ (19)$ (93)$ 252 
Other allowances 24 — — 6 30 
$ 297 $ 91 $ (19)$ (87)$ 282 
2022 2021 2020
(1)Deductions:
Written-off $ (106) $ (40) $ (93)
Credited to other accounts and other (2) (6) 6 
Total $ (108) $ (46) $ (87)
(2)Amounts shown as deductions from current and non-current receivables
(current allowances were $144 million, $250 million, and $265
million at March 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively) $ 151 $ 261 $ 282 
(3)Primarily represents reclassifications to other balance sheet accounts.(3) (1) (2)
142
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
EXHIBIT INDEX
The agreements included as exhibits to this report are included to provide information regarding their terms and not intended to
provide any other factual or disclosure information about the Company or the other parties to the agreements. The agreements may
contain representations and warranties by each of the parties to the applicable agreement that were made solely for the benefit of
the other parties to the applicable agreement. Those representations and warranties:
•should not in all instances be treated as categorical statements of fact, but rather as a way of allocating the risk to one of
the parties if those statements prove to be inaccurate;
•may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material to you or other
investors; and
•were made only as of the date of the applicable agreement or such other date or dates as may be specified in the agreement
and are subject to more recent developments.
Accordingly, these representations and warranties may not describe the actual state of affairs as of the date they were made or
at any other time.
Exhibits identified under “Incorporated by Reference” in the table below are on file with the Commission and are incorporated
by reference as exhibits hereto.
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
Number Exhibit Filing Date
2.1 Agreement of Contribution and Sale, dated as of June 28, 2016,
by and among McKesson Corporation, PF2 NewCo LLC, PF2
NewCo Intermediate Holdings, LLC, PF2 NewCo Holdings,
LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc., Change Healthcare, Inc., Change
Aggregator L.P. and H&F Echo Holdings, L.P.8-K 1-13252 2.1 July 5, 2016
2.2 Amendment No. 1 to Agreement Contribution and Sale, dated
as of March 1, 2017, by and among by and among Change
Healthcare LLC, Change Healthcare Intermediate Holdings,
LLC, Change Healthcare Holdings, LLC, HCIT Holdings, Inc.,
Change Healthcare, Inc., a Delaware corporation, for itself and
in its capacity as Echo Representative, certain affiliates of The
Blackstone Group, L.P., certain affiliates of Hellman &
Friedman LLC, and McKesson Corporation, a Delaware
corporation.8-K 1-13252 2.1 March 7, 2017
2.3 Separation and Distribution Agreement by and between
McKesson Corporation, PF2 SpinCo, Inc., Change Healthcare
Inc., Change Healthcare LLC, Change Healthcare Intermediate
Holdings, LLC and Change Healthcare Holdings, LLC
(including form of Tax Matters Agreement)8-K 1-13252 2.1 February 10, 2020
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Company, as filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on July
27, 2011.8-K 1-13252 3.1 August 2, 2011
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, as amended
March 11, 20208-K 1-13252 3.1 March 13, 2020
4.1 Indenture, dated as of March 11, 1997, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The First National Bank of Chicago, as
trustee.10-K 1-13252 4.4 June 19, 1997
4.2 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 11, 1997, and related
Form of 2027 Note.S-4 333-30899 4.2 July 8, 1997
4.3 Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and The Bank of New York Trust
Company, N.A., as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 March 5, 2007
143
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
Number Exhibit Filing Date
4.4 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 28, 2011, to
the Indenture, dated as of March 5, 2007, among the Company,
as issuer, the Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
(formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company,
N.A.), and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
and related Form of 2021 Note and Form of 2041 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 February 28, 2011
4.5 Indenture, dated as of December 4, 2012, by and between the
Company, as issuer, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as trustee.8-K 1-13252 4.1 December 4, 2012
4.6 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of December 4, 2012, and related
Form of 2022 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 December 4, 2012
4.7 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 8, 2013, and related
Form of 2023 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 8, 2013
4.8 Officers’ Certificate, dated as of March 10, 2014, and related
Form of 2024 Note, and Form of 2044 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.2 March 10, 2014
4.9 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 17, 2017, and related
Form of 2021 Euro Note, Form of 2025 Euro Note, and Form
of 2029 Sterling Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 17, 2017
4.10 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 12, 2018, and related
Form of 2026 Euro Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 13, 2018
4.11 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of February 16, 2018, and related
Form of 2028 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 February 21, 2018
4.12 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of November 30, 2018, and Form
of 2029 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 November 30, 2018
4.13 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of December 3, 2020, and related
Form of 2025 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 December 3, 2020
4.14 Officer’s Certificate, dated as of August 12, 2021, and related
Form of 2026 Note.8-K 1-13252 4.1 August 12, 2021
4.15†Description of the Company’s Securities. — — — —
10.1*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Profit Sharing
Investment Plan, as amended and restated on January 29, 2003.10-K 1-13252 10.6 June 6, 2003
10.2*McKesson Corporation Supplemental Retirement Savings Plan,
as amended and restated effective July 30, 2019.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 October 30, 2019
10.3*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan II, as amended and restated as of October 28, 2004, and
Amendment No. 1 thereto effective July 25, 2007.10-K 1-13252 10.7 May 7, 2008
10.4*McKesson Corporation Deferred Compensation Administration
Plan III, as amended and restated effective July 30, 2019.10-Q 1-13252 10.1 October 30, 2019
10.5*McKesson Corporation Executive Survivor Benefits Plan, as
amended and restated as of January 20, 2010.8-K 1-13252 10.1 January 25, 2010
10.6*†McKesson Corporation Severance Policy for Executive
Employees, as amended and restated April 26, 2022.— — — —
10.7*McKesson Corporation Change in Control Policy for Selected
Executive Employees, as amended and restated effective
January 28, 2020.10-K 1-13252 10.8 May 22, 2020
10.8*†McKesson Corporation Management Incentive Plan, as
amended and restated April 26, 2022.— — — —
10.9*†Form of Statement of Terms and Conditions Applicable to
Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation Management
Incentive Plan, effective April 26, 2022.— — — —
144
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
Number Exhibit Filing Date
10.10*McKesson Corporation 2005 Stock Plan, as amended and
restated on July 28, 2010.10-Q 1-13252 10.4 July 30, 2010
10.11*Forms of (i) Statement of Terms and Conditions, (ii) Stock
Option Grant Notice and (iii), Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement, each as applicable to Awards under the McKesson
Corporation 2005 Stock Plan.10-Q 1-13252 10.2 July 26, 2012
10.12*McKesson Corporation 2013 Stock Plan, effective July 31,
2013.8-K 1-13252 10.1 August 2, 2013
10.13*†Forms of Statement of Terms and Conditions and Grant Notices
Applicable to Awards Pursuant to the McKesson Corporation
2013 Stock Plan.— — — —
10.14Third Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Change Healthcare LLC, dated as of March 1,
2017.8-K 1-13252 10.1 March 7, 2017
10.15Form of Commercial Paper Dealer Agreement between
McKesson Corporation, as Issuer, and the Dealer.10-K 1-13252 10.19 May 5, 2016
10.16Credit Agreement, dated as of October 22, 2015, among the
Company and Certain Subsidiaries, as Borrowers, Bank of
America, N.A. as Administrative Agent, Bank of America,
N.A. (acting through its Canada Branch), Citibank, N.A. and
Barclays Bank PLC, as Swing Line Lenders, Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association as L/C Issuer, Barclays Bank PLC,
Citibank N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Co-
Syndication Agents, Goldman Sachs Bank USA, JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. as
Co-Documentation Agents, and The Other Lenders Party
Thereto, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated, Barclays Bank PLC, Citigroup Global Markets
Inc., Goldman Sachs Bank USA, J.P. Morgan Securities, LLC,
The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ, Ltd. and Wells Fargo
Securities, LLC as Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Book
Runners.8-K 1-13252 10.1 October 23, 2015
10.17Amendment No. 2, dated January 30, 2014, and Amendment
No. 1, dated November 15, 2013, to the Credit Agreement and
the Credit Agreement dated as of September 23, 2011, among
the Company and McKesson Canada Corporation, collectively,
the Borrowers, Bank of America, N.A. as Administrative
Agent, Bank of America, N.A. (acting through its Canada
branch), as Canadian Administrative Agent, JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Co-Syndication Agents, Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association as L/C Issuer, The Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi UFJ,
LTD., The Bank of Nova Scotia and U.S. Bank National
Association as Co-Documentation Agents, and The Other
Lenders Party Thereto, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner &
Smith Incorporated, Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book
Manager.8-K 1-3252 10.1 February 5, 2014
10.18Credit Agreement dated as of September 25, 2019, among the
Company and certain subsidiaries, as borrowers, Bank of
America, N.A., as administrative agent, Barclays Bank PLC,
Citibank, N.A., Wells Fargo Bank, National Association,
Goldman Sachs Bank USA, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., and
HSBC Securities (USA) Inc., as co-syndication agents, the
lenders party thereto, the letter of credit issuers party thereto
("2020 Credit Facility").8-K 1-13252 10.1 September 27, 2019
Amendment No. 1, dated February 1, 2021, to the 2020
Credit Facility.8-K 1-13252 10.1 April 2, 2021
145
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Description FormFile
Number Exhibit Filing Date
Amendment No. 2, dated March 31, 2021, to the 2020
Credit Facility.8-K 1-13252 10.2 April 2, 2021
10.19*Form of Director and Officer Indemnification Agreement. 10-K 1-13252 10.27 May 4, 2010
10.20Tax Matters Agreement, by and between McKesson
Corporation, PF2 SpinCo, Inc., Change Healthcare Inc.,
Change Healthcare LLC and Change Healthcare Holdings,
LLC dated as of March 9, 20208-K 1-13252 10.1 March 13, 2020
10.21Distributor Settlement Agreement related to opioids claims,
entered into on February 25, 2022, among the Settling States,
the Settling Distributors, and the Participating Subdivisions (as
defined therein).8-K/A 1-6671 10.1 May 3, 2022
21† List of Significant Subsidiaries of the Registrant. — — — —
23† Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm,
Deloitte & Touche LLP.— — — —
31.1†Certification of Chief Executive Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
31.2†Certification of Chief Financial Officer Pursuant to Rule 13a-
14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 as amended, and adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
32†† Certification Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.— — — —
101† The following materials from the McKesson Corporation
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended March
31, 2022, formatted in Inline Extensible Business Reporting
Language (iXBRL): (i) the Consolidated Statements of
Operations, (ii) Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive
Income (Loss), (iii) Consolidated Balance Sheets, (iv)
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity (Deficit), (v)
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, and (vi) related
Financial Notes.— — — —
104† Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as iXBRL and
contained in Exhibit 101).— — — —
________________
*    Management contract or compensation plan or arrangement in which directors and/or executive officers are eligible to
participate.
†    Filed herewith.
††    Furnished herewith.
Registrant agrees to furnish to the Commission upon request a copy of each instrument defining the rights of security holders
with respect to issues of long-term debt of the registrant, the authorized principal amount of which does not exceed 10% of the total
assets of the registrant.
146
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
Item 16.    Form 10-K Summary.
None.
147
Table of Contents
McKESSON CORPORATION
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 MCKESSON CORPORATION
May 9, 2022  /s/ Britt J. Vitalone
 Britt J. Vitalone
 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated:
/s/ Brian S. Tyler /s/ Donald R. Knauss
Brian S. Tyler
Chief Executive Officer and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)Donald R. Knauss, Director
/s/ Britt J. Vitalone /s/ Bradley E. Lerman
Britt J. Vitalone
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)Bradley E. Lerman, Director
/s/ Napoleon B. Rutledge Jr. /s/ Linda P. Mantia
Napoleon B. Rutledge Jr.
Senior Vice President and Controller
(Principal Accounting Officer)Linda P. Mantia, Director
/s/ Richard H. Carmona /s/ Maria Martinez
Richard H. Carmona, M.D., Director Maria Martinez, Director
/s/ Dominic J. Caruso /s/ Edward A. Mueller
Dominic J. Caruso, Director Edward A. Mueller, Director
/s/ W. Roy Dunbar /s/ Susan R. Salka
W. Roy Dunbar, Director Susan R. Salka, Director
/s/ James H. Hinton /s/ Kathleen Wilson-Thompson
James H. Hinton, Director Kathleen Wilson-Thompson, Director
May 9, 2022
148
